Byzantine Apps - Developing apps
BYZANTINE APPS PRIVACY NOTICE
Last Updated:
            July 27, 2023
Byzantine Apps, LLC, a
            Georgia limited liability company (“Byzantine,” “we,” “us,” and “our”), provides
            this privacy notice (“Privacy Notice”) to explain how we or others collect,
            use, store, and share information about individuals in two different contexts
            (we refer to such individuals  as “you,” “your,” and “yourself”): (1) visitors
            to this website located at
byzantineapps.io
and any other website on which this Privacy Notice is allowed to
            be posted or linked (such individuals, “Visitors”, and such websites
            collectively, the “Site”); and (2) End Users of Byzantine’s owned and operated
            mobile applications (“Byzantine Apps” or “Apps”).  This Privacy Notice also
            explains how we enable certain third parties to collect information directly
            from End Users of our Apps, as well as certain choices you may have regarding
            how we use information about you and rights you may have to access or correct
            such information.
If you are located in
            the European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland or the United Kingdom and would
            like to review your rights under the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR (collectively
            referred to in this Privacy Notice as the “GDPR”), please go to
Section 5
of this Privacy Notice. If you are a resident of California or Virginia, or certain other states,
            you may review your rights under your state laws at
Section 7
of
            this Privacy Notice.
Below, we explain
            certain terms that we will use in this Privacy Notice that may make it easier
            to understand:
●
SDK
or
Software
            Development Kit
: An SDK is a block of computer code owned by certain Third
            Party Data Collectors that we can integrate with our apps to enable those Third
            Party Data Collectors to collect certain data, which is often useful to the
            mobile advertising and other data industries.
●
Third Party
            Data Collector
:  A third party that (1) owns or operates an SDK that is
            integrated with one or more Byzantine Apps and (2) directly collects information
            from End Users of the Apps through integration of such SDK.
●
Visitors
: Individuals
            who visit or use our Site.
●
End Users
: Individuals
            who download and use one or more of the Byzantine Apps on their Device.
●
Devices
:
            Internet-connected mobile devices such as Apple iPhones that use iOS or Samsung
            Galaxy devices that use Google’s Android OS.
●
Byzantine Apps
or
Apps
:
            Mobile applications owned and operated by Byzantine, including
WTForecast and Backseat Navigator.
●
Advertising ID
: A unique
            alphanumeric string randomly assigned by operating system manufacturers to each
            Device. Advertisers may use this ID to serve your Device more personalized
            advertising.  Examples of Advertising IDs include iOS IDFAs and Android
            Advertising IDs.
●
Installation ID
: A unique
            alphanumeric string randomly assigned by certain Apps to a Device but 
            which is not used for advertising purposes.
●
App Tracking
            Transparency/Opt-Out of Interest Based Ads
: Features on iOS or
            Android Devices that allows users to disable or limit the Apps’ ability to
            access the Advertising ID on your Device.
1. Summary: Who is Byzantine?
Byzantine’s primary
            business is the ownership and operation of mobile applications.  We also
            maintain websites related to the mobile applications that we offer.  As
            described further below, we typically do not collect any personal information
            from End Users of the Byzantine Apps, but we do facilitate collection of such
            information
by Third Party
            Data Collectors.  Additionally, we may collect certain personal information
            that Visitors to our Site may choose to provide.
2. Information Collection
A. Information
            We Collect Through Our Apps
We do not directly
            collect personal information from End Users of our Apps.  However, we may
            collect or receive certain aggregated, deidentified, or anonymous data related
            to usage of our Apps, primarily for the purpose of troubleshooting problems,
            reviewing how our Apps are being used by End Users, and other analytical or
            internal purposes.  A full description of our use of this data can be found in
Section 4
below.  Additionally, we enable certain third party vendors to
            collect aggregated, deidentified, or anonymous information regarding usage of
            our Apps for the purpose of providing analytic reports to us, e.g., regarding
            the frequency and cause of one or more Apps crashing.
B. Information
            Third Party Data Collectors Collect Through Our Apps
We allow certain,
            authorized Third Party Data Collectors to collect data (including personal
            information) directly from End Users of our Apps, via integration of these
            third parties’ SDKs into the Apps.  (In other words, we facilitate the Third
            Party Data Collector’s collection of certain information from you, but we do
            not receive or have access to the information they collect.)  When you use an
            Byzantine App that has integrated with a third party SDK (whether you are actively
            using the App or allowing it to run in the background), the Third Party Data
            Collector can collect information through or about your Device.  The
            information that may be collected by Third Party Data Collectors includes some
            or all of the data elements listed below.  However, you should visit each Third
            Party Data Collector’s privacy policy for complete details on what information
            they collect and how they use such information.  Please see Section 2.C for
            instructions on how to access such privacy policies.
a.
Precise
            Location Information:
■
Specific
            geolocation of the Device, usually described by latitude-longitude coordinates
            compiled through GPS features of the SDK, WiFi connection information, cell
            tower triangulation and other methods.
■
Dwell time
            within or in proximity to points of interest (
i.e.
, the length of time
            your Device stayed at one place).
■
Altitude,
            bearing, and speed.
b.
Relative
            Location Information:
■
Bluetooth
            Low-Energy (BLE) sensors, or beacons,
■
Information
            obtained from the Internet of Things (IoT) devices.
■
Near-field
            Communication (NFC)
■
Certain third
            party SDKs may be capable of receiving signals from each of the above
            technologies that indicate the proximity of a Device. For example, certain
            brick-and-mortar stores use beacons that sense when a Bluetooth-enabled Device
            is in proximity to the beacon (
i.e.
, when a Device user enters the
            store). Retail locations, sports arenas, restaurants, museums and other similar
            businesses may also use beacons.
c.
Advertising IDs or Installation IDs
d.
Timestamps
            (that may include time and date)
e.
Device Event
            Information:
■
App or system
            crashes
■
System crashes
■
Device settings
f.
Device Usage
            Information
■
Type of device
            (
e.g.
, Samsung Galaxy S21)
■
Operating
            system (OS) information (
e.g.
, iOS 14.5)
■
System settings
            (
e.g.
, enabled/disabled status for Location Services)
■
Time zone
■
Mobile carrier
■
IP address
■
Names and/or
            identifiers for Apps on your Device integrated with SDK
■
User agent (
i.e.
,
            a characteristic string that lets servers and network peers identify the
            application, operating system, vendor, and/or version of the Device)
g.
Network
            Information
■
VPN status
■
Network
            protocols employed
■
Device
            connectivity information (
e.g.
, how a device connects to a network) and
            signal strength
■
Network information such as mobile network code and mobile
            country code
C. How Third Party Data Collectors Use Information Collected
            Through Our Apps
The Third Party Data
            Collectors who collect information through our Apps may use such information in
            the manner set forth in their respective privacy policies.  Generally, these
            Third Party Data Collectors may use information collected from or about End
            Users or Devices to (a) to customize and measure ads in apps and other
            advertising; (b) for app and user analytics; (c) for disease prevention and
            cybersecurity; (d) for market, civic or other research regarding aggregated
            human foot and traffic patterns; and (e) to generate proprietary pseudonymized
            identifiers tied to the information collected for the above purposes.
We contractually
            prohibit Third Party Data Collectors from using or selling any of the SDK Data:
(i)
for any unlawful tracking or unlawful surveillance;
(ii)
collected from or about End Users or Devices located in the US,
            EEA, or UK to law enforcement agencies or to any governmental agency, to be
            used for a law enforcement purpose, except to the extent strictly necessary
            (and then redacted to the greatest extent possible) to comply with a judicial
            or other governmental order;
(ii)       to promote
            any illegal product or engage in any illegal purpose; to associate any End
            User, Device or individual to create profiles or inferences related to social
            networks, health status or ailments, sexual orientation or activity, political activity
            or beliefs, or religious convictions;
(iii)
to associate any End User, Device or individual with any venue
            that is related to medical care, substance abuse or rehabilitation, mental
            health, family planning or pregnancy (or pregnancy termination);
(iv)
for purposes related to political campaigns or fundraising;
(v)
to make decisions about any individual’s eligibility for
            employment, health care, credit or insurance, or for any other purpose that is
            covered by the Fair Credit Reporting Act; or
(v)
in a manner that violates applicable laws or any privacy policy
            posted by the Third Party Data Collector.
For more
            information regarding how Third Party Data Collectors use and share information
            collected via our Apps, please review each third party’s privacy policy, available
            at the links below:
●
Outlogic:
https://outlogic.io/privacy/
●
Umlaut:
https://tacs.c0nnectthed0ts.com/policy1/data_privacy.html
●
Opensignal:
https://www.opensignal.com/privacypolicy-for-crowdsourcedata
●
AerisWeather:
https://www.aerisweather.com/privacy/
●
Mapbox:
https://www.mapbox.com/legal/privacy
●
Facebook SDK:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy
●
Google Play Services:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
●
Firebase:
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy
●
AppLovin:
https://www.applovin.com/privacy/
●
AdSense:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
●
InMobi:
https://www.inmobi.com/privacy-policy
●
Ad4Game:
https://a4g.com/privacy
●
Meta Audience Network:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy
●
Verve:
https://pubnative.net/privacy-notice/
●
AdColony:
https://www.adcolony.com/privacy-policy/
●
Smaato, Inc:
https://www.smaato.com/privacy/
●
Unity Ads:
https://unity.com/legal/privacy-policy
●
Taboola, Inc:
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy
D. Information Byzantine Collects from Site
            Visitors
Visitors can generally
            browse our Site without submitting any information.  However, Visitors may
            choose to submit information via a “Contact Us” form, through our support email
            addresses (including
support@byzantineapps.io
and
privacy@byzantineapps.io
), or other
            voluntary means (such as submission of a request to exercise rights under
            applicable privacy laws).  We only collect the information that Visitors choose
            to provide.  Please see Section 2.E below for a description of how we use such
            information.
E. How We Use Information We
            Collect From Visitors to this Site or End Users of the Apps
We may use information
            we collect about Visitors to our Site or End Users of our Apps for our
            corporate and internal purposes, including:
To improve, maintain and operate
                 our existing Site and Apps and develop new ones.  For example, we may
                 review how you use or Site or Apps and use that information to
                 troubleshoot issues and adjust things to improve your experience.
To communicate with Visitors,
                 including to offer Visitor support for the Site. For example, we may use
                 your personal information solely for purposes of replying to your
                 questions when you use the “Contact Us” form on the Site or send us an
                 email at
support@byzantineapps.io
.
Market research.
Direct marketing in accordance with
                 applicable law.
For human resource purposes.
To detect, investigate, and prevent
                 misuse of our Site or Apps or other illegal activities and to protect the
                 rights and property of Byzantine, its customers, and others.
To respond
                 to data subject requests.
As stated previously, we only collect (1) information that
            Visitors to our Site choose to provide and (2) aggregated, deidentified or
            anonymous information related to usage of our Apps (which information does not
            identify an individual End User or Device).  We may share such information with
            other parties, as follows:
With Our Affiliates:
○
In the event we
            establish a subsidiary or otherwise become affiliated with another company, we
            may share any information that we have collected with those entities.
In Relation to Legal Proceedings or
                 Process:
○
We may share
            information we have collected when we have a legal obligation to do so. This
            may include compliance with a binding court order, exercising, establishing or
            defending Byzantine’s legal rights, or those of our customers or any other third
            party, or in good faith to comply with the requirements of any applicable law
            or legal process.
○
Similarly, we
            may disclose any information we have collected as required to respond in good
            faith to legal process, including subpoenas (whether civil or criminal), court
            orders or search warrants.
To Investigate Malfeasance and to
                 Defend Ourselves or Third Parties:
○
We may share
            information to assist us in enforcing our legal rights, our Terms of Service,
            or other policies as applicable, or to investigate any potential violation of
            the same. We may also share information to investigate any potential violations
            of the law, to defend ourselves, our customers, or any third party from any
            potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
In Relation to a Corporate
                 Transaction:
○
If a third party seeks to acquire or actually acquires our
            business or assets in whole or in part, we may disclose information we have
            collected in connection to that transaction (including, without limitation,
            during due diligence that may be undertaken in advance of possible sales).
The Third Party Data Collectors who
            collect information through our Apps may share the information as described in
            their own privacy policies.  Please see Section 2.C for instructions on how to
            access such privacy policies.
F. User Choices & Opt-Out Tools
You can manage the way
            that we and third parties use information collected from or about you as
            described below:
Browser Settings
: You may
                 adjust the privacy and security settings of your web browser to change how
                 your browser uses cookies.  At this time, our Site does not place or use
                 cookies.
Opting Out of
                 Interest Based Advertising via NAI or DAA
: You can opt out
                 tailored advertising on mobile devices by companies that participate in
                 the Network Advertising Initiative or the Digital Advertising Alliance by
                 visiting the
NAI’s opt-out page
or the
DAA’s Consumer Choice Page
. Residents of the
                 EEA, UK and Switzerland may refer to
www.youronlinechoices.com
. The
                 opt-out tools provided on these industry pages are generally based on
                 cookie technologies.  As such, if you delete your cookies (or change or
                 update your web browser), you will need to repeat the opt out process.
                 While our Site does not currently use cookie technology, we are providing
                 this information because we may partner with businesses to tailor ads for
                 our Site or Apps that do. Further, the Third Party Data Collectors may use
                 information they have collected from our Apps to match identifiers across
                 devices – such as to tie a mobile Advertising ID by common IP address to a
                 browser-based cookie ID.
Device Settings
: You can
                 limit the collection of your Advertising ID from your Device through
                 certain device settings, as described below.
For iOS devices
:
●
Go to
Settings
            > Privacy > Advertising
●
Turn on
Limit
            Ad Tracking
For Android
            devices
:
●
Go to
Settings
            > Google Settings > Ads
●
Depending on
            your Device, either turn off
Ad Personalization
or turn on
Opt Out of
            Interest-Based Ads
Third Party
                 Opt-Out
: You may limit the ways the authorized Third Party Data
                 Collectors use certain information they have collected by submitting an
                 opt-out request through their respective opt out form that is typically
                 accessible in the third party’s privacy policy.  Please see Section 2.C
                 for instructions on how to access such privacy policies.
Our
                 Marketing Emails
: If you receive marketing or promotional
                 emails from us, you may opt out of receiving those messages by following
                 the “unsubscribe” instructions contained in them, or by emailing us with
                 your request at
privacy@byzantineapps.io
. If you
                 opt out of our marketing and promotional messages, you may still receive
                 transaction- or service-related emails about your business relationship
                 with us.
3. Security
We use commercially
            reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to protect our
            physical infrastructure as well as in our computer systems, databases, and
            communications networks. These measures are intended to protect our systems
            (and the information contained therein) from loss, misappropriation, misuse,
            alteration or disclosure.  No method of electronic transmission or storage is
            perfectly secure, however, so we cannot guarantee the security of information
            we collect with absolute certainty.
4. Cross-Border Data Transfers
Information we and our
            authorized third parties collect may be stored and processed by us in the
            European Union, the United Kingdom, and the United States. When you use the
            Site or our Apps, the information we collect may be stored in or (if
            applicable) transmitted to the United States. Privacy laws in the United States
            and laws in certain other countries regarding the processing of personal
            information may not be as robust as those in your country.
5. General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
GDPR is a data
            protection law that applies to individuals located within the European Economic
            Area and Switzerland (under the EU GDPR) and in the United Kingdom (under the
            UK GDPR).  Pursuant to the GDPR, we are required to provide certain information
            about the processing of “Personal Data” of users in European Economic Area, the
            United Kingdom, and Switzerland who choose to provide such information when
            visiting our Site.  “Personal Data” generally refers to data that identifies or
            is capable of identifying a particular person directly or indirectly though
            their Device.  Names, addresses, cookie IDs, Advertising IDs, Installation IDs, and precise
            location information are common examples of “Personal Data.”
If you have any
            questions about Byzantine’s data practices in the context of the GDPR, you may
            contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing your questions to
privacy@byzantineapps.io
.
The representations and
            information we provide below, which are applicable only to individuals located
            in the EEA, the UK and Switzerland, are provided for purposes of compliance
            with the GDPR. Please do not rely on the information below if you are not
            located in one of those regions.  All capitalized terms used in this Section
            but not defined elsewhere in this Privacy Notice have the means set forth in
            the EU GDPR or UK GDPR, as applicable.
Legal grounds for
                 processing your Personal Data
: Under the GDPR, we must disclose
                 the legal bases we rely on to process Personal Data that you choose to
                 provide when visiting our Site. Byzantine’s legal bases for processing
                 Personal Data for the purposes we describe in Section 2.E, above, include:
○
Consent
. We rely on your consent to provide our Services that use precise location information 
                related to other Personal Data.  We also rely on your consent to store and access information on your 
                Device (e.g., Advertising IDs and Installation IDs). Our reliance on consent is in turn often in reliance 
                on compliance steps required of and taken by our data suppliers and by Clients that use the Services. 
                These steps are intended to confirm that your consent is collected in compliance with the GDPR and passed on 
                to Clients and business partners such that we only facilitate the collection of data in compliance with the law. 
                We may rely on your consent to process Personal Data in other circumstances as well. When we do so, we will follow 
                applicable laws pertaining to providing and withdrawing consent. We also attempt to obtain consent for certain of 
                our clients to process Personal Data. These Clients, in turn, may be independent data controllers as to data in 
                their own possession and control.
○
Legitimate
            interest
. We may rely on legitimate interest as a legal basis for
            processing Personal Data in some cases. We may do so when we use Personal Data
            for purposes of maintaining the security of our services (including to detect
            and prevent fraud or to facilitate the detection and correction of bugs or
            other errors) or use Personal Data provided by Site Visitors to respond to
            their inquiries. We also rely on legitimate interest when we analyze user
            activity on our Site or Apps.
○
Contractual
            Agreements
. In some cases our basis for processing Personal Data is that
            the processing is necessary pursuant to a contractual relationship we have
            entered into.
○
Legal
            Obligations
. We may process Personal Data when it is necessary for us to
            comply with our legal or regulatory obligations.
Transfers of
                 Personal Data
: When we collect Personal Data in the EEA, UK, or
                 Switzerland, and then transfer it outside of those jurisdictions, we take
                 measures to ensure that such Personal Data is protected by appropriate
                 safeguards.  In general, our transfers of Personal Data rely on Standard
                 Contractual Clauses and Data Processing Agreements to safeguard that data
                 where the GDPR or other European data protection laws require it. You may
                 use the contact information below to request more information regarding
                 how we safeguard your Personal Data and respect your privacy rights.
○
How We Retain
            Personal Data
: We generally retain Personal Data we collect for as long as is
            necessary for compliance with our legal obligations, dispute resolution, and to
            enforce our contracts. We may also retain information insofar as we have a
            legal or operational need to do so, for example, for purposes of auditing,
            corporate record-keeping, legal compliance, accounting, security and
            bug-prevention purposes.
Rights of Data
                 Subjects
: Data Subjects have certain rights in connection with the
                 Personal Data that data controllers process about them pursuant to the
                 GDPR. These include the right to access Personal Data, the right to
                 request correction of inaccurate Personal Data, the right to request the
                 restriction of processing of Personal Data, the right to request deletion
                 of Personal Data, and the right to object to processing of Personal Data.
                 We describe these rights more fully below.
○
Right to Access
: You may
            contact us at
privacy@byzantineapps.io
in order to exercise
            your right to access Personal Data we process as a data controller. We will
            respond to your request by explaining the steps you must follow to access your
            Personal Data after we receive your request. Because we are required to verify
            the identity of the individual making a request before we provide access to
            Personal Data, we will evaluate requests to exercise certain rights to access
            Personal Data on a case-by-case basis. In conducting this evaluation, we may
            consider both (1) the effort involved in verifying whether Personal Data that
            we process actually pertains to the data subject making the request – and only
            to that data subject; and (2) any potentially negative consequences that may
            result from erroneously releasing Personal Data to an individual other than the
            data subject. We may also limit the amount or kind of Personal Data we will
            release in circumstances where we believe it is likely that the improper
            release of Personal Data would adversely affect the privacy rights and freedoms
            of the data subject. We will only honor requests for access to Personal Data
            for which we act as a data controller, as explained more fully in sub-section
            (d) below. Where we act as a processor for Personal Data on behalf of another
            entity (for example, our customers), you may contact that company instead of
            Byzantine to make a data access request.
○
Right to
            Correct
: You may exercise your right to correct Personal Data by
            contacting us using the contact information provided below.
○
Right to
            Withdraw your Consent or Object to our Personal Data Processing
:  You may use
            the opt-out methods described in
Section
            6
of this Privacy Notice to withdraw your consent for our
            processing of your Personal Data (when we are relying on your consent). If you
            withdraw your consent, we will stop processing your Personal Data within 30
            days or fewer.
○
Right to
            Request Deletion
: You have the right to request that we delete Personal
            Data concerning you that we process as a controller. If you use the opt-out
            process described above, we will also delete your Personal Data. You may also
            contact us at
privacy@byzantineapps.io
to request that we
            delete your Personal Data.  We will provide further instructions on how you can
            exercise your right to deletion after we receive your email request. In certain
            circumstances we may keep copies of Personal Data in back-up files (or
            otherwise in inactive form), for certain of our internal purposes that are
            important to our business, including legal, auditing, accounting and billing,
            bug-detection and correction. We may keep such backups for as long as is
            necessary to fulfill those purposes.
○
Right to Make
            Complaints
: You have the right to lodge a complaint regarding our
            processing of Personal Data with a relevant data protection authority. If you
            have a complaint, please contact us first to allow us to assist you in
            resolving it.
Byzantine may
                 act as a data “controller” as defined in the GDPR in connection with the
                 Personal Data we process when you provide it on this Site. We may also be
                 deemed to act as an independent controller that enables certain Third
                 Party Data Collectors who are controllers to directly collect Personal
                 Data through their SDKs integrated with our Apps.  While we may be deemed
                 to act as an independent controller, only such Third Party Data Collectors
                 directly collect, have access to, and process your information. 
                 Therefore, if you submit any requests or inquiries to us regarding
                 information collected by one of these authorized third parties, we will
                 forward such submittal to the appropriate Third Party Data Collector for
                 fulfillment.
6. Children’s Data
We do not intend for
            our Site or Apps to be used in connection with minors under the age of 16, and
            we do not intentionally collect data from them. If you believe that we may have
            inadvertently collected of any such data, please use the contact information
            provided in
Section
            9
below to let us know.
7. Additional Information for Residents of California,
             Colorado, Connecticut, Utah or Virginia
California residents have certain privacy rights pursuant 
            to the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018  as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (“CCPA”), 
            and Virginia residents have similar privacy rights under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act of 2019 (“VCDPA”), 
            with respect to their personal information or personal data about them, Residents of Colorado, Connecticut or Utah 
            will have similar rights on various effective dates during 2023 under either the Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA” effective July 1, 2023), 
            the Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring (“CTDPA” effective July 1, 2023), or the Utah Consumer 
            Privacy Act (“UCPA” effective December 31, 2023)
Under the CCPA “Personal information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, 
                or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. Similarly, under the VCDPA, 
                “Personal Data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural person. 
                When we use the term “personal information” in the following sections, we mean either your Personal Information under the CCPA 
                if you are a California resident or your Personal Data under the VCDPA if you are a Virginia resident, or the similar definitions 
                of Personal Data or Personal Information that apply if you are a resident of Colorado, Connecticut, or Virginia.
If you are a resident of any of these states, this section of the Privacy Notice applies to you insofar as we have collected 
                personal information about you , or have sold such information. However, if you are not a resident of such a state, you should 
                not rely on the information we provide in this section as it does not apply to you. The information we provide here supplements 
                the information we provide in the other sections of this Privacy Notice.
As required by
            the CCPA and VCDPA, and other applicable state laws when they become effective, we describe the personal information we collect about
            residents of those states, and the purposes for which we may use it, in the following sections:
A. Categories
            of Personal Information We Collect; How We Use It; and How We Share with Third
            Parties
We may collect the
            categories of personal information about you described below. The table also
            describes the categories of third parties with whom we may share the categories
            of Personal Information specified. You may exercise your Right to Access in
            connection with any of the Personal Information Categories in the table below.
Personal Information Category
Information Sources
Categories of Third Parties with
              whom this Personal Information is Shared
Identifiers (including name,
              email address, Advertising ID, and other information you choose to submit,
              whether in connection with visiting our Site or submitting a request to
              exercise your rights under the CCPA)
Visitors to our Site;
              individuals that submit a request to exercise rights under the CCPA
Our affiliates
Internet or Other Electronic
              Network Activity Information (e.g., information regarding a consumer or
              device’s interaction with a website or application)
Visitors to our Site
Our affiliates
B. Business
            Purposes for Collecting and Sharing Personal Information
Our purposes for
            collecting and sharing Personal Information are described below (with
            examples).  These details are also described in our Privacy Notice:
●
To Operate Our
            Site and Apps
. We use personal information to:
a.
Enhance, test,
            update, and verify our own data and data-related services;
b.
Develop new
            products or services; or
c.
Operate,
            analyze, enhance, and secure our services.
●
Other Internal
            Business Purposes
.
a.
Internal
            Research/Compliance:
We use personal information for internal
            research or operations, auditing, detecting and responding to security
            incidents, debugging, short-term and transient use, quality control, and legal
            compliance. Information we collect from our Site and Apps may be used for this
            purpose, among others.
b.
Sharing for
            Purposes of Legal Compliance:
We may share personal information with third
            parties for purposes of: (1) compliance with official legal process or a
            regulatory investigation (for example, a valid subpoena or court order); (2)
            enforcing our Terms of Service, this Privacy Notice, or other agreements,
            including investigation of suspected violations of the same; (3) responding to
            claims that certain content violates the rights of third parties; or (4)
            protecting the rights, property or personal safety of us (or our platform), our
            Clients, our affiliates, our agents, our platform users, or the general public.
            Similarly, we may share personal information with other entities to detect or
            prevent fraud, to prevent spam or malware, or other similar purposes.
c.
Sharing In
            Connection With a Corporate Transaction:
In the event of a major
            corporate transaction (such as a merger, investment, acquisition,
            reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all
            of our assets), we may share personal information in connection with that
            transaction, including for purposes of associated due diligence.
d.
Sharing With
            Our Service Providers:
We may share any personal information we
            collect with our service providers.  Our service providers may include, for
            example, providers of: technology; support for our Clients; business
            operations; web or database hosting; billing; accounting; physical or
            information security; marketing and advertising; data management, validation,
            enhancement or hygiene; or providers that otherwise assist us with providing,
            developing, maintaining, or improving our Services.
e.
Aggregate Information:
We may use personal information to
            create aggregate information, or may de-identify any personal information we
            collect to make it such that it cannot be linked to you or your device
            (“Aggregate or De-Identified Information”). We may use Aggregate or De-Identified
            Information for any purpose, including, but not limited to, for research and
            marketing purposes. We may also share Aggregate or De-Identified Information
            with third parties, who may include advertisers or marketers, promotional
            partners, our sponsors, or otherwise at our discretion.
C. Rights and Choices of Certain US States Residents
If you are a resident of certain states you have the right under applicable data privacy laws 
            to request (1) that we disclose what personal information we collect from you; 
            (2) to delete such information; and (3) to opt out of our sale of their personal information. 
            The states that provide these rights to their residents are California (under the CCPA), Colorado (under the CPA effective 7/1/2023), 
            Connecticut (under the CTDPA effective 7/1/2023), Utah (under the UCPA effective 12/31/2023), and Virginia (under the VCDPA). These 
            rights are subject to certain limitations, although you will not be discriminated against for exercising any of these rights. 
            In certain circumstances, we may charge a reasonable fee to process your request to the extent permitted by law.
Right to Opt-out of the Sale of
                    Your Personal Information:
○
California or Virginia
                residents may opt out of the “sale” of their personal information. 
                Colorado, Connecticut or Utah residents may opt out as well when their laws become effective. 
                “Sale” is defined broadly by the CCPA, the CPA, and the CTDPA to include making personal information 
                available in exchange for any “monetary or other valuable consideration.” “Sale” is defined under the UCPA 
                and the VCDPA to mean the disclosure of personal data for “monetary consideration”.
We do not “sell” personal information.
However, certain of
                our authorized third parties that directly collect End User information may
                sell information.  You can exercise your right to opt out of such sale by
                visiting the applicable third party’s privacy policy.  Please see Section 2.C
                above for information on how to access each third party’s privacy policy.
Right to Request Deletion of Your
                    Personal Information:
○
If we have
                collected personal information from you, you may request that we delete such
                personal information.  A request to delete is distinct from a request to “opt
                out” of our sale of your personal information.  You may contact us via email at
privacy@byzantineapps.io
or call us toll-free
                at
+1-855-721-3550
to exercise this right.
○
If you choose
                to exercise your right to deletion, there are certain circumstances under which
                we many nevertheless retain personal information as permitted by law, such as:
a.
To defend
                against fraudulent activity directed towards our business, systems, or users.
b.
To detect and
                fix technical issues that affect existing system functions (e.g., for
                de-bugging).
c.
As necessary
                for the protection of the free speech or other rights of us (or others).
d.
To assist with
                law enforcement requests made pursuant to lawful process.
e.
For certain
                scientific or historical research purposes.
f.
For our own
                internal purposes, provided they are reasonably related to your relationship
                with us.
g.
To comply with
                our legal obligations.
○
Please note
                that we require certain information in order to provide our Site and Apps to
                you. If you ask us to delete that information, it may prevent you from being
                able to access or use our Site or Apps.
Right to Request Access to Your
                    Personal Information:
○
California (under the CCPA) and Virginia (under the VCDPA) give their residents 
                the right to request that we disclose both the categories and specific pieces of personal information 
                that we collect, use, or sell. Colorado, Connecticut, and Utah will give their residents these rights 
                also as those states’ data privacy laws become effective (the CPA and CTDPA on 7/1/2023 and the UCPA on 12/31/2023).  
                We will comply with such requests if we can verify them to a legally sufficient degree. You may make such an access 
                request by emailing us at
privacy@byzantineapps.io
with the
                subject line “CCPA Access Request” or by calling us toll-free at
+1-855-721-3550
.
○
We may be able to adequately verify access requests for certain information we have collected.  However, and in line with certain guidance provided by the California Attorney General, we do not provide location data in response to access requests due to the fact that we are not able to verify to a reasonably high degree of certainty that the location data we have collected pertains to the individual making such a request, or whether either an individual with custody of a device — or the person making the request — is the rightful owner of the device to which the information we hold pertains. For example, it is not uncommon for a person to be in possession of another person’s phone temporarily (for example, a partner, friend or work colleague’s mobile phone or tablet), whether or not such temporary possession is authorized. We take this approach in order to avoid a scenario where such a person in temporary possession of a phone might obtain potentially detailed and sensitive information pertaining to the phone’s owner through a request for access. We also believe California law compels us to avoid a scenario like this.  In addition, a recent study found that roughly 50% of mobile phones were not password protected at all, making the possibility of such “spoofing” a tangible risk.  Further, we do not have other, more conventional means to confirm the identity of a device’s true owner because for consumer privacy reasons we do not collect information such as name, address or email address that could be used to do so.
○
If you do not wish location data associated with your device to be used in the ways we describe above, we suggest that you make a request to opt out of sales of your information as detailed above. You can find complete information about how to exercise your right to opt out by visiting this link: Your Privacy Choices and Opt-Out Rights.
Our Collection of Sensitive Personal Information, and Your Rights to Limit Its Use:
○
Certain Personal Information that we collect and sell, such as precise geolocation of a person, household, or device, is considered “Sensitive Personal Information” under the data privacy laws of California (CCPA), Connecticut (CTDPA), and Virginia (VCDPA). We obtain the right to use and share this information, through the consent methods described in our Privacy Policy.  California residents have the right to require a business to limit the use of their Sensitive Personal Information to only certain internal business purposes specified in the CCPA.
○
To limit the use of your Sensitive Personal Information, you may use either of the methods below:
●
By visiting this link:
Your Privacy Choices and Opt-Out Rights.
●
By emailing your request to
privacy@byzantineapps.io
using a subject line that reads “California Limit SPI Use.”
How to Exercise Your Rights and
                    Submit a Verifiable Consumer Request:
○
To exercise
                your CCPA, CPA, CTDPA, UCPA, or VCDPA rights or learn more about how to do so, those residents may
                contact us using any of the following means:
a.
Sending an
                email to
privacy@byzantineapps.io
.
b.
With respect to
                access or deletion requests, by calling us toll-free at:
+1-855-721-3550
.
○
In certain
                circumstances, we may not disclose some personal information to you in response
                to an access request where doing so presents too great a risk to you or our
                business.  We may also withhold such information where we cannot verify your
                identity in connection to such personal information.
○
In the event we are not able to comply with your requests fully for any of the reasons described above, 
                we will still explain the reasons why we could not fulfill your request.  Certain consumers have the right 
                to appeal our decision not to fulfill a request, and may do so by emailing our Chief Privacy Officer at
appeals@byzantineapps.io
with the subject line “Privacy Choices Appeal.”
Right to Non-Discrimination:
○
If you elect to
                exercise your CCPA, CPA, CTDPA, UCPA, or VCDPA rights, we will not deny, charge different prices for, or
                provide a different level of quality of goods or services for that reason.
Information Regarding Individuals
                    Younger than 16 Years Old:
○
We do not
                knowingly collect personal information pertaining to minors younger than 16
                years old who reside in California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, or Virginia. In the event we learn that we have
                collected personal information regarding such California residents, we will
                take reasonable steps to remove such information from our database (or we will
                obtain any legally required consents).
Authorized Agents:
○
You may exercise your rights under CCPA, CPA, CTDPA, UCPA, or VCDPA, as described above by
                designating an agent to make requests on your behalf. If you choose to
                designate an agent, we will take steps to verify both (1) your identity; and
                (2) that your designated agent has been authorized to make a request on your
                behalf by providing us with a written authorization signed by you or a copy of
                a valid power of attorney.
8. In-App Purchases and Subscriptions
Back Seat Navigator and What The Forecast?!! 
            include In-App Purchases and auto-renewable Subscriptions. Payment will be charged to your iTunes account once you confirm 
            the purchase or subscription. The Purchase option allows you to own the app outright. Once purchased, no other purchase or 
            subscription is necessary and the purchase never expires. The Subscription options automatically renew unless auto-renew is 
            turned off at least 24-hours before the end of the current subscription period. Your account will be charged for renewal within 
            24-hours prior to the end of the current subscription period. You can manage your subscriptions and turn off auto-renewal by going
            to your Account Settings on the App Store after subscription.
9. Changes to This Privacy Notice
In the event we make
            material changes to this Privacy Notice that may affect you, we will post
            prominent notice of any such changes on our Site and/or Apps for not less than
            30 days prior to the effective date of the changes. We suggest that you check
            this Privacy Notice frequently in order to stay informed of any such changes.
10. Contact Information
To ask questions about
            the information in this Privacy Notice or for more information about how we use
            information we collect, or to exercise any of the rights outlined in
Section 5
, you may contact us
            at:
privacy@byzantineapps.io
OR
Byzantine Apps, LLC
6050 Peachtree Pkwy
Ste 240-379
Norcross, GA 30092
OR
For EEA Residents:
Please contact our EU Representative at
eurep@byzantineapps.io.
Alternatively, they can be reached by post (The DPO
            Centre, Alexandra House, 3 Ballsbridge Park, Dublin, D04C 7H2) or +353 1 631
            9460.
https://www.dpocentre.com/contact-us/
For UK Residents:
Please contact our UK Representative at
ukrep@byzantineapps.io.
Alternatively, they can be reached by post (The DPO
            Centre Ltd, 50 Liverpool street, London, EC2M 7PY) or +44 (0) 203 797 6340.
https://www.dpocentre.com/contact-us/
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://outlogic.io/privacy/:
Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies
We use cookies to personalise content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyse our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Cookiebot
1
Learn more about this provider
1.gif
Used to count the number of sessions to the website, necessary for optimizing CMP product delivery.
Google
7
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
_GRECAPTCHA
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
_grecaptcha
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
rc::a
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
rc::b
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots.
rc::c
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots.
rc::f
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots.
LinkedIn
2
Learn more about this provider
bcookie
Used in order to detect spam and improve the website's security.
li_gc
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Pardot
3
Learn more about this provider
visitor_id#-hash [x3]
Used to encrypt and contain visitor data. This is necessary for the security of the user data.
go.outlogic.io
consent.cookiebot.com
2
CookieConsent [x2]
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
lidc
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Hotjar
4
Learn more about this provider
hjActiveViewportIds
This cookie contains an ID string on the current session. This contains non-personal information on what subpages the visitor enters – this information is used to optimize the visitor's experience.
hjViewportId
Saves the user's screen size in order to adjust the size of images on the website.
_hjSession_#
Collects statistics on the visitor's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
_hjSessionUser_#
Collects statistics on the visitor's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
3
Learn more about this provider
lastExternalReferrer
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
lastExternalReferrerTime
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
_fbp
Used by Facebook to deliver a series of advertisement products such as real time bidding from third party advertisers.
Appnexus
1
Learn more about this provider
receive-cookie-deprecation
Collects information on user behaviour on multiple websites. This information is used in order to optimize the relevance of advertisement on the website.
Google
4
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
pagead/1p-user-list/#
Tracks if the user has shown interest in specific products or events across multiple websites and detects how the user navigates between sites. This is used for measurement of advertisement efforts and facilitates payment of referral-fees between websites.
_ga
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_ga_#
Used to send data to Google Analytics about the visitor's device and behavior. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
_gcl_au
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement efficiency across websites using their services.
Pardot
4
Learn more about this provider
visitor_id# [x3]
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
lpv#
Used in context with behavioral tracking by the website. The cookie registers the user’s behavior and navigation across multiple websites and ensures that no tracking errors occur when the user has multiple browser-tabs open.
Reddit
2
Learn more about this provider
rp.gif
Necessary for the implementation of the Reddit.com's share-button function.
_rdt_uuid
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
b.6sc.co
1
v1/beacon/img.gif
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
go.outlogic.io
pardot.com
2
pardot [x2]
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
j.6sc.co
4
_6senseCompanyDetails
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_an_uid
Presents the user with relevant content and advertisement. The service is provided by third-party advertisement hubs, which facilitate real-time bidding for advertisers.
_gd_session
Collects visitor data related to the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been loaded, with the purpose of displaying targeted ads.
_gd_visitor
Collects visitor data related to the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been loaded, with the purpose of displaying targeted ads.
sc.lfeeder.com
4
_lfa
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_lfa_test_cookie_stored
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_lfa
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_lfa_expiry
Contains the expiry-date for the cookie with corresponding name.
tr-rc.lfeeder.com
1
(unnamed)
Tracks the individual sessions on the website, allowing the website to compile statistical data from multiple visits. This data can also be used to create leads for marketing purposes.
Unclassified
2
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
Amazon
1
Learn more about this provider
flaretrk
Pending
j.6sc.co
1
_6signalTTL
Pending
Cross-domain consent
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS_COUNT#]
[#BULK_CONSENT_TITLE#]
List of domains your consent applies to:
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS#]
Cookie declaration last updated on 3/3/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site. For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
You can at any time change or withdraw your consent from the Cookie Declaration on our website.
Learn more about who we are, how you can contact us and how we process personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please state your consent ID and date when you contact us regarding your consent.
Do not sell or share my personal information
Deny
Allow selection
Customize
Allow all
Home
Observation Panel
Contact Us
Contact Us
OUTLOGIC PRIVACY NOTICE
*Please click
HERE
to opt-out of selling your data.
OUTLOGIC LLC a Virginia company (“OUTLOGIC” “we,” “us,” and “our”), provides data services to other companies and organizations, as further described in this privacy notice (“Privacy Notice.”).
This Privacy Notice explains how we collects, uses, stores, and shares personal information about individuals in two different contexts (we refer to such individuals as “you,” “your,” and “yourself”): (1) visitors to our website located at
www.outlogic.io
or (2) when we collect personal information from third parties such as mobile applications (“Apps”). This Privacy Notice also explains certain choices you may have regarding how we use this information about you, as well as rights you may have to access or correct the information we hold and use.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (EEA) and would like to review your rights under the GDPR, please go to
Section 8
of this Privacy Notice. If you are a resident of California or Virginia or certain other states that have enacted privacy-specific consumer laws, you may review your data privacy rights under those types of state laws at
Section 10
of this Privacy Notice.
Please note that we do not use any precise location data to create or build consumer profiles or targeted audiences in connection with sensitive health based locations, nor do we permit our customers to do so. In addition, to further comply with specific state laws, we use commercially available information to assist in filtering out precise location data for sensitive health based locations in those states.
Below, we explain certain terms that we will use in this Notice that may make it easier to understand:
Advertising ID
: A unique alphanumeric string randomly assigned by operating system manufacturers to a Device. Examples of this include iOS IDFAs and Android Advertising IDs.
Data Aggregators
: Third party data companies that provide data to Outlogic, including personal data and information.
Devices
: Internet-connected mobile devices such as Apple iPhones that use iOS or Samsung Galaxy devices that use Google’s Android OS.
IP Address
: a numeric address in a format that follows the Internet Protocol data rules and that is used to identify a computer, mobile phone, or other device connected to the internet.
Personal Information
: This Policy refers to “Personal Information” and “Personal Data” interchangeably, to mean the types of information/data that applicable laws that use those terms refer to. It includes, for instance, device identifiers, precise location data, name/address, email address, and other unique identifiers that can be associated with them.
Publishers:
Providers of Apps used by Users on Devices.
SDK, or Software Development Kit
: An SDK is a block of computer code that Publishers can integrate with their Apps to collect data, often useful (as in OUTLOGIC’s case) to the mobile advertising and data industries.
Services
: OUTLOGIC’s Services refer to the products and insights we create/provide using location data,
and using and providing IP Addresses
and/or Advertising IDs assigned by Device manufacturers, to companies for marketing and research purposes, for example, to enable their research and personalized advertising. The Services also refer to products and insights we provide using location data and/or Installation IDs assigned to Devices by certain Apps, to companies for research purposes, excluding marketing and personalized advertising. The Services also include the SDK and other similar technologies we may use to collect information.
Site
: Our website that you may visit at
http://www.outlogic.io/
.
Visitors
: Individuals who
visit our website or
choose to provide information directly to us via the OUTLOGIC website “Contact Us” form.
Server to Server App / Server to Server Partner
: OUTLOGIC sometimes partners with certain Publishers or other Data Aggregators, who (in each case) do not use the SDK in favor of sending us information they collect from their Apps using their own SDKs. In other cases, we may obtain the same kinds of information using server-to-server transfers instead of collecting information through SDKs.
System Location Services
: Device technologies that allow Apps to access information about your location (such as GPS coordinates).
Installation ID
: A unique alphanumeric string randomly assigned by certain Apps to a Device but which is not used for advertising purposes.
App Tracking Transparency/Opt-Out of Interest Based Ads
: Features on iOS or Android Devices that allow Users to disable, or limit Apps’ ability to access, the Device Advertising ID. On iOS phones, users who do not give Apps permission to track zeroes out the Advertising ID. On Android phones running Android 12 or newer, users whom Opt-Out of Interest Based Ads zeroes out the Advertising ID.
A. Summary: Who is OUTLOGIC?
OUTLOGIC is a platform for collecting, aggregating, licensing and managing data. In particular, we focus on the curation and use of high-quality location data to help provide insights to organizations of various kinds regarding patterns of peoples’ movements. Our platform assists a variety of businesses and organizations in understanding movement patterns and trends for purposes including marketing and advertising, financial research, market research, traffic and urban planning, smart cities, or educational purposes. Certain government entities or public health organizations may also use our platform, including for purposes of public health research and planning, information security, physical security, to prevent crime, or for civic and traffic planning. (Our specific data licensing practices may vary depending on geographic region).
2. What Types of Information Do We Collect?
A. Information We Collect Through Our Services
We collect information using our SDK. This information may include Advertising IDs, Installation IDs, location information (described more fully below), and other information pertaining to the way Devices and their users engage with mobile advertising services. We also collect the same types of information using Server to Server transfers. We also collect information (including location information) from Publishers to assist them in meeting revenue goals for their Apps, allowing them to provide media, games, and other mobile apps, such as weather or traffic apps, without charging their users. We also may collect and use information from Apps owned by OUTLOGIC affiliated companies.
Publishers can use our SDK with their Apps in order to enhance advertisers’ ability to show ads in Publisher Apps (including to target more relevant ads and to measure ad performance). App Publishers may also work with us to monetize their App content in other ways we describe in this Privacy Policy. (If you would like to opt-out of our use of the Advertising ID on your Device for these purposes, please take the steps explained in
Section 6
below, entitled “User Choices and Opt-Out Tools”).
When you use an App or OUTLOGIC App on your Device that has integrated with our Services (including the SDK), we can collect certain information through or about your Device, if you have granted access to (and you have not later opted-out of our use of) location services and an Advertising ID or Installation ID. In particular (but not exclusively):
Precise Location Information
:
Specific geolocation of the Device, usually described by latitude-longitude coordinates compiled through GPS features of our SDK, WiFi connection information, cell tower triangulation and other methods.
Dwell time within or in proximity to points of interest (i.e. the length of time your device stayed at one place).
Relative Location Information
:
Bluetooth Low-Energy (BLE) sensors, or beacons,
Information obtained from the Internet of Things (IoT) devices.
Near-field Communication (NFC)
Our SDK is capable of receiving signals from each of the above technologies that indicate the proximity of a Device. For example, certain brick-and-mortar stores use beacons that sense when a Bluetooth-enabled Device is in proximity to the beacon (i.e., when a Device user enters the store). Retail locations, sports arenas, restaurants, museums and other similar businesses may also use beacons.
Advertising IDs or Installation IDs
Timestamps
(that may include time and date)
Device Event Information
:
App or system crashes
System crashes
Device settings
Device Usage Information
Type of device (e.g., Samsung Galaxy S21)
Operating system (OS) information (e.g., iOS 14.5)
System settings (e.g., enabled/disabled status for Location Services)
Time zone
Mobile carrier
IP address
Names and/or identifiers for Apps on your Device integrated with SDK
Network Information
VPN status
Network protocols employed
Device connectivity information (e.g., how a device connects to a network) and signal strength
Network information such as mobile network code and mobile country code
B. Site Visitors
OUTLOGIC, along with our service providers and other vendors, collect information from visitors (“Visitors”) to our Site, including information Visitors choose to provide to us on contact forms or through our support email addresses as well as information collected through passive, automated means such as cookies and web pixels, as follows:
Information Visitors Choose to Share:
We may collect your full name, physical address, telephone number, and email address if you provide it to us. For example, you may choose to give us this information to register for an event, to learn more about our Services, or to set up an account with our platform. Our platform users may give us additional information, such as employer or payment information. You may learn more about our use of this type of information by emailing
privacy@outlogic.io
.
Information about Browsers or Devices:
We may collect information about your computer (e.g. desktop or laptop), Device, tablet, or other internet-connected devices used to access the Site. This information may include technical details about your computer or Device (such as the Device type, operating system, system settings and configurations, IP address, Advertising ID or other unique Device-based IDs, and mobile network carrier information) and information about how you use the Site (including details about the parts of the Site you access, traffic to and from other websites, timestamps, web log data, and other event information, including crashes and system activity). You may exercise control over this type of data collection by adjusting the settings on your device or browser (e.g., by disallowing cookies and using other similar settings).
Cookies:
We, along with our service providers and other vendors, may place cookies on our Visitors’ web browsers. You may view our full cookie policy
here
. We may use cookies for retargeting and other types of interest-based advertising, which you may limit by exercising the opt-out choices described in
Section 6
.
Web Beacons:
Web beacons or “pixels” are small, invisible webpage or email elements that may be used on the Site or in emails we send to you. We use them to deliver cookies, to count Site visits, to understand Site usage, to study the effectiveness of our advertising or marketing offers, and to learn whether you open an email or act upon it. You may limit this type of re-targeting and other types of interest-based advertising by exercising the opt-out choices explained in
Section 6
.
3. How We Use The Information We Collect Through Our Services
When we collect information through the Services, OUTLOGIC
or its customers who receive the data
may use it for any of the following purposes:
To Make Inferences based on collected data, including movement patterns and research
:
Movement Patterns
: To make inferences regarding the location and movement patterns of individuals or devices. For example, we might record location data from Devices at certain points of interest over time, like shows, sporting events, restaurants, etc., and we may include this information in the Services.
Data Products
: To use these location-based observations with other data products. For example, we may add other information to the location data we collect such as the name of a venue, time spent at a point of interest, or other information to a set of Advertising IDs or Installation IDs to enhance user profiles or to enable decision-making based on that information, such as executing a stock trade.
Advertising and Research
: For advertising and research purposes, such as use by advertising technology platforms who use the information to provide similar capabilities. The information helps these platforms to make predictions and generate insights about trends in consumer or market behavior, or to conduct scientific research in connection with human movement patterns.
Smart Cities and Security
: Real estate developers, urban planners, government entities, or security or smart city businesses may use and augment the information to tailor it to their needs. We also license the information to assist businesses and governments with planning, physical security, information security, and preventing crime.
Interest-Based Audiences and Targeting Ads
:
Interest-Based-Audiences
: We use the information we collect to organize Device users into audience segments based on their inferred interests (for example, that a Device user is interested in attending sporting events, or certain kinds of retail stores). This enables our Clients to deliver advertising to those users when they are recognized on their own platforms.
Targeting Ads
: By using audience segments, advertisers increase their chances of sending an ad that is more likely to be relevant.
Ad Measurement
:
Ad Measurement Analysis
: We use information we collect (such as location information and Advertising IDs) to assist advertisers with analyzing ad campaign performance – for example, by measuring how (or whether) Devices that were served with a particular ad engaged with the advertiser’s products or services. This is sometimes called ad measurement or attribution analysis.
An example of ad measurement analysis would be if certain Devices were served with an advertisement for “OUTLOGIC Sandwich Shop” on Wednesday, and location data then showed traffic at OUTLOGIC Sandwich Shop on Thursday or Friday was higher than average, OUTLOGIC Sandwich Shop might conclude that its ad campaign performed well.
Publisher Analysis
:
Analysis and Compliance
: We assist our Publisher partners with analyzing how Users engage with the Publishers’ Apps, and in activating that information for advertising, to generate revenue, and to enhance App functionality.
We may also use this information to provide Publishers with options for complying with certain laws, regulations, and other rules where applicable.
To learn more about how we collect, use and share information pertaining to our Site visitors, please refer to
Section 5
.
4. How Do We Use Information We Collect From Visitors?
We may use information we collect about Visitors for our corporate and internal purposes, including:
Analyzing what products and services Visitors may be interested in, the popularity of different pages of our Site, as well as how Visitors interact with our Site in other ways. If you give your personal contact information to us (e.g., your email address), we may combine that information with other information described in
Section 2
to understand how to better serve you.
To communicate with Visitors, including to offer customer or Visitor support for the Site or the Services. For example, we may use your personal information solely for purposes of replying to your questions when you use the “Contact Us” form on the Site.
Market research.
Direct and online targeted marketing in accordance with applicable law. For instance, we may “retarget” ads about our services to those who have visited our website.
To improve, maintain, operate, and personalize the Site.
For human resource purposes.
For any other legitimate purpose upon proper notice and/or consent.
5. With Whom Do We Share Information We Collect?
We share the information we collect for purposes of operating our platform (for example, with our service providers) and for purposes of supporting the business of our customers. We may share information we collect from your Device as follows:
With Our Customers
:
We share Advertising IDs, Installation IDs, Location Information, App Usage Data, and audience segments generated from those data points, with our customers (“Clients”).
Our Clients may include brand advertisers, data and technology platforms, advertising technology companies, and other organizations that study consumer behavior, provide tailored advertising, or study human movement patterns.
Like OUTLOGIC, some of these Clients may be members of the Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”). To learn more about the NAI and your opt-out options that the NAI offers (and requires its members to provide), please
see
https://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
. OUTLOGIC is not responsible for these Clients’ or any third parties’ privacy policies or opt-out programs or their compliance with NAI requirements.
With Our Service Providers
:
We have contracts with businesses that assist us with our own business operations (e.g., our Site, database hosting, fraud detection and prevention, verification and reporting, data hygiene, human resources, marketing and advertising, and email services), as well as billing or accounting functions, collections, technology, and other forms of operational support.
With Our Affiliates
:
In the event we establish a subsidiary or otherwise become affiliated with another company, we may share any information that we have collected with those entities.
In Relation to Legal Proceedings or Process
:
We may share information we have collected when we have a legal obligation to do so. This may include compliance with a binding court order, exercising, establishing or defending OUTLOGIC’s legal rights, or those of Clients or any other third party, or in good faith to comply with the requirements of any applicable law or legal process.
Similarly, we may disclose any information we have collected as required to respond in good faith to legal process, including subpoenas (whether civil or criminal), court orders or search warrants.
To Investigate Malfeasance and to Defend Ourselves or Third Parties
:
We may share information to assist us in enforcing our legal rights, our Terms of Service, or other policies as applicable, or to investigate any potential violation of the same. We may also share information to investigate any potential violations of the law, to defend or protect ourselves, our Clients, or any third party from any potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
In Relation to a Corporate Transaction
:
If a third party seeks to acquire or actually acquires our business or assets in whole or in part, we may disclose information we have collected in connection to that transaction (including without limitation during due diligence that may be undertaken in advance of possible sales).
6. User Choices & Opt-Out Tools
You can manage the way that we use data collected passively from your Device in connection with the OUTLOGIC Site and the Services (e.g. Advertising IDs, Installation IDs, or cookies) as described below:
Browser Settings
: You may adjust the privacy and security settings of your web browser to change how your browser uses cookies.
Opting Out of Interest Based Advertising on Mobile Devices
: You can opt out of tailored advertising on mobile devices by companies that participate in the Network Advertising Initiative or the Digital Advertising Alliance by visiting the NAI’s Mobile Choices Page and following the instructions provided there.
You can opt out of interest-based advertising on your browser by participating companies by visiting the
NAI’s opt-out page
or the
DAA’s Consumer Choice Page
. Residents of the EEA, UK and Switzerland may refer to
www.youronlinechoices.com
. The opt-out tools provided on these industry pages are generally based on cookie technologies. As such, if you delete your cookies (or change or update your web browser) you will need to repeat the opt out process. While our Services are generally not based on cookie technology, we are providing this information because we may partner with businesses to tailor ads for our own Services that do (for example, to retarget Visitors of Sites with advertisements). Further, certain third-party platforms may use information we have collected to match identifiers across devices – such as to tie a mobile Advertising ID by common IP Address to a browser-based cookie ID.
OUTLOGIC Opt-out:
You may limit the ways we use certain information we have collected by submitting an opt-out request by visiting this link:
Your Privacy Choices and Opt-Out Rights
here
.
Our Marketing Emails:
If you receive marketing or promotional emails from us, you may opt out of receiving those messages by following the “unsubscribe” instructions contained in them, or by emailing us with your request at
privacy@outlogic.io
. If you opt out of our marketing and promotional messages, you may still receive transaction- or service-related emails about your business relationship with us.
7. Security
We use administrative, technical, and physical safeguards designed to protect our physical infrastructure as well as in our computer systems, databases, and communications networks. These measures are intended to protect our systems (and the information contained therein) from loss, misappropriation, misuse, alteration or disclosure. No method of electronic transmission or storage is perfectly secure, however, so we cannot guarantee the security of information we collect with absolute certainty.
8.
The European Union and UK and Protections Under European Privacy Laws (GDPR and UK GDPR)
We (and those using our Services) are required to provide certain information about the processing of “Personal Data” of users in EEA and Switzerland under the GDPR of users in the UK under the UK GDPR. For purposes of this explanation, we will refer to both as “GDPR.” “Personal Data” generally refers to data that identifies or is capable of identifying a particular user or Device. Names and addresses, cookie IDs, Advertising IDs, Installation IDs, precise location information, and biometric data are examples of “Personal Data.”
If you have any questions about OUTLOGIC’s processing of Personal Data in the context of the GDPR, You may contact our Chief Privacy Officer by emailing your questions to
privacy@outlogic.io
, or contact our EU Representative at
eurep@outlogic.io
.
The representations and information we provide below, which are applicable only to individuals located in the EEA, the UK and Switzerland, are provided for purposes of compliance with the GDPR. Please do not rely on the information below if you are not located in one of those regions.
Legal grounds for processing your Personal Data:
Under the GDPR, we must disclose the legal bases we rely on to process Personal Data. Our legal bases for processing Personal Data for the purposes we describe in
Section 2
and
Section 3
above and
Section 5
as to our corporate data) include:
Consent
. We rely on your consent to provide our Services that use precise location information related to other Personal Data. We also rely on your consent to store and access information on your Device (e.g., Advertising IDs and Installation IDs). Our reliance on consent is in turn often in reliance on compliance steps required of and taken by our data suppliers and by Clients that use the Services. These steps are intended to confirm that your consent is collected in compliance with the GDPR and passed on to Clients and business partners such that we only facilitate the collection of data in compliance with the law. We may rely on your consent to process Personal Data in other circumstances as well. When we do so, we will follow applicable laws pertaining to providing and withdrawing consent. We also attempt to obtain consent for certain of our clients to process Personal Data. These Clients, in turn, may be independent data controllers as to data in their own possession and control.
Legitimate interest
. We may rely on legitimate interest as a legal basis for processing Personal Data in some cases. We may do so when we use Personal Data for purposes of maintaining the security of our services (including to detect and prevent fraud or to facilitate the detection and correction of bugs or other errors). We also rely on legitimate interest when we use our own Clients’ Personal Data (or our Site Visitors’ Personal Data) to communicate with them about their use of our Services, or to analyze user activity on our Site.
Contractual Agreements
. In some cases our basis for processing Personal Data is that the processing is necessary pursuant to a contractual relationship we have entered into (such as records and contact information related to our Clients).
You may obtain a copy of our SCCs document by contacting us at
privacy@outlogic.io
.
Legal Obligations
. We may process Personal Data when it is necessary for us to comply with our legal or regulatory obligations.
Transfers of Personal Data:
When we collect Personal Data in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, and then transfer it outside of those jurisdictions, we take measures to ensure that such Personal Data is protected by appropriate safeguards. In general, our transfers of Personal Data rely on Standard Contractual Clauses and Data Processing Agreements to safeguard that data where the GDPR or other European data protection laws require it. You may use the contact information below to request a copy of these SCCs.
How We Retain Personal Data
: We generally retain Personal Data we collect for as long as is necessary to either (1) provide our Services (absent a deletion or opt-out request); or (2) for other purposes including compliance with our legal obligations, dispute resolution, and to enforce our contracts. Our schedule for retaining Advertising IDs, Installation IDs,
and related location data
is as follows: Advertising IDs and Installation IDs we collect in order to provide our Services are rendered inactive by us within 12 months after the time we last obtained your consent; however, we may retain data beyond 13 months where we have de-identified it (i.e., altered it in such a way that it cannot be linked to Personal Data). We may retain this (and other) information insofar as we have a legal or operational need to do so, for example, for purposes of auditing, corporate record-keeping, legal compliance, accounting, security and bug-prevention purposes.
Rights of Data Subjects:
Data Subjects have certain rights in connection with the Personal Data that data controllers process about them pursuant to the GDPR. These include the right to access Personal Data, the right to request correction of inaccurate Personal Data, the right to request the restriction of processing of Personal Data, the right to request deletion of Personal Data, and the right to object to processing of Personal Data (including when we process Personal Data to build a profile for targeted digital advertising). We describe these rights more fully below.
Right to Access
: You may contact us at
privacy@outlogic.io
in order to exercise your right to access Personal Data we process as a data controller. We will respond to your request by explaining the steps you must follow to access your Personal Data after we receive your request. Because we are required to verify the identity of the individual making a request before we provide access to Personal Data, we will evaluate requests to exercise certain rights to access Personal Data on a case-by-case basis. In conducting this evaluation, we may consider both (1) the effort involved in verifying whether Personal Data that we process actually pertains to the data subject making the request – and only to that data subject; and (2) any potentially negative consequences that may result from erroneously releasing Personal Data to an individual other than the data subject, in light of the sensitivity of the Personal Data at issue and the degree of certainty we can achieve through verification. We may also limit the amount or kind of Personal Data we will release in circumstances where we believe it is likely that the improper release of Personal Data would adversely affect the privacy rights and freedoms of the data subject. We will only honor requests for access to Personal Data for which we act as a data controller, as explained more fully in sub-section (d) below. Where we act as a processor for Personal Data on behalf of another entity (for example, our Clients), you may contact that company instead of OUTLOGIC to make a data access request.
Right to Correct
: You may exercise your right to correct Personal Data by contacting us using the contact information provided below.
Right to Withdraw your Consent or Object to our Personal Data Processing
: You may use the opt-out methods described in
Section 6
of this Privacy Notice to withdraw your consent for our processing of your Personal Data (when we are relying on your consent). If you withdraw your consent, we will stop processing your Personal Data in connection with our Services within 30 days or fewer.
Right to Request Deletion
: You have the right to request that we delete Personal Data concerning you that we process as a controller. If you use the opt-out process described above, we will also delete your Personal Data. You may also contact us at
privacy@outlogic.io
to request that we delete your Personal Data. We will provide further instructions on how you can exercise your right to deletion after we receive your email request. In certain circumstances we may keep copies of Personal Data in back-up files (or otherwise in inactive form), for certain of our internal purposes that are important to our business, including legal, auditing, accounting and billing, bug-detection and correction. We may keep such backups for as long as is necessary to fulfill those purposes.
Right to Make Complaints
: You have the right to lodge a complaint regarding our processing of Personal Data with a relevant data protection authority. If you have a complaint, please contact us first to allow us to assist you in resolving it.
OUTLOGIC may act as either a data controller or a data processor in connection with the Personal Data we process, depending on the circumstances. EU data protection law distinguishes between companies that process Personal Data for their own purposes (i.e. “data controllers”) and companies that process Personal Data on behalf of and at the direction of other organizations (i.e. “data processors”). When we act as a data processor for other organizations, such as for our Clients, we may direct your requests or inquiries to the relevant data controller that is responsible for the processing of your Personal Data.
9. Children’s Data
We do not intend for our Services to be used in connection with minors under the age of 18, and we do not intentionally collect data from them. If you believe that we may have inadvertently collected of any such data, please use the contact information provided in
Section 12
below to let us know.
10. Additional Information for U.S. Residents Including Residents of California, Montana, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, Virginia and other States with Applicable Privacy Rights
US residents have data deletion rights as described in this
Section 10
. In addition, California residents have certain privacy rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (“CCPA”), and Virginia residents have similar privacy rights under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act of 2019 (“VCDPA”), with respect to personal information or personal data about them. Residents of Colorado, Connecticut and Utah have similar rights under either the Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA” effective July 1, 2023), the
Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring
(“CTDPA” effective July 1, 2023), or the Utah
Consumer Privacy Act
(“UCPA” effective December 31, 2023).
A number of other states’ residents have or will have similar protections at various times beginning in 2024 and 2025. We refer in this section to all states with privacy laws relevant to the below rights and disclosures as “Applicable States”).
A useful guide map to consult as to what privacy laws exist in your state is located at
http://iapp.org/resources/article/us-state-privacy-legislation-tracker/
. (we are not responsible for the content in that tracker, which is not ours but rather is provided by a third-party organization.)
Under the CCPA “Personal Information” generally means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. Similarly, under the VCDPA
and other state privacy laws
, “Personal Data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural person. When we use the term “personal information” in the following sections, we mean your personal data or information under the CCPA if you are a California resident or your Personal Data under the
under the laws of other Applicable States
.
If you are a resident of the US including any of
the Applicable States
, this section of the Privacy Notice applies to you insofar as we have collected personal information about you, or have sold such information.
As required by the CCPA and VCDPA, and the other Applicable States laws when they become effective, describe the personal information we collect about residents of US states, and the purposes for which we may use it, in the following sections:
Categories of Personal Information We Collect; How We Use It; and How We Share with Third Parties
The Business Purposes We Have for Collecting and Sharing Personal Information
Rights and Choices of US States Residents
Retention of U.S. Personal Information
A.
Categories of Personal Information We Collect; How We Use It; and How We Share with Third Parties
We may collect the categories of personal information about you described in the table below, depending on how you interact with us or our Services. The table also describes the categories of third-parties with whom we may share the categories of personal information specified. You may exercise your Right to Access in connection with any of the Personal Information Categories in the table below.
PERSONAL INFORMATION CATEGORY
DO WE CURRENTLY COLLECT/USE THIS CATEGORY OF PERSONAL INFORMATION?
SOURCES WE COLLECT THIS CATEGORY FROM:
HAVE WE “SOLD” THIS CATEGORY OF PERSONAL INFORMATION IN THE PAST 12 MONTHS?
CATEGORIES OF THIRD-PARTIES WHOM THIS DATA WAS SHARED WITH FOR BUSINESS PURPOSES
Identifiers (e.g., online identifiers; IP address; mobile ad identifiers, other online or advertising platform identifiers)
Yes
Data analytics services and data aggregators; Third party mobile applications and websites; and OUTLOGIC affiliate owned and operated mobile applications and websites
Yes
Advertising networks (e.g., demand-side platforms, agency trading platforms); Agencies and advertisers; Data aggregators and resellers; Data analytics services; Financial institutions; Government entities and information services; Outlogic affiliates; and App Publishers
Identifiers related to our own corporate “business to business” purposes and/or our Site (these are not utilized with our Services to Clients, but instead for, e.g., our own marketing and Approved Partner contact purposes): name, address, e-mail address, phone number
Yes
Data analytics services and data aggregators; Third party mobile applications and websites; and OUTLOGIC affiliate owned and operated mobile applications and websites
No
Operating systems and platforms
Internet or Other Electronic Network Activity Information (e.g., information regarding a consumer or device’s interaction with a website or application)
Yes
Data analytics services, data aggregators, and OUTLOGIC affiliate owned and operated mobile applications and websites
Yes
Advertising networks (e.g., demand-side platforms, agency trading platforms); Agencies and advertisers; Data aggregators and resellers; Data analytics services; Financial institutions; Government entities and information services; Outlogic affiliates; and App Publishers
Geolocation Information (lat/long coordinates, generally associated with a mobile identifier)
Yes
Data aggregators; Third party mobile applications; and OUTLOGIC affiliate owned and operated mobile applications
Yes
Advertising networks (e.g., demand-side platforms, agency trading platforms); Agencies and advertisers; Data aggregators and resellers; Data analytics services; Financial institutions; Government entities and information services; Outlogic affiliates, and App Publishers
Inferences (for example, whether a consumer is likely to be interested in travel, or sports events, or another activity)
Yes
Data analytics services and data
aggregators; Third party mobile applications and websites; and OUTLOGIC affiliate owned and operated mobile applications and websites
Yes
Advertising networks (e.g., demand-side platforms, agency trading platforms); Agencies and advertisers; Data aggregators and resellers; Data analytics services; Financial institutions; Government entities and information services; Outlogic affiliates; and App Publishers
B. The Business Purposes We Have for Collecting and Sharing Personal Information
Our purposes for collecting and sharing Personal Information are described below (with examples). These details are also described in our Privacy Notice:
Tailored Digital Advertising
:
Working with advertisers, agencies and the technology platforms they use to: (1) target (such as by creating inferenced audience groups), send, tailor, optimize and analyze advertising and marketing messages in websites, mobile apps or across other channels; and (2) measure and analyze the effectiveness of those messages.
Create “identity” graphs to assist our Clients in finding users across multiple channels. This may include linking personal, device-based, or network-based identifiers (eg, Advertising ID, Installation ID, IP address).
Research for Marketing and Other Purposes
:
We provide information for purposes including financial and market research, for the study movement patterns, for urban planning, for smart cities research, or for educational purposes. We may also share information with government entities or public health organizations who wish to study movement patterns for disease prevention research, for physical security or defense purposes or information security, to prevent crime, or for civic, disaster and traffic planning.
To Operate Our Services
: We use personal information to:
Enhance, test, update, and verify our own data and data-related services
Develop new products or services
Operate, analyze, enhance, and secure our services
Other Internal Business Purposes
:
We use personal information for internal research or operations, auditing, detecting and responding to security incidents, debugging, short-term and transient use, quality control, and legal compliance. Information we collect from our Sites and from Apps may be used for the above, in addition to our own marketing purposes.
Sharing for Purposes of Legal Compliance:
We may share personal information with third parties for purposes of: (1) compliance with official legal process or a regulatory investigation (for example, a valid subpoena or court order); (2) enforcing our Terms of Service, this Privacy Notice, or other agreements, including investigation of suspected violations of the same; (3) responding to claims that certain content violates the rights of third parties; or (4) protecting the rights, property or personal safety of us (or our platform), our Clients, our affiliates, our agents, our platform users, or the general public. Similarly, we may share personal information with other entities to detect or prevent fraud, to prevent spam or malware, or other similar purposes.
Sharing In Connection With a Corporate Transaction:
In the event of a major corporate transaction (such as a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets), we may share personal information in connection with that transaction, including for purposes of associated due diligence.
Sharing With Our Service Providers:
We may share any personal information we collect with our service providers. Our service providers may include, for example, providers of: technology; support for our Clients; business operations; web or database hosting; billing; accounting; physical or information security; marketing and advertising; data management, validation, enhancement or hygiene; or providers that otherwise assist us with providing, developing, maintaining, or improving our Services.
Aggregate Information:
We may use personal information to create aggregate information, or may de-identify any personal information we collect to make it such that it cannot be linked to you or your device (“Aggregate or De-Identified Information”). We may use Aggregate or De-Identified Information for any purpose, including, but not limited to, for research and marketing purposes. We may also share Aggregate or De-Identified Information with third parties, who may include advertisers or marketers, promotional partners, our sponsors, or otherwise at our discretion.
C. Rights and Choices of US States Residents
If you are a resident of any US state, you have the right to request that we delete personal information collected from you, including data that may reveal your mobile device’s precise geographic location, and also send requests to any recipients of your personal information that they delete such data from their commercial databases (your “deletion rights”). If you choose to exercise your right to deletion, there are certain circumstances under which we may nevertheless retain personal information as permitted by law, such as to prevent, detect, or investigate data security incidents, or to protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity directed at the company. The right to delete is separate from the right to opt-out of data sales as provided in Applicable States laws. We describe below how you may exercise your deletion rights.
In addition to data deletion, if you are a resident of an Applicable State, you may have
additional rights including
the right to request (1) that we disclose what personal information we collect from you; and (2) to opt out of our sale of your personal information. The states that provide these rights to their residents include but are not limited to California (under the CCPA), Colorado (under the CPA), Connecticut (under the CTDPA), Utah (under the UCPA), and Virginia (under the VCDPA),
as well as other Applicable States, as we have stated above.
These rights are subject to certain limitations, although you will not be discriminated against for exercising any of these rights. In certain circumstances, we may charge a reasonable fee to process your request to the extent permitted by law.
Right to Opt-out of the Sale of Your Personal Information
:
Residents
of Applicable States
may opt out of the “sale” of their personal information. “Sale” is defined broadly by
various state laws,
to include making personal information available in exchange for any monetary or other valuable consideration.
To “opt out” of our “sale” of your personal information you may use either of the methods below:
By visiting this link:
Your Privacy Choices and Opt-Out Rights
.
By emailing your opt-out request to
privacy@outlogic.io
using a subject line that reads “Data Transfer Opt out.”
Right to Request Deletion of Your Personal Information
:
If we have collected personal information from you, you may request that we delete such personal information. A request to delete is distinct from a request to “opt out” of our sale of your personal information. You may contact us by email at
privacy@outlogic.io
or call us toll-free at +1 (866) 346-9602 to exercise this right.
If you choose to exercise your right to deletion, there are certain circumstances under which we many nevertheless retain personal information as permitted by law, such as:
To defend against fraudulent activity directed towards our business, systems, or users.
To detect and fix technical issues that affect existing system functions (e.g., for de-bugging).
As necessary for the protection of the free speech or other rights of us (or others).
To assist with law enforcement requests made pursuant to lawful process.
For certain scientific or historical research purposes.
For our own internal purposes, provided they are reasonably related to your relationship with us.
To comply with our legal obligations.
Please note that we require certain information in order to provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete that information, it may prevent you from being able to access or use our Services.
Opt-Out/Access/Deletion Requests Metrics-2024
From January 1, 2024, to December 31, 2024, we maintained processes to facilitate requests pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act. We received the following requests, and responded as follows:a. As to requests to know:
We received 10
We complied with 2
We denied 8, as the limited personal data collected is logged by a device ID. The requestor refused to provide the necessary device D despite the company’s follow up explanation and request.
Our median response time was 2 days. Our mean response time was 3 days.
b. As to requests to delete:
We received 141
We complied with 8
We denied 133, as the limited personal data collected is logged by a device ID. The requestor refused to provide the necessary device D despite the company’s follow up explanation and request.
Our median response time was 2 days. Our mean response time was 3 days.
c. As to requests to opt out of sale:
We received 543
We complied with 94
We denied 449, as the limited personal data collected is logged by a device ID. The requestor refused to provide the necessary device D despite the company’s follow up explanation and request.
Our median response time was 2 days. Our mean response time was 3 days.
d. We received an additional 24,800 requests by a purported third-party automated data deletion service. Such requests could not be processed, due to service’s failure to provide the necessary identifying information despite our repeated requests.
Right to Request Access to Your Personal Information
:
Applicable States may give their residents the right to request that we disclose both the categories and specific pieces of personal information that we collect, use, or sell. We will comply with data access requests if we can verify them to a legally sufficient degree. You may make such an access request by emailing us at
privacy@outlogic.io
with the subject line “Data Access Request” or by calling us toll-free at +1 (866) 346-9602.
We may be able to adequately verify access requests for certain information we have collected. However, in line with certain guidance provided by the California Attorney General, we do not provide location data in response to access requests due to the fact that we are not able to verify to a reasonably high degree of certainty that the location data we have collected pertains to the individual making such a request, or whether either an individual with custody of a device — or the person making the request — is the rightful owner of the device to which the information we hold pertains. For example, it is not uncommon for a person to be in possession of another person’s phone temporarily (for example, a partner, friend or work colleague’s mobile phone or tablet), whether or not such temporary possession is authorized. We take this approach in order to avoid a scenario where such a person in temporary possession of a phone might obtain potentially detailed and sensitive information pertaining to the phone’s owner through a request for access. We also believe California law compels us to avoid a scenario like this. In addition, a recent study found that roughly 50% of mobile phones were not password protected at all, making the possibility of such “spoofing” a tangible risk. Further, we do not have other, more conventional means to confirm the identity of a device’s true owner because for consumer privacy reasons we do not collect information such as name, address or email address that could be used to do so.
If you do not wish location data associated with your device to be used in the ways we describe above, we suggest that you make a request to opt out of sales of your information as detailed above. You can find complete information about how to exercise your right to opt out by visiting this link:
Your Privacy Choices and Opt-Out Rights
.
Our Collection of Sensitive Personal Information, and Your Rights to Limit Its Use
:
Certain Personal Information that we collect and sell, such as precise geolocation of a person, household, or device, is considered “Sensitive Personal Information” under the data privacy laws of California (CCPA), Connecticut (CTDPA), and Virginia (VCDPA)
and other Applicable States
. We obtain the right to use and share this information, through the consent methods described in our Privacy Policy. California residents have the right to require a business to limit the use of their Sensitive Personal Information to only certain internal business purposes specified in the CCPA.
To limit the use of your Sensitive Personal Information, you may use either of the methods below:
By visiting this link:
Your Privacy Choices and Opt-Out Rights
.
Use OUTLOGIC’s web-form available
here
.
By emailing your request to
privacy@outlogic.io
using a subject line that reads “California Limit SPI Use.”
How to Exercise Your Rights and Submit a Verifiable Consumer Request
:
To exercise
applicable privacy
rights or to learn more about how to do so, residents of those
Applicable
States may contact us using any of the following means:
By visiting this link:
Your Privacy Choices and Opt-Out Rights
By emailing your request to
privacy@outlogic.io
.
With respect to access or deletion requests, by calling us toll-free at: +1 (866) 346-9602.
In certain circumstances, we may not disclose some personal information to you in response to an access request where doing so presents too great a risk to you or our business. We may also withhold such information where we cannot verify your identity in connection to such personal information.
To learn about how to opt out of Tailored Advertising, please review and consider whether to use the industry opt-out mechanisms provided on the
NAI (Network Advertising Initiative) page
. We believe that opting out using these industry tools may be more efficient, faster, and more uniform compared to using manual opt out processes.
In the event we are not able to comply with your requests fully for any of the reasons described above, we will still explain the reasons why we could not fulfill your request. Certain consumers have the right to appeal our decision not to fulfill a request, and may do so by emailing our Chief Privacy Officer at
A
ppeals@outlogic.io
with the subject line “Privacy Choices Appeal”.
Right to Non-Discrimination
:
If you elect to exercise your rights
under the Applicable State, as described in this
Section 10
, we will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services for that reason.
Information Regarding Individuals Younger than 16 Years Old
:
Unless we have obtained legally sufficient consent to do so, we do not knowingly sell personal information pertaining to minors younger than 16 years old. In the event we learn that we have collected or sold personal information regarding such residents, we will take reasonable steps to remove such information from our database (or we will obtain any legally required consents).
Authorized Agents
:
You may exercise your rights described above under the
laws of Applicable States
, by designating an agent to make requests on your behalf. If you choose to designate an agent, we will take steps to verify both (1) your identity; and (2) that your designated agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf by providing us
(depending on the legal requirement in your state)
with a written authorization signed by you or a copy of a valid power of attorney.
D. Retention of U.S. Personal Information
We retain personal information pertaining to the categories listed in
Section 10
.A. on the following schedule: device and other identifiers, precise location data, inferences, and internet or other electronic activity information may be retained for up to 5 years, with certain aggregated information related to locations of devices and internal reporting data retained for up to 3 years, to fulfill the business purposes listed in Section II.B. We may maintain personal information for longer periods if we have a significant operational or legal need to do so, such as for auditing, compliance, accounting, security, bug-prevention purposes, and when required by law. For example, we may retain Consent audit logs
for up to 10 years
.
11. Changes to This Privacy Notice
In the event we make material changes to this Privacy Notice that may affect you, we will post prominent notice of any such changes on our website for not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of the changes. If you wish to stay abreast of all such changes, we suggest that you check this Privacy Notice frequently in order to stay informed of any such changes.
12. Contact Information
To ask questions about the information in this Privacy Notice or for more information about how we use information we collect, or to exercise any of the rights outlined in
Section 8
or
Section 10
, you may contact us at:
privacy@outlogic.io
OR
P.O. Box 17247
Arlington,VA 22216
OR
F
or EEA Residents: Please contact our EU Representative at eurep@outlogic.io Alternatively, they can be reached by post (The DPO Centre, Alexandra House, 3 Ballsbridge Park, Dublin, D04C 7H2) or +353 1 631 9460.
https://www.dpocentre.com/contact-us/
For UK Residents Please contact our UK Representative at
ukrep@outlogic.io
Alternatively, they can be reached by post (The DPO Centre Ltd, 50 Liverpool street, London, EC2M 7PY) or +44 (0) 203 797 6340.
https://www.dpocentre.com/contact-us/
Last Update: January 2025
Texas law defines sensitive personal data to include precise geolocation data. In this regard, we may receive and sell the precise latitude and longitude coordinates of your mobile device.
×
Sub-policy 1
https://tacs.c0nnectthed0ts.com/policy1/data_privacy.html:
Thank you for installing our app.
Data Privacy Policy
The umlaut insightCoreSDK is provided by umlaut communications GmbH, Am Kraftversorgungsturm 3, 52070 Aachen, Germany (“umlaut communications”). Any use of the corresponding host application, where the umlaut insightCoreSDK is part of, is only allowed under the conditions as outlined below.
Declaration of Consent to Data Processing
By downloading and using a host application, which is enabled by the umlaut insightCoreSDK, you are consenting to the data processing as described in this Data Privacy Policy.
With using the umlaut insightCoreSDK, we collect personal-related (pseudonymous) data. This is information that is not directly associated with the real-life identity of the user, for example, the type of internet connection, the measured velocity and location and measurements from connectivity tests, as well as system and usage parameters, and, provide those anonymized to our partners. In NO case do we collect content information such as messages or passwords.
Data Privacy – What we stand for
umlaut communications are aware that you consider a particularly safe handling of all your personal data as extremely important. Therefore, we guarantee that all your data is processed by us in accordance with the provisions of the relevant EU legislation, as implemented in Germany.
What information is collected
The umlaut insightCoreSDK collects personal-related (pseudonymous) data. This is information that is not directly associated with the real-life identity of the user (and which could not be used to identify them individually), for example, the type of internet connection, the measured velocity and location and measurements from connectivity tests, as well as system and usage parameters.
At the latest after six months, the pseudonym is automatically replaced by a new random number. Information collected will at NO time be associated with names, email addresses or phone numbers of users. In NO case do we collect content information such as messages or passwords.
In addition to the results of the tests run by the SDK other localization information and technical (system) parameters are obtained. Some technical parameters (such as wireless network information) are collected periodically, e.g. subject to GPS localization events.
As far as IP-addresses are concerned, those will be masked on collection within the app, by removing the last three digits; therefore, a correlation to a single user is no longer possible.
Specifically, the following data will be collected from the user’s device and analyzed:
Measurement results as executed by the umlaut insightCoreSDK (active measurements “Connection Test”)
Internet availability / success ratio
Download time
Latency (“ping”)
Measurement data collected through use of the device (passive measurements)
Download speed
Upload speed
Dropped calls
Wireless access technology
Coverage / signal strength
System and usage parameters
User ID (pseudonymous random number)
Wireless network information (e. g. network operator, Cell ID, signal strength, SSID)
Device information (e. g. model, operating system)
Location information (e. g. longitude / latitude)
Usage information (e. g. transferred amount of data, call logs)
App usage (e. g. of all installed apps, their usage time, duration, volume and location)
Time information (e. g. time stamps of the measurements)
Other system information (e. g. battery status, memory usage, connected devices)
Release information (e. g. app build, data formats)
The regular execution of the connection test and the collection of the passive measurements and system and usage information take place in the background. The connection test is regularly checking the availability of a data network connectivity to the internet and, thereby, it consumes less than 3MB in total per month.
Purpose of Data Collection
The data collected is used statistically, with the purposes of supporting the development and improvement of communication networks as well as usage-related analyses.
Transfer of Information
With acceptance of the Data Privacy Policy, you agree that the information described above, is stored and can be transferred anonymously to our partners.
Personally identifiable data (like name, phone number or email address) are NOT collected and, therefore, can at no time be transferred to third parties. The collected pseudonymous data are only transferred in context of their analyses to our partner umlaut communications.
Lawfulness of data processing is your consent according to Art. 6 (1) a) of GDPR.
Right of the Data Subject
You have the right of access, rectification, erasure, restriction of processing, notification obligation regarding rectification, erasure, and restriction of processing, data portability and objection.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
To do so, please contact us free of charge. You can also contact our Data Privacy Officer at the e-mail address ins.datenschutz@umlaut.com. Please provide your User ID in the e-mail.
Opt-out
You always have the option to uninstall the application. With the application being uninstalled, the collection of information is stopped immediately and respective data is erased from your device.
User ID:
Terms of Use
Use of the umlaut insightCoreSDK
You are not authorized to distribute the umlaut insightCoreSDK and its contents, logos or graphics in any way. Legal notices that appear in conjunction with our services may in no way be removed, defaced or altered. We grant you in this regard, a non-exclusive, non-transferable right to use this umlaut insightCoreSDK. With cessation of service, the right to use ceases. You are not authorized to use the umlaut insightCoreSDK beyond the permissions by this contract nor have third parties use it or otherwise make available to any third party. In particular, you are not permitted to copy the umlaut insightCoreSDK or any part thereof or to decompile the umlaut insightCoreSDK.
You agree not to use it in an improper manner. This means that you may not modify or manipulate the umlaut insightCoreSDK and its data. By using the umlaut insightCoreSDK, you will not acquire any copyright or intellectual property rights in our services or the content, logos and graphics that you access, which means you cannot use them without our explicit consent.
The umlaut insightCoreSDK is provided to you free of any charge made by us. The umlaut insightCoreSDK will transmit data and this transmitted data may, however, incur costs or be deducted from your data allowance depending on your service contract, and you remain responsible for any such charges to from your service provider. We try to keep this data volume as small as reasonably possible.
Liability
umlaut communications do not warrant that the transferred information is accurate and complete. Except as provided by law, we are not liable should you incur damage from improper, incomplete or delayed transmission of information or a fault of the umlaut insightCoreSDK. If the umlaut insightCoreSDK or the transmission of data leads to interference or damage to hardware or software, we are responsible only to the extent caused by intent or gross negligence by us. We are not liable for any data loss, and you are advised (as you would be when installing and using any app) to ensure you have appropriate backup of the data stored on your device.
Although we always do our best to keep the umlaut insightCoreSDK free of viruses, we do not guarantee that it is virus-free. Again, as with any app you may download and use, you are advised to take care of your own protection and ensure you take appropriate security measures to prevent viruses.
You are not entitled to a continuous and uninterrupted availability of the umlaut insightCoreSDK. However, we endeavor to achieve the highest possible availability and troubleshoot as quickly as possible. In addition, we have the right to temporarily or permanently discontinue our service, even without notice to you individually.
In accordance with the Product Liability Law, nothing in these terms seeks to limit or exclude liability in relation to death or personal injury.
Final Provisions
German law applies to the exclusion of the UN purchase law.
umlaut communications reserves the right to update this Data Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.
Last modified: 3rd June 2020
--- END OF DOCUMENT ---
Sub-policy 2
https://www.opensignal.com/privacypolicy-for-crowdsourcedata:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy - Apps & Connectivity Assistant
This Privacy Policy applies to use of the Opensignal (“
Opensignal
,” “
we
,” “
us
,” or “
our
”) mobile application and data we collect through, mobile applications operated by one of our partners (each, a “Partner”) who has implemented our Software Development Kit, or “
SDK
.”
The purpose of this Policy is to inform you about our privacy practices and to ensure that you understand the purposes for which we collect and process personal data, how we look after your personal data, and inform you of your privacy rights.
1. WHO WE ARE
Opensignal works with the global telecom ecosystem to help it understand and improve network speeds and network coverage for consumers like you. We provide application performance analytics and connectivity insights to our Partners while helping companies optimize networks in the areas that need it most. Opensignal takes great pride in providing a service that benefits many as we work toward our vision of advancing connectivity for all.
When you opt-in to allowing Opensignal to collect network performance readings from your device, we work with our Partners and companies in the telecom ecosystem to provide you with a better network and application experience. We rely on your choice and consent to initiate any transfer of data (and you can withdraw consent and opt-out at any time through the application). Our mobile application Partners support us entering into this relationship with you by facilitating our disclosure and consent process. We do not collect anything that directly identifies you or your mobile handset. We aggregate or depersonalize all data prior to sharing with our customers.
This Privacy Policy describes how we, Opensignal, collect, use, and share the data that you consent for us to collect, including personal data, when you opt in to allow us access to data in connection with the network performance experienced through a mobile application operated by one of our Partners.
As a company whose livelihood depends on data and its proper treatment, Opensignal takes data privacy and security very seriously. As such we have taken steps to go well beyond basic privacy and data protection requirements.
We request your consent to collect information relating to the network performance your device experiences, which may include certain types of personal data described below, in order to measure the performance, availability and/or signal quality of communication networks (the “
Opensignal Services
”).
Opensignal is the controller or joint controller and, as applicable, is responsible for the collection, control and processing of personal data that we collect from your device. If you have any questions or concerns about Opensignal’s use of your personal data, including any requests to exercise your legal rights, please contact us at
privacy@opensignal.com
.
IF YOU HAVE RIGHTS AS A RESIDENT OF COLORADO, CONNECTICUT, OR VIRGINIA, PLEASE SEE YOUR DATA SUBJECT RIGHTS IN SECTION 9. IF YOU HAVE RIGHTS UNDER THE CALIFORNIA CONSUMER PRIVACY ACT, PLEASE SEE THE CCPA SUPPLEMENT BELOW IN SECTION 10. IF YOU HAVE RIGHTS AS A RESIDENT OF NEVADA, PLEASE SEE YOUR NEVADA PRIVACY RIGHTS IN SECTION 11.
2. MOBILE APPLICATIONS
At Opensignal, we use mobile network experience measurements to publish independent reports and insights on the real-world mobile network experience of everyday users worldwide. We obtain the relevant data by collecting measurements relating to signal reception and quality from mobile devices. The Opensignal mobile application and our Partner’s mobile applications (each, a “Mobile Application”) enable us to request your consent to our data collection. If you consent to initiate our collection of data, we may collect data from your mobile device when you are using a Mobile Application and/or when it is running in the background pertaining to network and wireless device experience.
WHAT DATA WE COLLECT FROM YOU AND HOW WE COLLECT AND USE THAT DATA
The different kinds of personal data we may collect includes location data, device data and usage data as described further below.
The purpose of collecting limited device data is to measure the experience that devices have on wireless networks. If consent has been granted, we take measurements from devices from time to time including location data (which include GPS coordinates or similar information regarding the location of a network reading taken from your device), network type, network operator, cellular and Wifi signal strength and quality, IP address, and the identifiers of connected cell towers and Wifi routers (including both BSSID and SSID). Location readings are not tied to a device identifier such as a mobile handset MAC or IMEI, which we do not collect, and are instead the locations of network experience readings for purposes such as building general heatmaps of good and poor performance. We measure the performance of the data connection including the speed, responsiveness and reliability along with the total amount of data transferred. We collect crash logs data and diagnostics to ensure that our software does not negatively impact consumer experiences.
We collect information from environmental sensors on devices (depending on which ones are integrated in the device), which allows us to measure things such as the device acceleration, orientation and the external atmospheric pressure and light intensity. We also measure some internal device conditions – such as battery temperature and voltage. The goal of collecting this data is to understand how instantaneous device conditions may affect the experience of wireless networks. To better understand differences between devices, we collect data on device hardware such as the model, manufacturer, and manufacturers and models of sub-components (such as the cellular radio) and the capabilities of these components (for example the number of cores on the CPU). Similarly, to understand differences caused by software, we collect information on the mobile platform version used and whether custom ROMs or Android skins are installed, as well as the operating system. The goal of collecting this data is to understand how device properties affect the experience of wireless networks.
When a Mobile Application containing our SDK is installed and consent is provided, an identification code (“Resettable ID”) is randomly generated by our software and allocated to that installation instance rather than the device when we take measurements. A different and unique Resettable ID will be generated by each Mobile Application on a particular device. New installations of the same Mobile Application will also generate new unique Resettable IDs. Resettable IDs are random, unrelated to each other, specific to Opensignal, and not shared externally. To further help us manage the data, we also collect IP addresses, as these may indicate which telecom carrier network is being accessed and is impacting your experience. This document does not encompass or detail Opensignal's handling of internal employee or customer data. Opensignal's employees and customers may provide personal information through the regular course of business and Opensignal separately handles the governance of that data.
We prevent user identification; we do not collect name, email address, phone number, social media ID, contact list, Mobile Advertising ID, mobile handset MAC/IMEI, or anything else which directly identifies an individual or their specific device. For the avoidance of doubt, we also do not collect any special categories of personal data about you as defined in GDPR. We aggregate or depersonalize all data prior to sharing with our customers.
THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH WE USE YOUR DATA
The purposes for which we collect, store, and then aggregate or depersonalize personal data for external use are the following:
We do not use the measurements we take from mobile devices for any individualized user identification or individualized user tracking. Measurements that we take from the mobile devices of individual network users allow us to measure the performance of a carrier and the service availability, quality and performance of numerous communication networks across the world and over time. For example, we use data to improve wireless networks, research market performance, identify aggregate trends in device and network utilization patterns, understand the network-based drivers of subscriber churn and acquisition, and design effective network performance communication campaigns. Furthermore, we use data for the purpose of providing aggregated telecommunications network flow share, market share and other market analysis, using proprietary algorithms generating observations of market behavior, activations and deactivations across the telecom infrastructure. We publish some of the aggregated or depersonalized statistical data that we generate and we provide it to our customers (such as network operators) to help them understand, communicate and optimize their own network’s service coverage, performance and signal quality (and those of their competitors). We also create aggregated or depersonalized information.
We use data to test, monitor, improve or upgrade the Mobile Applications or SDKs, to meet our legal obligations and the regulatory requirements to which we may be subject, for loss prevention purposes and to protect and enforce our rights and meet our obligations to third parties, and for our internal business purposes, such as compiling and analyzing usage information for general operational, statistical and business purposes.
Our Customers and Partners are not permitted to use our data to identify the mobile applications or publishers that our data has been received from. We collect data from various mobile applications, and our reports, data, and documentation do not reveal which mobile applications the source data was collected from. We do not publicly disclose our Partners without their permission.
3. LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING YOUR DATA
We collect and process personal data based on your express consent. If consent is provided, it can be withdrawn via measures provided by the Mobile Application, such as through the personal settings menu in the Mobile Application (but that will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent). In respect of any personal data collected from devices with your consent we also rely on our legitimate interest in conducting our business and in carrying out statistical and scientific research work and in providing analytical data to our clients and improving global connectivity for users like you.
We will only use your personal data for the purposes for which we collected it, unless we reasonably consider that we need to use it for another reason and that reason is compatible with the original purpose. If you wish to get an explanation as to how the processing for the new purpose is compatible with the original purpose, please contact us.
Opensignal participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies. Opensignal’s identification number within the framework is 1263.
4. HOW WE SHARE PERSONAL INFORMATION
Service Providers. We may share datasets containing personal data as part of private contracts we have with third-party service providers that perform services on our behalf in connection with the Opensignal Services, such as cloud service providers for storage and the processing required for depersonalization. Where this information is shared with such third parties, we obligate the third-party service provider to manage the information only on our behalf and solely for our benefit (and not for its own benefit).
Business Change. If we become involved in a merger, consolidation, acquisition, sale of assets, joint venture, securities offering, bankruptcy, reorganization, liquidation, dissolution or other transaction, or if the ownership of all or substantially all of our business otherwise changes, we may share or transfer databases containing personal data to successor party or parties in connection with such transaction or change in ownership or legal structure.
Necessary Disclosure. Regardless of the choices you make regarding your information and to the extent permitted or required by applicable law, we may disclose information about you to third parties to: (i) enforce or apply the terms and conditions of the Opensignal Services; (ii) comply with laws, subpoenas, warrants, court orders, legal processes or requests of government or law enforcement officials; (iii) protect our rights, reputation, safety or property, or that of our users or others; (iv) protect against legal liability; (v) establish or exercise our rights to defend against legal claims; or (vi) investigate, prevent or take action regarding known or suspected illegal activities; fraud; our rights, reputation, safety or property, or those of our users or others; violation of the Terms of Use, our policies or agreements; or as otherwise required by law.
Subsidiaries and affiliates. We may share the data that we collect from users’ mobile devices with the Opensignal subsidiaries and affiliates, with the purpose of bringing together complementary data on consumer experience, network performance, and subscriber behavior.
We require all third parties to respect the security of your personal data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
5. HOW WE PROTECT PERSONAL INFORMATION
We take appropriate measures to protect personal data collected through the Opensignal Services against loss, theft, and unauthorized access, use, disclosure, destruction or modification. These include physical, technological, contractual, and administrative measures.
We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected personal data breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where we are legally required to do so.
You should understand that no data storage system or transmission of data over the Internet or any other public network can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure, accurate, complete, or current. Please note that information collected by third parties may not have the same security protections as information you submit to us, and we are not responsible for protecting the security of such information.
6. HOW LONG WE KEEP PERSONAL INFORMATION
Any personal data which may be contained in the sets of measurements of mobile network signal performance described above is only retained for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements. We may retain your personal data for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation in respect to our relationship with you.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of personal data, the purposes for which we process personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
7. COUNTRY OF PROCESSING
We operate globally. The collection of data from devices takes place in the country where the device is used. We store and otherwise process data (including personal data) through third party cloud service providers who offer a range of global storage location options. We store personal data records predominantly through third-party cloud service providers on servers located in the United States of America. When transferring personal data records to a country which does not provide an adequate level of protection to privacy rights, we put in place appropriate safeguards including data transfer agreements.
8. CHILDREN'S PRIVACY
The Opensignal Service is not directed to children and is intended for use by adults only. We do not knowingly solicit or collect personal data from individuals under 18 years of age. If you are under the age of 18, please do not submit any information through the Opensignal Service and do not provide your consent for the use of your data.
9. DATA SUBJECT RIGHTS
Data subjects may have the following legal rights depending on applicable law in respect of their personal data that we process:
The right to require Opensignal to confirm whether or not your information is being processed, the purpose of any such processing, the recipients of any information that has been disclosed, the period for which your information is to be stored and whether any automated decision-making processes are used in relation to your information;
The right to require access to the personal data and to require Opensignal to rectify inaccurate information;
Where Opensignal has relied on the ‘consent’ basis for processing that information, the right to withdraw your consent at any time. This right to withdraw consent does not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal;
The right to request the erasure of their information. You can make a request for erasure where:
the information is no longer necessary in relation to the purpose for which it was collected;
where the processing of the information is based on your consent (and the other circumstances described in the ‘Legal Basis for Processing Your Data’ and ‘How We Share Personal Information’ sections above no longer apply), if you withdraw your consent; or
where the personal data is processed by Opensignal solely on the basis of our ‘legitimate interest’, if you withdraw your consent for the processing of your data and you object to the processing of your personal data and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing (such as, for example, the achievement of the purpose of using your data for statistical or scientific research purposes or where the processing of the data is required to meet statutory obligations or for the defense of legal claims).
Where Opensignal has disclosed your information of a data subject to a third party and you request the erasure or rectification of the data, Opensignal will take any steps required under relevant laws to inform the third party of such request.
The right to require Opensignal to restrict its processing of your personal data in certain circumstances, such as where the accuracy of that data is disputed or an objection has been raised. In such circumstances, Opensignal will only process that information with your express consent, or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims or for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person or for reasons of important public interest;
Where data is processed based on your consent or to fulfill a contractual obligation provided for by law, you have the right to receive your personal data from Opensignal in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format;
The right to object to the processing of personal data where:
a.Opensignal relies solely on the ‘legitimate interest’ basis for processing that data, in which case we will be legally required to stop processing your information unless we have compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your privacy rights and interests; or
b.the information is used for direct marketing purposes, in which case we will immediately stop processing your information for such purposes.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with the UK’s Information Commissioner’s Office (www.ico.org.uk) or in some cases with the data protection supervisory authority or regulator of the jurisdiction where you reside. We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns before you approach the authority or regulator, so please contact us in the first instance.
You have the right to ask that we transfer the personal information you gave us to another organization, or to you, in certain circumstances.
The above legal rights are subject to various conditions and exceptions including where the data is used for statistical or scientific research purposes and the exercise of the right would prevent such purposes from being attained or would seriously impair their attainment. In addition, there are, consistent with relevant laws, limitations on our ability to honor requests to exercise these rights for data that cannot be linked to a verified request, such as where data has been de-personalized.
To exercise these rights, please call us at (+44) 020 3289 3375 or email us at
privacy@opensignal.com
.   You may be entitled, in accordance with applicable law, to appeal a refusal to take action on your request; to do so, please see any applicable instructions in our response to your request. We will aim to respond to any request within one month. Please note that we cannot fulfill requests to know the specific pieces of personal information that we may have collected about you. In order to disclose the specific pieces of personal information that we may have collected about you, we would have to verify your identity to a reasonably high degree of certainty. Given the limited amount of information that we collect about you, we do not maintain enough data points to verify your identity to the reasonably high degree of certainty required by relevant law.
Our data processing activities do not include the sale of personal data, the use of personal data for targeting advertising, or the use of personal data for profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, although we may disclose aggregated or depersonalized data with external sources, as described above. As a result, we do not honor rights to opt out of these practices in jurisdictions that recognize such rights.
You can also authorize another person, called an agent, to exercise your rights on your behalf. You must provide the authorized agent written and signed permission to act on your behalf. We may deny requests from an authorized agent who does not submit proof that he or she has been authorized to act on your behalf. Furthermore, we may require you to verify your identity directly with us. We may also require you to directly confirm with us that you have provided the authorized agent permission to submit a request on your behalf. An authorized agent can make a request on your behalf by either calling us at (+44) 020 3289 3375 or by emailing us at
privacy@opensignal.com
.
We may not discriminate against you because you exercised any of your data subject rights, although some of the functionality and features available on the service may change or no longer be available to you. Any differences in the services are related to the value provided.
10. SUPPLEMENT FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
You will not need to create an account to exercise your rights. California residents have the right to:
Delete. To exercise this right, you must provide a verifiable consumer request by either calling us at (+44) 020 3289 or by emailing us at
privacy@opensignal.com
.
Know. You may request that, for personal information we disclose, we provide you the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which the personal information was collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting personal information, if applicable, the categories of third parties with whom we share personal information. To exercise this right, you must provide a verifiable consumer request by either calling us at (+44) 020 3289 3375 or by emailing us at
privacy@opensignal.com
.
Access. You may request that, for personal information we disclose, the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, the categories of personal information that we have disclosed about you for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties to whom each category of personal information was disclosed. To exercise this right, you must provide a verifiable consumer request by either calling us at (+44) 020 3289 3375, or by emailing us at
privacy@opensignal.com
.
Opt out of sale. We do not sell your personal information within the meaning of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“
CCPA
”). Under the CCPA, “sell” means sell, rent, release, disclose, disseminate, make available, transfer, or otherwise communicate orally, in writing, or by electronic or other means a consumer’s personal information by the business to another business or a third party for monetary or other valuable consideration. The law contains exceptions to this definition which may limit how we respond to a request by you. To exercise this right to opt out, you may call us at (+44) 020 3289 3375 or email us at
privacy@opensignal.com
. We do not have actual knowledge that we sell the personal information of minors under 18 years of age, and minors under the age of 18 may not use the Opensignal Services.
In addition, there are, consistent with relevant laws, limitations on our ability to honor requests to exercise these rights for data that cannot be linked to a verified request, such as where data has been depersonalized, or whether there are other relevant exceptions under California law.
We do not provide a right to limit our use of sensitive personal information, because in the event that we collect certain sensitive personal information, we do not use it to infer characteristics such that we would be required to provide a right to limit.
To the extent that anything in this Section 10 conflicts with this Privacy Policy, this Section 10 shall govern.
The categories of California consumers’ personal data we may have collected are listed above in the Section – HOW WE COLLECT AND USE YOUR DATA. We may disclose the following categories of data to our customers, although personal information is aggregated or depersonalized before it is shared: (1) Location, (2) Identifiers such as IP address, and (3) Internet or other electronic network activity information, all of which we have collected from your mobile device. We may collect the categories we’ve previously identified (which include GPS coordinates or similar information), network type, network operator, cellular and Wifi signal strength and quality, and the identifiers of connected cell towers and Wifi routers (including both BSSID and SSID). We also measure how data is flowing, both passively (by monitoring how fast it moves through other Mobile Applications), and actively (by running a test that downloads or uploads data within our SDK). We do not monitor the content of your data usage. The goal of collecting the above data is to measure the experience you have of wireless networks. We also collect information from environmental sensors on your device (depending on which ones are integrated in your device), this allows us to measure things such as the device acceleration, orientation and the external atmospheric pressure and light intensity. We also measure some internal device conditions – such as battery temperature and voltage. The goal of collecting this data is to understand how instantaneous device conditions affect the experience of wireless networks.
To better understand differences between devices, we collect data on your device hardware such as the model, manufacturer, and manufacturers and models of sub-components (such as the cellular radio) and the capabilities of these components (for example the number of cores on the CPU). Similarly, to understand differences caused by software, we collect information on the mobile platform version used and whether custom ROMs or Android skins are installed. The goal of collecting this data is to understand how device properties affect the experience of wireless networks.
When you first use a Mobile Application an identification code (“Resettable ID”), is randomly generated by our software and allocated to that installation instance rather than the device whenever we take measurements. A different and unique Resettable ID will be generated by each Mobile Application on a particular device. New installations of the same Mobile Application will also generate new unique Resettable IDs. Resettable IDs are random, unrelated to each other, specific to Opensignal, and not shared externally. To further help us manage the data, we also collect IP addresses, as these may indicate which telecom carrier network is being accessed and is impacting your experience.
We use this data for the purposes listed above in the Section – THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH WE USE YOUR DATA. Measurements that we take from the mobile devices of individual network users allow us to create a detailed picture of the service availability, quality and performance of numerous communication networks across the world and over time.
We may have shared certain categories of personal data listed in the Section - HOW WE COLLECT AND USE YOUR DATA to the third parties listed in the Section - HOW WE SHARE PERSONAL INFORMATION for a business purpose and in order to provide the Opensignal Services. We may have shared the following categories of personal information: (1) Location, (2) Identifiers, such as IP addresses, and (3) Internet or other electronic network activity information, all of which we have collected from your mobile device. We may have shared the following categories of personal data with the following third parties or may do so in the following instances:
Service Providers
.
We may share datasets containing personal data with third-party service providers that perform services on our behalf in connection with the Opensignal Services, such as cloud service providers for storage and the processing required for depersonalization. Where this information is shared with such third parties, we obligate the third-party service provider to manage the information only on our behalf, and on our written instructions and solely for our benefit (and not for its own benefit).
Business Change
.
If we become involved in a merger, consolidation, acquisition, sale of assets, joint venture, securities offering, bankruptcy, reorganization, liquidation, dissolution or other transaction, or if the ownership of all or substantially all of our business otherwise changes, we may share or transfer databases containing personal data to successor party or parties in connection with such transaction or change in ownership or legal structure.
Necessary Disclosure
.
Regardless of the choices you make regarding your information and to the extent permitted or required by applicable law, we may disclose information about you to third parties to: (i) enforce or apply the terms and conditions of the Opensignal Services; (ii) comply with laws, subpoenas, warrants, court orders, legal processes or requests of government or law enforcement officials; (iii) protect our rights, reputation, safety or property, or that of our users or others; (iv) protect against legal liability; (v) establish or exercise our rights to defend against legal claims; or (vi) investigate, prevent or take action regarding known or suspected illegal activities; fraud; our rights, reputation, safety or property, or those of our users or others; violation of the Terms of Use, our policies or agreements; or as otherwise required by law.
Subsidiaries and affiliates
.
We may share the data that we collect from users’ mobile devices with the Opensignal subsidiaries and affiliates, with the purpose of bringing together complementary data on consumer experience, network performance, and subscriber behavior.
Shine the Light Notice
Section 1798.83 of the California Civil Code permits California residents to request from a business, with whom the California resident has an established business relationship, certain information about the types of personal information the business has shared with third parties for those third parties’ direct marketing purposes, and the names and addresses of the third parties with whom the business has shared such information during the immediately preceding calendar year. You may make one request each year by emailing us at
privacy@opensignal.com
with "Request for California Privacy information" in the subject line, or by writing us at the address listed at the end of this Policy.
11. NOTICE FOR RESIDENTS OF NEVADA, VIRGINIA AND BRAZIL
11.1 Your Nevada Privacy Rights
Senate Bill No. 220 (May 29, 2019) amends Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes to permit a Nevada consumer to direct an operator of an internet website or online service to refrain from making any sale of any covered information the operator has collected or will collect about that consumer. You may submit a request pursuant to this directive by emailing us at
privacy@opensignal.com
. We will provide further information about how we verify the authenticity of the request and your identity.
11.2 Your Rights Under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act
If you are a resident of Virginia, you have certain rights regarding your personal data under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA). This notice applies to natural persons who are residents of Virginia acting only in an individual or household context. It does not apply to natural persons acting in a commercial or employment context. To exercise any of these rights, please contact us at
privacy@opensignal.com
. We will provide further information about how we verify the authenticity of the request and your identity.
11.3 Your Rights Under the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (Brazil)
If you are a resident of Brazil, you have certain rights regarding your personal data under the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD). This notice includes information such as our purposes of personal data processing, the rights you have regarding our processing of your personal data, and how to contact Opensignal if you have any questions or requests regarding our processing of your personal data. To exercise any of these rights, please contact us at
privacy@opensignal.com
. We will provide further information about how we verify the authenticity of the request and your identity.
12. AGGREGATED OR DEPERSONALIZED INFORMATION
We may share aggregated or depersonalized data relating to users of the Opensignal Services with affiliated or unaffiliated third parties for any purpose.
13. CHANGES TO THE PRIVACY POLICY
We may update this Policy from time to time, and the updated version of this Policy will be effective upon posting on the Opensignal website. Please check this page to review the most up-to-date version of this Policy.
14. QUESTIONS / CONTACTING US
If you want to exercise your rights under paragraphs 9, 10 or 11 of our Privacy Policy, please email
privacy@opensignal.com
with "Data Subject Request" in the subject line, or contact us by mail addressed to:
Opensignal Limited
7 Bell Yard,
London, WC2A 2JR
United Kingdom
Our Data Protection Officer (DPO) can be reached at
dpo@opensignal.com
15. EU LOCAL REPRESENTATIVE
In compliance with Article 27 of GDPR, Opensignal has designated Ametros Group Ltd as EU Local Representative:
Ametros Limited
Unit 3D - North Point House - North Point Business Park
New Mallow Road
Cork – Ireland
Last revised date: September 2, 2024
Sign up to our newsletter to receive the latest Opensignal reports in your inbox
Subscribe
Sign up to our newsletter to receive the latest Opensignal reports in your inbox
Your region*
Africa
Asia Pacific
Europe
India
Latin America
Middle East
US & Canada
You may unsubscribe from these communications at anytime.
Cookie Control Close Icon
This site uses cookies to store information on your computer.
Some of these cookies are essential, while others help us to improve your experience by providing insights into how the site is being used.
For more detailed information on the cookies we use, please check our
Privacy Policy
(Opens in a new window)
External Link Icon
I Accept
I Do Not Accept
Necessary Cookies
Necessary cookies enable core functionality such as page navigation and access to secure areas. The website cannot function properly without these cookies, and can only be disabled by changing your browser preferences.
Analytical cookies help us to improve our website by collecting and reporting information on its usage...
Analytical Cookies
On
Off
Marketing cookies help us to better understand you and the way you use our site to help us deliver the best possible products and services.
Marketing Cookies
On
Off
About this tool
(Opens in a new window)
External Link Icon
Cookie Control
Sub-policy 3
https://www.aerisweather.com/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
(Effective as of 2020-06-01, Ref. DOC229710-D)
Vaisala Privacy Policy has been translated into several languages. In the event of any discrepancies, the English language version shall prevail, and other translations are provided for convenience only.
Your privacy is important to Vaisala Oyj and its affiliates in the Vaisala Group of Companies (Vaisala Oyj and the Vaisala Group of Companies collectively “Vaisala”). This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) sets forth Vaisala’s data processing practices for:
managing Vaisala’s customer relationships;
using personal data of potential customer for marketing purposes;
managing Vaisala’s supplier and business partner relationships;
Vaisala’s online store operations and Vaisala-operated web sites (such sites collectively “Site”); and
providing Vaisala’s other online services (against a fee or as a free trial).
Vaisala collects and processes personal data in accordance with the applicable laws and this Policy.
Purposes and types of personal data Vaisala processes
Managing customer relationships; online store operations and the Site
Vaisala typically collects and processes personal data of the contact persons of Vaisala's customers, the Site visitors and the users of the online store. Personal data is collected directly from the customer’s contact person in connection with the customer requesting a quotation or placing an order for Vaisala’s products or services, from the use of the Site or directly from the customer’s contact person through the registration process to the online store.
The personal data collected and processed by Vaisala may include:
Contact details (e.g. name, email address, phone number);
Other relevant information provided by you when you register to the online store, or order a newsletter or other information asset at the Site; and
Information collected of you when you use the Vaisala online store (e.g. IP-address, web log data).
Personal data is used for the following purposes:
Providing the products or services (such as shipping the product or making the service available to the customer), and for managing and developing the customer relationship;
Marketing activities (such as targeted email marketing and personalizing the Site);
Developing services and enhancing user experience (such as by optimizing and personalizing the Site).
The grounds for processing of personal data is either fulfilment of an agreement concluded between Vaisala and the customer, or the legitimate interest of Vaisala which consists of managing quotations and receiving orders, as well as developing and managing the customer relationship, business functions, marketing and communications.
Providing online services
For online services, Vaisala collects and processes personal data of users, who may be customer’s employees, contractors or other individuals to whom customer has created a user account or otherwise provided access to the service, in accordance with terms and conditions of the respective service. Personal data is collected directly from the administrator of the service when creating user accounts and/or from the user when using the service.
The personal data collected and processed by Vaisala may include:
Contact details (e.g. name, email address, phone number); and
Information collected of you when you use the online services (e.g. IP-address, web log data).
Personal data is used for the following purposes:
Creating a user account and granting access to the service;
Providing the online service and for debugging purposes; and
Modifying, personalizing and improving the service.
The grounds for processing of personal data is either fulfilment of an agreement concluded between Vaisala and the customer, or the legitimate interest of Vaisala to provide the service to the users.
Marketing
Vaisala may receive and collect personal data (including e.g. name and email) from marketing data bases provided to Vaisala by third parties or public sources such as Google, LinkedIn, and different business related organisations’ and events’ member and participant lists that have relevance to Vaisala’s business operations.
Personal data is used for the following purposes:
Contacting the prospective customers; and
Marketing activities (such as targeted email marketing).
The grounds for processing of personal data is the legitimate interest of Vaisala to promote and market services to potential customers.
Suppliers and business partners
Vaisala typically collects and processes personal data of suppliers’ and business partners’ representatives for the purposes of fulfilment of an agreement concluded between Vaisala and the company that the data subject represents.
Personal data is used for the fulfilment of the agreement and managing the relationship between Vaisala and the supplier/business partner.
The grounds for processing of personal data is either fulfilment of an agreement between Vaisala and the supplier/business partner or the legitimate interest of Vaisala in managing the supplier/business partner relationship.
Transfers of personal data
Vaisala does not transfer or disclose your personal data to a third party without your permission, except when necessary for processing a request for quotation or fulfilling an order, including without limitation, providing necessary information to relevant finance-related companies, logistics and transport service providers and authorized after-sales service providers, as well as responding to your requests or answering your inquiries, or as necessary for protecting Vaisala’s, its Site users’ and/or the public’s rights, property and/or safety.
Vaisala may share personal data within the Vaisala Group of Companies for the purposes described in this Policy. Such sharing may involve transferring data to and from other countries in which Vaisala operates, has business activities or is otherwise present. Vaisala may use third party service providers in implementing its marketing campaigns. For the purposes of the implementation of such marketing campaigns, Vaisala may transfer personal data to third party service providers.
Additionally, Vaisala may share your contact details and online behaviour data, such as Site visits, with sales channel partners for the purpose of sales and marketing of Vaisala’s products and services.
Because Vaisala is committed to protecting your privacy, Vaisala does not sell or transfer personal data to third parties for their promotional purposes.
Vaisala may transfer your information both in and out of the European Union. Such transfers will be carried out in compliance with applicable laws and necessary safeguards, such as EU Commission’s standard contractual clauses, adequacy decisions, binding corporate rules, or US Privacy Shield framework, in order to ensure adequate level of protection for personal data.
Protecting personal data
Vaisala endeavours to take commercially reasonable technical and organizational measures to prevent unauthorized access to and improper use of your personal data. Vaisala maintains an Information Security Management System to secure information, including personal data. Information is considered secured only when its integrity can be maintained, its availability ensured and its confidentiality preserved. Vaisala’s information security policies and procedures ensure the protection of information from unauthorized viewing, modification, dissemination, or destruction and provide the necessary recovery mechanisms from accidental as well as malicious destruction, alteration or loss. Access to the personal data is limited only to those Vaisala’s employees, directors, officers, contractors, and service providers who need to process the personal data as a part of their duties.
Retention of personal data
Vaisala retains personal data for a reasonable period of time, not exceeding any legal requirements or limitations. Personal data will be deleted in accordance with Vaisala’s data retention procedures.
Disclosures required by law
If Vaisala is compelled by law, court order or other judicial process to disclose any personal data to a court or a third party, Vaisala will attempt to give you prior notice using the contact information you have provided. You hereby authorize Vaisala to disclose any information collected of you for any of the above-mentioned purposes, including without limitation, disclosing information in connection with an investigation of intellectual property infringements or other activity that is illegal or may expose Vaisala to legal liability.
Your rights
You may at any time exercise your right to request access to your personal data and/or right to have incomplete, incorrect, unnecessary or outdated personal data deleted or updated by contacting Vaisala. You also have the right to request restriction of, or object to, the processing of your personal data, when applicable. Please note that by requesting Vaisala to delete your personal data, Vaisala may not be able to provide you or your employer company the products, services or information you have inquired or ordered. You are always entitled to lodge a complaint with a competent data protection authority.
Cookies
The Site can be used for informational purposes without revealing your identity to Vaisala and without providing Vaisala any personal data.
However, Vaisala uses “cookies” in order to recognize a returning visitor as a unique user. Cookies are pieces of data stored on your computer's hard drive, and not on the Site. Cookies themselves do not contain any personal data. By showing how and when our visitors use the Site, Vaisala can continue improving them. If you do not wish to receive cookies, or want to be notified when they are placed, you may set your web browser to do so, if your browser permits. If you refuse the cookies, Vaisala does not gather any information on your visit, but doing so will require you to re-enter certain information at each visit, or prevent Vaisala from customizing the Site’s features according to your preferences.
Vaisala may link the information stored in the cookies to any personal data you submit through online forms while visiting the Site. Further, Vaisala tracks aggregate statistics, such as Internet protocol address, your computer's operating system, your browser type and the address of any referring websites, and general information about the Site’s traffic patterns and related information. Vaisala collects and processes personal data of the Site visitors to create a personalized Site experience.
Policy changes
Vaisala may change this Policy, or change, modify or withdraw access to the Site, or the content of the Site at any time with or without notice. The effective date of this version of this Policy has been posted above for your reference. If Vaisala changes this Policy resulting in a material, adverse change in the way Vaisala collects or processes your personal data, Vaisala will post a notice of such change on the Site.
Contact Details
Your personal data is processed by Vaisala Oyj, a company organized and existing under the laws of Finland whose registered office is at Vanha Nurmijärventie 21, FI-01670, Finland. This Policy is governed by the Finnish law, excluding its choice of law provisions.
You may contact Vaisala at any time in order to check personal data collected by Vaisala. Vaisala can be contacted by sending an email to the following address: privacy [at] vaisala.com.
Vaisala strives to solve any disagreements through negotiations but needs to point out that you have the right to lodge a complaint with a competent supervisory authority.
Sub-policy 4
https://www.mapbox.com/legal/privacy:
Products
Maps
Navigation
Search
Data
Self-Hosted
Maps Overview
NEW
Smooth, fast, cross-platform maps
Overview →
Mapbox GL JS
NEW
Immersive maps for web
Mobile Maps SDK
NEW
Powerful maps for iOS and Android
Studio
NEW
Beautiful, custom map designs
Static Maps
NEW
Embed map images
Mapbox Tiling Service
NEW
Host and add custom map data
Over 100 global cities with 3D landmarks in Mapbox Standard
Read more
→
Navigation Overview
NEW
Custom navigation services
Overview →
Navigation for Automotive
NEW
In-vehicle infotainment and navigation services
MapGPT
NEW
A location-intelligent AI assistant
Autopilot Map
NEW
Precision data for autopilot systems
Navigation for Mobile
NEW
Routing and directions for iOS & Android
Mapbox for EV
NEW
EV navigation solutions
Matrix API
NEW
Calculate travel time and distance
Mapbox Autopilot Map allows vehicles to drive themselves on more roads
Read more
→
Search Overview
NEW
Smart location data and search features
Overview →
Geocoding
NEW
Geolocate and validate addresses
Search Box
NEW
User-friendly search interface
Address Autofill
NEW
Autocomplete for address forms
Search anywhere, go anywhere: Empowering users with the Mapbox Search SDKs
Read more
→
Data Overview
NEW
Unique, high-value geospatial datasets
Overview →
Traffic Data
NEW
Live and typical traffic conditions
Movement Data
NEW
Population patterns through space and time
Boundaries
NEW
Official boundaries around the world
Enhanced data coverage with Mapbox Movement V4
Read more
→
Atlas
NEW
On-premise or private cloud solutions
New 3D urban environments improve location awareness
Read more →
Solutions
On-Demand Logistics
Boost customer satisfaction and delivery performance
Weather
Deliver accurate, real-time weather information
Real Estate
Visualize property listings, rentals, and market data
Automotive
Integrated navigation experiences for in-vehicle and companion apps
Telecommunications
Map real-time coverage and optimize network operations
Travel
Plan, book, and explore the world all in one place
Outdoors
Detailed maps for athletes and adventures
Business Intelligence
Enhance data analysis with location intelligence
Retail
On-brand store locators and e-commerce solutions
Developers
documentation
Maps
Navigation
Search
Data
See All Docs
→
connect
Developer Discord
Online community to discuss projects and help fellow devs
Stack Overflow
Share and search technical questions and solutions
Github
Submit bugs, share requests, and track releases
Get Support
Self-serve resources, account help, and technical assistance
Developer Network
Contract independent developers
links
Developer Quickstart
Overview of developer resources
Developer Cheat Sheet
Snapshot overview of Mapbox services
Help & Troubleshooting
Find answers and get help
API Playgrounds
Demo spaces to experiment with Mapbox
Developer Tools
Web-based tools to help build with Mapbox
API Status
Real-time data on system performance
Company
Company
Who we are
About our company mission and history
What we value
About what drives us
What we do
About Mapbox technologies and data
Careers
Work at Mapbox
HIRING
Opportunities to join our team
Life at Mapbox
How we support your career
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion
Building a Mapbox for everyone
impact
Sustainability
Environmental and social responsibility
Social Impact
Support for non-profits and positive impact organizations
follow us
LinkedIn
X
Youtube
Instagram
Discord
Github
Blog
Resources
News
Blog
NEW
Stay updated on product launches and new features
Newsroom
The latest Mapbox news and press resources
Events
Connect with Mapbox at virtual and in-person events
Learn
Customer Showcase
NEW
See customer use cases and impact across industries
Webinars
NEW
Live and on-demand videos about building with Mapbox
Videos
NEW
How-to videos, developer spotlights, event recordings, and more
Get Help
Support
NEW
Flexible options for fast and expert help
Education
NEW
Resources for students and instructors
Security
NEW
Protect the security of your account, data, and users.
featured showcase
Indoor map innovation powered by Mapbox 3D visualizations...
Read more
→
Pricing
English
日本語
Contact Us
Contact us
Log in
Sign up
Sign in
Sign up
Contact us
Go to account
English
日本語
Go to account
Contact Sales
Log in
Sign up free
Products
Maps
Navigation
Data
Self-Hosted
Search
Back
Maps Overview
NEW
Smooth, fast, cross-platform maps
Mapbox GL JS
Immersive maps for web
Mobile Maps SDK
Powerful maps for iOS and Android
Studio
Beautiful, custom map designs
Mapbox Tiling Service
Host and add custom map data
Static Maps
Embed map images
Back
Navigation Overview
NEW
Custom navigation services
Navigation for Automotive
NEW
In-vehicle infotainment and navigation services
Navigation for Mobile
NEW
Routing and directions for iOS & Android
MapGPT
NEW
A location-intelligent AI assistant
Autopilot Map
NEW
Precision data for autopilot systems
Mapbox for EV
NEW
EV navigation solutions
Matrix API
NEW
Calculate travel time and distance
Back
Search Overview
NEW
Smart location data and search features
Geocoding
NEW
Geolocate and validate addresses
Search Box
NEW
User-friendly search interface
Address Autofill
NEW
Autocomplete for address forms
Back
Data Overview
NEW
Unique, high-value geospatial datasets
Traffic Data
NEW
Live and typical traffic conditions
Movement Data
NEW
Population patterns through space and time
Boundaries
NEW
Official boundaries around the world
Back
Atlas
NEW
On-premise or private cloud solutions
Solutions
On-Demand Logistics
Boost customer satisfaction and delivery performance
Automotive
Integrated navigation experiences for in-vehicle and companion apps
Business Intelligence
Enhance data analysis with location intelligence
Weather
Deliver accurate, real-time weather information
Telecommunications
Map real-time coverage and optimize network operations
Outdoors
Detailed maps for athletes and adventures
Retail
On-brand store locators and e-commerce solutions
Real Estate
Visualize property listings, rentals, and market data
Travel
Plan, book, and explore the world all in one place
Developers
documentation
Maps
Navigation
Search
Data
See All Docs →
connect
Developer Discord
Stack Overflow
Github
Get Support
Developer Network
links
Developer Quickstart
Developer Cheat Sheet
Help & Troubleshooting
API Playgrounds
Developer Tools
API Status
Company
company
Who we are
What we value
What we do
Careers
Work at Mapbox
HIRING
Life at Mapbox
Diversity, Equity & Inclusion
impact
Sustainability
Social Impact
follow us
LinkedIn
X
Youtube
Discord
Instagram
TikTok
Github
Blog
Resources
News
Blog
Newsroom
NEW
Events
NEW
learn
Customer Showcase
Webinars
Videos
get help
Support
Education
Security
featured showcase
Indoor map innovation powered by Mapbox 3D visualizations...
Read more →
Pricing
Sign up
Log in
Go to account
Contact Us
Terms of Service
Overview
Master Services Agreement
Government Terms
Product Terms
Privacy Policy
Overview
Product Privacy Policy
DPA
Sub-processors
Cookies
Privacy & Security FAQ
Data Subject Request
Communication Preferences
Support Services
Overview
SLA
Terms of Service
Master Services Agreement
Product Terms
Government Terms
Marketplace Terms
Japan Legal Terms
Privacy Policy
Product Privacy Policy
DPA
Sub-processors
Cookies
Privacy & Security FAQ
Data Subject Request
Communication Preferences
Support Service Agreement
SLA
Responsible Procurement Policy
‍
Mapbox Privacy Policies
‍
Privacy Policy
‍
Product Privacy Policy
‍
California Notices At Collection
‍
Privacy Policy "California Notice At Collection"
Product Privacy Policy "California Notice At Collection"
‍
*For all customers in Japan, please visit Mapbox's
Japan Privacy Policy
ジャパンプライバシーポリシー.
Privacy Policy
This privacy policy describes the personal data Mapbox and/or its affiliates (hereinafter collectively referred to as “Mapbox”) may receive and why such personal data may be received in its capacity as a data controller, how such personal data may be used (including whom it may be shared with and for what purposes), and choices about such personal data.
This privacy policy applies to the extent Mapbox processes personal data in its capacity as a data controller under the GDPR (or “business” under the CCPA) when an individual: (a) visits and engages with any of Mapbox’s websites, (b) attends a virtual or in-person Mapbox event, (c) provides contact information for the purposes of Mapbox contacting about Mapbox products/services, (d) uses third-party websites or applications that cite this privacy policy, (e) provide billing information for Mapbox products/services account administration, or (f) apply to or are contacted about possible employment with Mapbox. Personal data is any information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household, as defined in the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100 et seq. and its implementing regulations (“CCPA”), or relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (hereinafter referred to as "personal data").
This Privacy Policy does not apply when Mapbox acts as a data processor.  Most Mapbox customer personal data is not governed by this policy. Mapbox operates in the capacity of a data processor for certain personal data when operating Mapbox’s  products/services that are purchased by developers and businesses to develop their own licensed applications. As such, customers/prospective customers should read Mapbox’s data processing addendum (“DPA”):
https://www.mapbox.com/legal/dpa
which governs certain customer personal data that may be processed through use of Mapbox products/services including creation of a Mapbox products/services account. For other data not Processed by Mapbox as a Processor, e.g. billing and usage statistics data, see
Mapbox's Product Privacy Policy
.
Corporate Accounts: If any account created with Mapbox lists a corporate email address for a company with which an individual is currently (or was formerly) employed (a “Corporate Email”), then the corporate entity to whom the Corporate Email pertains is responsible for privacy practices relating to use of Corporate Email. If Corporate Email is used within the scope of this privacy policy (as described at the top of this privacy policy), then this privacy policy applies.  For clarification, commonly known personal email account services (e.g., Gmail, Yahoo, Outlook) are not Corporate Email.
Personal Data Mapbox May Receive
‍
Identifiers: Such as, name, address, email, phone number, Mapbox account username.
Commercial information: Such as, transaction data including billing contact’s name, work phone number, work email, work address, professional title, and company name.
Financial data: Such as, credit card data is
not
processed by Mapbox. Instead, credit card data is processed by Stripe, a third-party PCI-certified payment service provider, in accordance with its
Privacy Policy
.
Internet or other network or device activity: When visiting any Mapbox websites, Mapbox automatically receives certain information such as: (a) browser and device type, (b) operating system, and (c) referring web pages including the pages visited on such sites. And information such as, IP address, data collected via strictly necessary and accepted website cookies / similar technologies. For information about cookies on Mapbox’s website, settings, and how to change browser cookie settings, please visit Mapbox’s website
here
.
Employment data: Such as, education and employment history and other relevant personal data provided in an employment application submitted to Mapbox, information from a background check including information provided from reference checks.
Location information: Such as, the location of an event where an individual signed up to receive communication or interact with Mapbox.
User-generated content: Such as, a public comment provided by an individual in a Mapbox hosted webinar, Mapbox blog, or like Mapbox forum. For avoidance of doubt, an individual’s Mapbox product/service feedback does not constitute user-generated content.
Inference data about an individual: Such as, services Mapbox thinks an individual may be interested in based on prior purchases or website browsing, subject to the
Mapbox cookie policy
.
Other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with an individual: Such as, contents of correspondence with: 1) a Mapbox service provider in order to bill for items that may have been shipped upon an individual’s request as a result of the individual’s engagement with a Mapbox marketing campaign in person or virtually. 2) Mapbox, whether received through a form submitted on its website, conversation (in person, virtual, or phone call) with its staff, or via an email sent to an [at]mapbox email account. 3) And such as, personal data from entities who provide personal data about individuals, their job functions, and the companies they work for. Such entities attests to Mapbox that they have obtained all necessary consents and have lawful grounds to share such personal data with Mapbox.
How Mapbox Uses Personal Data
Mapbox uses personal data to:
Provide, test, maintain/support, secure and improve Mapbox’s websites, to prevent fraud, misuse and cyberattacks, to calculate de-identified aggregate statistics, and for account administration/ billing purposes.
Send marketing information, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications (e.g., marketing newsletters, telemarketing calls, SMS or push notifications, information about Mapbox products, news or events) about Mapbox, its affiliates and partners.
Plan or host virtual or in person events, contests, or other programs.
Create and manage the recruitment system, job applications and a database of interested individuals and leads (including verifying the information provided to Mapbox) and assess and evaluate applicants skills and qualifications against the position(s) applied for.
Cooperate with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with Mapbox’s legal obligations.
Comply with applicable law.
‍
To Whom Mapbox May Disclose Personal Data
Mapbox may disclose personal data to:
Mapbox service providers who need to access such personal data in order to provide any of the services, or related services to those, outlined in Section 2 of this privacy policy. However, prior to sharing personal data with such parties, Mapbox will have a written agreement consistent with the obligations outlined in applicable data protection laws and regulations.
Advertising and analytics partners. Any secondary use or sharing of personal data obtained through the use of third party cookies by these third parties is subject to their respective privacy policies. For information about cookies on Mapbox’s website and how to change browser cookie settings, please visit Mapbox’s website
here
.
In response to a request so long as Mapbox believes disclosure is in accordance with, or required by, any applicable law, regulation or legal process.
If Mapbox has a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation, or disclosure of the personal data is reasonably necessary to enforce its terms of service, detect, prevent, or otherwise address threats to its platform, or protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Mapbox, its users, or the public as required or permitted by law.
In connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing or acquisition of all or a portion of Mapbox’s business by another company.
‍
International Transfers
Personal data may be processed by one or more Mapbox affiliates, processors, or service providers in order to operate Mapbox’s business – for example, in the United States for account administration and billing. Therefore, personal data may be processed outside of the location from which it was received. Mapbox ensures that the transfer of personal data offers an adequate level of protection and security, for instance by entering into the appropriate agreements that continuously ensure the same level of protective measures as set forth in applicable data protection laws and regulations and certification certification under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the “Data Privacy Framework” or “DPF”), and, if required, standard contractual clauses or alternative mechanism for the transfer of data as approved by the European Commission (Art. 46 GDPR) or other applicable regulators or legislators.
Mapbox’s Notice of Certification under the DPF, is available here:
https://www.mapbox.com/legal/notice-of-certification
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR INDIVIDUALS OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES
4.1 Legal bases for processing personal data:
Some countries require that companies only process personal data if they have a “legal basis” (or justifiable need) to process personal data. To the extent those laws apply, Mapbox’s legal bases to process personal data are as follows:
To comply with a legal obligation to which Mapbox, as a controller, is subject.
To protect the vital interests of an individual or of another natural person.
For the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by Mapbox as the controller or by an independent third party controller, except where the individual’s interests or fundamental rights and freedoms override such interests.
Performance of the contract.
Consent.
In all cases of data processing on the basis of legitimate interests, Mapbox considers the impact on the rights and freedoms of the individuals whose data may be part of the processing, and ensures that its processing activities do not contradict or place at unreasonable risk any such rights or freedoms. Mapbox has assessed that these legitimate interests are not overridden by the data protection interests or fundamental rights of any individuals. In all cases, Mapbox ensures that such processing is legal, fair, and reasonable.
Retention
Mapbox stores personal data for so long as it is needed to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, as described in Section 2 of this privacy policy.
Security
Mapbox takes steps designed to secure personal data in accordance with this privacy policy.  Unfortunately, no system is 100% secure, and Mapbox cannot ensure or warrant the security of any personal data it receives.  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, Mapbox does not accept liability for unintentional or accidental destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access.
‍
Children
Mapbox products/services, websites, events, and other communications are not intended or directed to children under the age of 18 (or other age of majority as required by local law), and Mapbox does not knowingly collect personal data from children. If the parent or legal guardian learns that their child has provided Mapbox with personal data without their consent, then they should contact Mapbox as set forth below in the Contact Mapbox section of this privacy policy. If Mapbox learns that it has collected personal data in violation of applicable law, it will promptly take steps to delete such personal data.
Choices About Personal Data
An individual may opt-out of processing of their personal data within the scope of this privacy policy at any time and prevent further Mapbox processing by contacting Mapbox as described below.
Email and Telephone Communications:
Click the unsubscribe link found at the bottom of the email received from Mapbox to opt out of receiving future commercial emails. Note that for current customers, Mapbox will continue to send non-promotional communications which may not be opted out of (e.g., communications regarding products/services or updates to Mapbox Terms or this privacy policy). Mapbox processes requests to be placed on do-not-mail, do-not-phone, and do-not-contact lists as required by applicable law.
Website logs and cookies:
Devices have settings to delete stored cookies and most browsers have the option to decline cookies. However, certain parts of Mapbox’s website (including pages that require login) will not be accessible if Mapbox cookies (first party cookies) are not accepted. In contrast, third-party cookies set by third parties for marketing and analytics purposes on Mapbox’s website can be disabled, in principle, without affecting access. For information about cookies on Mapbox’s website and how to change browser cookie settings, please visit the Mapbox website
here
.
In accordance with applicable law, the individual to whom the personal data pertains may have the following rights regarding their personal data:
Access/view personal data
Portability of personal data in a commonly machine readable format
Correct personal data where it is inaccurate or incomplete
Deletion of personal data
Restrict or object to processing of personal data
Opt-out of the sale of personal data, if applicable, where such requests are permitted by law and as defined in the CCPA.
To exercise your right to deletion of personal data, please complete the form
here
. For any other rights, please contact Mapbox at
privacy@mapbox.com
. In your email include  name, and request or question. To protect privacy, Mapbox will take steps to verify the identity of the requestor before fulfilling the request. Mapbox will process such requests in accordance with applicable laws. Although we encourage you to contact us if you have questions or complaints, you also have the right to lodge a complaint in the EU and UK with the appropriate supervisory authority in your jurisdiction. In some cases, these rights may be subject to exceptions, as permitted by applicable law.
Additional Information For California Residents
9.1 California Notice At Collection:
Personal Data Mapbox May Receive
‍
Identifiers: Such as, name, address, email, phone number, Mapbox account username.
Commercial information: Such as, transaction data including billing contact’s name, work phone number, work email, work address, professional title, and company name.
Financial data: Such as, credit card data is
not
processed by Mapbox. Instead, credit card data is processed by Stripe, a third-party PCI-certified payment service provider, in accordance with its
Privacy Policy
.
Internet or other network or device activity: When visiting any Mapbox websites, Mapbox automatically receives certain information such as: (a) browser and device type, (b) operating system, and (c) referring web pages including the pages visited on such sites. And information such as, IP address, data collected via strictly necessary and accepted website cookies / similar technologies. For information about cookies on Mapbox’s website, settings, and how to change browser cookie settings, please visit Mapbox’s website
here
.
Employment data: Such as, education and employment history and other relevant personal data provided in an employment application submitted to Mapbox, information from a background check including information provided from reference checks.
Location information: Such as, the location of an event where an individual signed up to receive communication or interact with Mapbox.
User-generated content: Such as, a public comment provided by an individual in a Mapbox hosted webinar, Mapbox blog, or like Mapbox forum. For avoidance of doubt, an individual’s Mapbox product/service feedback does not constitute user-generated content.
Inference data about an individual: Such as, services Mapbox thinks an individual may be interested in based on prior purchases or website browsing, subject to the
Mapbox cookie policy
.
Other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with an individual: Such as, contents of correspondence with: 1) a Mapbox service provider in order to bill for items that may have been shipped upon an individual’s request as a result of the individual’s engagement with a Mapbox marketing campaign in person or virtually. 2) Mapbox, whether received through a form submitted on its website, conversation (in person, virtual, or phone call) with its staff, or via an email sent to an [at]mapbox email account. 3) And such as, personal data from entities who provide personal data about individuals, their job functions, and the companies they work for. Such entities attests to Mapbox that they have obtained all necessary consents and have lawful grounds to share such personal data with Mapbox.
How Mapbox Uses Personal Data
Provide, test, maintain/support, secure and improve Mapbox’s websites, to prevent fraud, misuse and cyberattacks, to calculate de-identified aggregate statistics, and for account administration/ billing purposes.
Send marketing information, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications (e.g., marketing newsletters, telemarketing calls, SMS or push notifications, information about Mapbox products, news or events) about Mapbox, its affiliates and partners.
Plan or host virtual or in person events, contests, or other programs.
Create and manage the recruitment system, job applications and a database of interested individuals and leads (including verifying the information provided to Mapbox) and assess and evaluate applicants skills and qualifications against the position(s) applied for.
Cooperate with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with Mapbox’s legal obligations.
Comply with applicable law.
To Whom Mapbox May Disclose Personal Data
Mapbox service providers who need to access such personal data in order to provide any of the services, or related services to those, outlined in Section 2 of this privacy policy. However, prior to sharing personal data with such parties, Mapbox will have a written agreement consistent with the obligations outlined in applicable data protection laws and regulations.
Advertising and analytics partners. Any secondary use or sharing of personal data obtained through the use of third party cookies by these third parties is subject to their respective privacy policies. For information about cookies on Mapbox’s website and how to change browser cookie settings, please visit Mapbox’s website
here
.
In response to a request so long as Mapbox believes disclosure is in accordance with, or required by, any applicable law, regulation or legal process.
If Mapbox has a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation, or disclosure of the personal data is reasonably necessary to enforce its terms of service, detect, prevent, or otherwise address threats to its platform, or protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Mapbox, its users, or the public as required or permitted by law.
In connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing or acquisition of all or a portion of Mapbox’s business by another company.
Data Retention
Only for so long as Mapbox has a business purpose to retain and process such personal data.
Changes To This Privacy Policy
Mapbox will update this privacy policy at its own discretion from time to time to reflect changes in Mapbox’s practices, technologies, legal requirements, and other factors.
‍
Contact Mapbox
Mapbox would love to hear any questions, concerns, or feedback about this privacy policy or Mapbox’s data protection practices. Please contact Mapbox at privacy@mapbox.com.
Mapbox Product Privacy Policy
See Section 9 below for "California Notice At Collection"
Mapbox provides a location data platform that powers map and location services in a wide variety of web, mobile, game and embedded device applications. Mapbox customers are developers/companies who embed Mapbox software development kits (SDKs) or integrate with Mapbox application program interfaces (APIs) (collectively, “
Mapbox materials
”) in their licensed applications to enable maps and location features.
This product privacy policy
applies when Mapbox is processing personal data (sometimes referred to as personal information), from an end user of a licensed application (provided by Mapbox or one of its customers) that contains Mapbox materials, in its capacity (where legally applicable) as an independent data controller. For example, when Mapbox determines the purpose and means of processing such as making decisions about how to process personal data that benefits Mapbox customers generally, not just a single customer, Mapbox is processing as an independent data controller. In all cases, Mapbox’s processing of personal data continues to be controlled by its contracts with Mapbox customers, this product privacy policy and applicable data protection laws and regulations.
Personal data is any information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, or relating to an identified or identifiable natural person, or data defined as personal information or personal data under applicable data protection laws and regulations (in this policy, referred to as "
personal data
”).
Additional Privacy Policy:
Mapbox also processes as a data controller when individuals use any Mapbox website or engage with Mapbox marketing programs, including attending live or virtual events or applying for a job with Mapbox. Please see the applicable Mapbox privacy policy, available
here.
Personal Data Mapbox May Receive
Mapbox applies the principle of data minimization to its product development and operations in an effort to collect the least amount of personal data from the outset. The limited personal dataset that Mapbox may receive, outlined below, describes personal data categories and associated example data elements.  Please note, many data elements are only classified as personal data when combined with an associated IP address, other persistent identifier or data element capable of identifying or being reasonably linked to a natural person.
Data Category
Examples
Identifiers
Such as randomly generated billing ID, session ID & feedback ID (if given), and IP
address (to provide the service, for billing/security purposes and deleted after 30 days).
Commercial Information
Such as user agent, which may include an application ID (determined by the Mapbox customer
to identify its application), Mapbox customer’s account ID (so that Mapbox knows which company to bill)
and Mapbox product name(s) and version(s).
Internet or other
electronic network activity
Such as timestamp accompanying received data elements, and an end user’s abandonment of a
given navigation route/use of an alternate navigation route.
Geolocation Data
- Such as latitude and longitude, altitude, horizontal and vertical accuracy
(the session ID association is broken within 24 hours.)
- Applies only to Navigation SDK: If Mapbox Copilot is enabled, Mapbox receives detailed full trip trace files and search
results of navigation sessions. Mapbox Copilot is disabled by default and may only be enabled by Mapbox Navigation
customers (not end users) in their licensed applications.
- At any time, end users may change their location permissions for a given licensed application through their mobile
device and choose to disable access to location data. Such change may affect the designed functionality of the licensed application.
‍
Dash branded products and services
: In addition to the above categories of personal data, Mapbox may also collect the following categories of personal data (specific to its Dash branded products and services).
Data Category
Examples
Identifiers
The end users’ requests are associated with a randomly generated identifier in order for Dash
branded products and services to create a short-term and temporary profile required for
contextual conversations such as “hey Dash, remember the cafe you gave me directions to
yesterday? …”
Inferences
Inferences based on microphone (including voice inputs) and location data. For example,
if the end user asks about cafe’s, Dash branded products and services will infer that the
end user would like to know about cafe’s close to their location.
Conversation Data
Microphone data (including voice inputs).
Do not include sensitive information  to Dash branded products and services such as social
security number, bank account or other financial details, or special categories of Personal
Data such as, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical
beliefs, trade-union membership, genetic or biometric data, health and/or sex life.
‍
How Mapbox Uses Personal Data
Mapbox does not process personal data for the purposes of identifying an individual or creating or maintaining records about an individual. Instead, Mapbox processes personal data to:
Provide, test, maintain, secure and improve Mapbox products and services,
Provide customer requested support, including applying knowledge gained from individual customer support requests to benefit all Mapbox customers, to the extent such knowledge is de-identified,
Prevent fraud, misuse and cyberattacks,
Administer/bill customers (not end users),
Calculate de-identified aggregate statistics,
Train artificial intelligence models (to the extent personal data is first de-identified), which is a set of technologies and processes that allow computers to learn, reason, and assist in decision making; such models are used to improve Mapbox products and services,
Anonymize such data so it is no longer considered personal data,
Cooperate with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with Mapbox’s legal obligations, and
Comply with applicable law.
Mapbox processes de-identified data only in a de-identified form and does not permit attempts to re-identify such data or associate with a natural person.
Dash branded products and services
: In addition to the above uses of personal data, Mapbox may also use personal data in the following ways (specific to its Dash branded products and services).
Mapbox uses personal data for purposes that are compatible with those stated above such as providing and supporting the service. For Dash branded products and services, machine learning to develop and improve and fine tune Mapbox’s models is one of those purposes.
Third party independent controller vendors will process the data you provide to Dash branded products and services for their own purposes. For more information visit their respective privacy policies (linked in Section 3). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ use of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
‍
To Whom Mapbox May Disclose Personal Data
Mapbox may disclose personal data to:
Mapbox service providers who need to access such personal data in order to process in accordance  with Section 2 above.
In response to a request, so long as Mapbox believes disclosure is required by any applicable law, regulation or legal process.
If Mapbox has a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation, or disclosure of the personal data is reasonably necessary to enforce its terms of service, detect, prevent, or otherwise address threats to its platform, or protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Mapbox, its customers or their end users, or the public as required or permitted by law.
In connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing or acquisition or due diligence related thereto of all or a portion of Mapbox’s business by another company.
Dash branded products and services: In addition to the above parties that Mapbox may disclose personal data to, Mapbox may also disclose personal data to the following third party independent controllers (specific to its Dash branded products and services).
Certain functionality to instruct Dash branded products and services to process a question such as when the end user says “hey Dash” or touches the Dash branded products and services icon or starts typing a command. PicoVoice’s processing is subject to its published privacy practices available here: https://picovoice.ai/docs/privacy-policy/  (or successor link). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ processing of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
On-device speech-to-text (“STT”) vendor (which Mapbox has no control over and is selected by the end user based on their device) will transpose audio speech spoken to Dash branded products and services to a string of text and send it to Mapbox servers to answer the end users question. The on-device STT processing is subject to its respective published privacy practices, which you should review. Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ use of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
Large language model providers (“LLMs”), such as OpenAI review the end users voice input text and formulate a response to the end user. OpenAI’s processing is subject to its published privacy practices available here: https://openai.com/policies/privacy-policy (or successor link). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ processing of the data that the end user provides to Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ processing of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
Text-to-speech (“TTS”) vendors, such as Eleven labs transform the Mapbox appended LLM response to an audio MP3 file that is spoken (in audio form) to the requestor via Dash branded products and services. ElevenLabs processing is subject to its published privacy practices available here: https://elevenlabs.io/privacy (or successor link). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ use of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
‍
International Transfers
Personal data may be processed by one or more Mapbox affiliates, processors, or service providers in order to operate Mapbox’s business – for example, in the United States for account administration and billing. Therefore, personal data may be processed outside of the location from which it was received. Mapbox ensures that the transfer of personal data offers an adequate level of protection and security, for instance by entering into the appropriate agreements that continuously ensure the same level of protective measures as set forth in applicable data protection laws and regulations and certification certification under the EU-US, UK-US, Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework ("DPF"), and, if required, standard contractual clauses or alternative mechanism for the transfer of data as approved by the European Commission (Art. 46 GDPR) or other applicable regulators or legislators.
Mapbox’s Notice of Certification under the DPF, is available here:
https://www.mapbox.com/legal/notice-of-certification
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR INDIVIDUALS OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES
4.1 Legal bases for processing personal data:
Some countries require that companies only process personal data if they have a “legal basis” (or justifiable need) to process personal data. To the extent those laws apply, Mapbox’s legal bases to process personal data are as follows:
To comply with a legal obligation to which Mapbox, as a controller, is subject.
To protect the vital interests of an individual or of another natural person.
For the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by Mapbox as the controller or by an independent third party controller, except where the individual’s interests or fundamental rights and freedoms override such interests.
Performance of the contract.
Consent.
In all cases of data processing on the basis of legitimate interests, Mapbox considers the impact on the rights and freedoms of the individuals whose data may be part of the processing, and ensures that its processing activities do not contradict or place at unreasonable risk any such rights or freedoms. Mapbox has assessed that these legitimate interests are not overridden by the data protection interests or fundamental rights of any individuals. In all cases, Mapbox ensures that such processing is legal, fair, and reasonable.
Retention
Mapbox stores personal data for so long as Mapbox determines it is needed to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, as described in Section 2 above. In determining how long to retain personal data, Mapbox considers the amount, nature and sensitivity of the data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the data, the purposes for which personal data is processed, applicable legal requirements, and Mapbox’s legitimate interests. The purposes for which Mapbox processes data may dictate different retention periods for the same types of data. For example, Mapbox retains IP addresses for 30 days and after such time, in select instances, may need to extend such retention period for an investigation based on its legitimate interests to secure its products and services, prevent fraud and for legal compliance purposes.
Security
Mapbox takes steps designed to secure personal data in accordance with this product privacy policy.  Unfortunately, no system is 100% secure, and Mapbox cannot ensure or warrant the security of any personal data it receives.  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, Mapbox does not accept liability for unintentional or accidental destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access.
Children
Mapbox products and services are not intended or directed to children under the age of 18 (or other age of majority as required by local law), and Mapbox does not knowingly collect personal data from children. If the parent or legal guardian learns that their child has provided Mapbox with personal data without their consent, then they should contact Mapbox as set forth below in the Contact Mapbox section of this product privacy policy. If Mapbox learns that it has collected personal data in violation of applicable data protection laws and regulations, it will promptly take steps to delete such personal data.
Choices About Personal Data
To the fullest extent possible, Mapbox will fulfill data subject rights requests provided it can match a data subject (natural person to whom the personal data in question pertains) to personal data that Mapbox processes. Mapbox does not, and is not required to, collect additional personal data in order to positively identify a data subject.
As outlined in Section 1 above, Mapbox receives only minimal personal data and operates controls designed to promptly de-identify and anonymize such personal data. For example, Mapbox deletes IP addresses within 30 days of receipt (unless required for an investigation), so it is unlikely that Mapbox would have personal data capable of identifying a data subject after 30 days of receiving such data. However, if verifiable and detailed information is available, Mapbox will work with the data subject to determine if the request can reasonably be met. The data subject will need to provide a valid email address so that Mapbox can communicate and support the request, as well as any information that Mapbox determines may be needed to verify whether it holds any applicable personal data.
In accordance with applicable data protection laws and regulations and depending upon the data subject’s residency, the data subject to whom the personal data pertains may have the right to request the following regarding certain of their personal data:
Access/view/know personal data
Portability of personal data in a commonly machine readable format
Correct personal data where it is inaccurate or incomplete
Deletion of certain personal data
Restrict or object to processing of personal data
Opt-out of the “sale” or “share” or processing for “targeted advertising” (each as defined by applicable data protection laws and regulations) of personal data , if applicable, where such requests are permitted by law
To request deletion of certain personal data, please complete the form
here
. For any other request to exercise rights, please contact Mapbox at
privacy@mapbox.com
. The requesting email must come from the data subject to whom the personal data pertains and include the data subject’s name, email address and specific request or question. To protect privacy, Mapbox will take steps to verify the identity of the requestor before fulfilling the request. Mapbox will process such requests in accordance with applicable data protection laws and regulations.
To the extent required in the state where the data subject resides and where Mapbox has denied such data subject’s earlier request, the data subject may file an appeal with Mapbox for reconsideration. To file an appeal, please contact Mapbox at privacy@mapbox.com. The requesting email must come from the data subject to whom the personal data pertains and include the data subject’s name, email address and reference to the specific request and denial.
Mapbox encourages data subjects to contact it directly with any questions or complaints. However, Mapbox acknowledges and informs the data subject that they have the right to lodge a complaint in the EU and UK with the appropriate supervisory authority in the applicable jurisdiction; .; and in select United States states, to contact the respective state’s Attorney General’s Office, whose contact information may be identified here https://www.usa.gov/state-attorney-general (or successor link). In some cases, these rights may be subject to exceptions, as permitted by applicable law.
Additional Information For California Residents
9.1 California Notice At Collection:
Personal Data Mapbox May Receive
Mapbox applies the principle of data minimization to its product development and operations in an effort to collect the least amount of personal data from the outset. The limited personal dataset that Mapbox may receive, outlined below, describes personal data categories and associated example data elements.  Please note, many data elements are only classified as personal data when combined with an associated IP address, other persistent identifier or data element capable of identifying or being reasonably linked to a natural person.
Data Category
Examples
Identifiers
Such as randomly generated billing ID, session ID & feedback ID (if given), and IP
address (to provide the service, for billing/security purposes and deleted after 30 days).
Commercial Information
Such as user agent, which may include an application ID (determined by the Mapbox customer
to identify its application), Mapbox customer’s company name (so that Mapbox knows which company to bill)
and Mapbox product name.
Internet or other
electronic network activity
Such as timestamp accompanying received data elements, and an end user’s abandonment of a
given navigation route/use of an alternate navigation route.
Geolocation Data
- Such as latitude and longitude, altitude, horizontal and vertical accuracy
(an IP address is not associated with such geolocation data and the session ID association is broken within 24 hours.)
- Applies only to Navigation SDK: If Mapbox Copilot is enabled, Mapbox receives detailed full trip trace files and search
results of navigation sessions. Mapbox Copilot is disabled by default and may only be enabled by Mapbox Navigation
customers (not end users) in their licensed applications.
- At any time, end users may change their location permissions for a given licensed application through their mobile
device and choose to disable access to location data. Such change may affect the designed functionality of the licensed application.
‍
Dash branded products and services:
In addition to the above categories of personal data, Mapbox may also collect the following categories of personal data (specific to its Dash branded products and services).
Data Category
Examples
Identifiers
The end users’ requests are associated with a randomly generated identifier in order for Dash
branded products and services to create a short-term and temporary profile required for
contextual conversations such as “hey Dash, remember the cafe you gave me directions to
yesterday? …”
Inferences
Inferences based on microphone (including voice inputs) and location data. For example,
if the end user asks about cafe’s, Dash branded products and services will infer that the
end user would like to know about cafe’s close to their location.
Conversation Data
Microphone data (including voice inputs).
Do not include sensitive information  to Dash branded products and services such as social
security number, bank account or other financial details, or special categories of Personal
Data such as, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical
beliefs, trade-union membership, genetic or biometric data, health and/or sex life.
‍
How Mapbox Uses Personal Data
Mapbox does not process personal data for the purposes of identifying an individual or creating or maintaining records about an individual. Instead, Mapbox processes personal data to:
Provide, test, maintain, secure and improve Mapbox products and services,
Provide customer requested support, including applying knowledge gained from individual customer support requests to benefit all Mapbox customers, to the extent such knowledge is de-identified,
Prevent fraud, misuse and cyberattacks,
Administer/bill customers (not end users),
Calculate de-identified aggregate statistics,
Train artificial intelligence models (to the extent personal data is first de-identified), which is a set of technologies and processes that allow computers to learn, reason, and assist in decision making; such models are used to improve Mapbox products and services,
Anonymize such data so it is no longer considered personal data,
Cooperate with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with Mapbox’s legal obligations, and
Comply with applicable law.
Mapbox processes de-identified data only in a de-identified form and does not permit attempts to re-identify such data or associate with a natural person.
Dash branded products and services
: In addition to the above uses of personal data, Mapbox may also use personal data in the following ways (specific to its Dash branded products and services).
Mapbox uses personal data for purposes that are compatible with those stated above such as providing and supporting the service. For Dash branded products and services, machine learning to develop and improve and fine tune Mapbox’s models is one of those purposes.
Third party independent controller vendors will process the data you provide to Dash branded products and services for their own purposes. For more information visit their respective privacy policies (linked in Section 3). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ use of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
To Whom Mapbox May Disclose Personal Data
Mapbox may disclose personal data to:
Mapbox service providers who need to access such personal data in order to process in accordance  with Section 2 above.
In response to a request, so long as Mapbox believes disclosure is required by any applicable law, regulation or legal process.
If Mapbox has a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation, or disclosure of the personal data is reasonably necessary to enforce its terms of service, detect, prevent, or otherwise address threats to its platform, or protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Mapbox, its customers or their end users, or the public as required or permitted by law.
In connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing or acquisition or due diligence related thereto of all or a portion of Mapbox’s business by another company.
Dash branded products and services:
In addition to the above parties that Mapbox may disclose personal data to, Mapbox may also disclose personal data to the following third party independent controllers (specific to its Dash branded products and services).
Certain functionality to instruct Dash branded products and services to process a question such as when the end user says “hey Dash” or touches the Dash branded products and services icon or starts typing a command. PicoVoice’s processing is subject to its published privacy practices available here: https://picovoice.ai/docs/privacy-policy/  (or successor link). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ processing of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
On-device speech-to-text (“STT”) vendor (which Mapbox has no control over and is selected by the end user based on their device) will transpose audio speech spoken to Dash branded products and services to a string of text and send it to Mapbox servers to answer the end users question. The on-device STT processing is subject to its respective published privacy practices, which you should review. Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ use of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
Large language model providers (“LLMs”), such as OpenAI review the end users voice input text and formulate a response to the end user. OpenAI’s processing is subject to its published privacy practices available here: https://openai.com/policies/privacy-policy (or successor link). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ processing of the data that the end user provides to Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ processing of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
Text-to-speech (“TTS”) vendors, such as Eleven labs transform the Mapbox appended LLM response to an audio MP3 file that is spoken (in audio form) to the requestor via Dash branded products and services. ElevenLabs processing is subject to its published privacy practices available here: https://elevenlabs.io/privacy (or successor link). Mapbox has no control over third party independent controllers’ use of the data that the end user provides to Dash branded products and services.
‍
Data Retention
Mapbox stores personal data for so long as Mapbox determines it is needed to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, as described in Section 2 above. In determining how long to retain personal data, Mapbox considers the amount, nature and sensitivity of the data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the data, the purposes for which personal data is processed, applicable legal requirements, and Mapbox’s legitimate interests. The purposes for which Mapbox processes data may dictate different retention periods for the same types of data. For example, Mapbox retains IP addresses for 30 days and after such time, in select instances, may need to extend such retention period for an investigation based on its legitimate interests to secure its products and services, prevent fraud and for legal compliance purposes.
Changes to this Product Privacy Policy
Mapbox will update this product privacy policy at its own discretion from time to time to reflect changes in Mapbox’s practices, technologies, legal requirements, and other factors.
Contact Mapbox
Mapbox would love to hear any questions, concerns, or feedback about this product privacy policy or Mapbox’s data protection practices. Please contact Mapbox at privacy@mapbox.com.
Heading 1
Heading 2
Heading 3
Heading 4
Heading 5
Heading 6
Lorem ipsum dolor sit amet, consectetur adipiscing elit, sed do eiusmod tempor incididunt ut labore et dolore magna aliqua. Ut enim ad minim veniam, quis nostrud exercitation ullamco laboris nisi ut aliquip ex ea commodo consequat. Duis aute irure dolor in reprehenderit in voluptate velit esse cillum dolore eu fugiat nulla pariatur.
Block quote
Ordered list
Item 1
Item 2
Item 3
Unordered list
Item A
Item B
Item C
Text link
Bold text
Emphasis
Superscript
Subscript
Privacy & Security FAQ
Last Updated:  Aug 22, 2023
Mapbox provides a location data platform that powers maps and location services. Mapbox provides SDKs (software   development   kits)   and   APIs   (application   programming   interfaces),   which   businesses   and developers use to incorporate Mapbox mapping and navigation technologies into the licensed applications and  websites  they  make.  The  SDKs  contain  libraries  of  software  code  which  are  incorporated  into  a customer’s  licensed  application  or  website.  These  libraries  of  software  code  facilitate  API  requests  to Mapbox’s location data platform (which is a backend data server, hosted in the cloud (AWS-US)) which then responds with map and location content to the customer’s application or website.
In addition, Mapbox offers an on-premise version of its location data services, called Atlas.
No.
Mapbox does not sell personal data.
No.
For customers on a monthly active user (“MAU”) billing model, Mapbox maintains counts of MAUs for billing purposes only. Mapbox does not (and cannot) track an end user’s activity across billing cycles and does not build targeted profiles with the data processed through its products/services.
Data Category
Examples
Identifiers
Such as randomly generated billing ID, session ID & feedback ID (if given), and IP address (to provide the service, for billing/security purposes and deleted after 30 days).
Commercial Information
Such as user agent, which may include an application ID (determined by the Mapbox customer to identify its application), Mapbox customer’s account ID (so that Mapbox knows which company to bill) and Mapbox product name(s) and version(s). Such as data that an individual may upload to Mapbox products/services or otherwise provide to Mapbox in connection with support, or feedback that end  users  voluntarily  contribute  to  Mapbox  along  with  their  associated contact information.
Internet or other electronic network activity
Such as timestamp accompanying received data elements, an end user’s abandonment of a given navigation route / use of an alternate navigation route;
Such as connectivity and device data including device model and browser information, operating system, and contents of an API or SDK request.
Geolocation Data
Such as latitude and longitude, altitude, horizontal and vertical accuracy (the session ID association is broken within 24 hours.)Applies only to Navigation SDK: If Mapbox Copilot is enabled, Mapbox receives detailed full trip trace files and searchresults of navigation sessions. Mapbox Copilot is disabled by default and may only be enabled by Mapbox Navigationcustomers (not end users) in their licensed applications.At any time, end users may change their location permissions for a given licensed application through their mobiledevice and choose to disable access to location data. Such change may affect the designed functionality of the licensed application.
Mapbox applies the principle of data minimization to product development and operations in an effort to collect only limited  data  from  the  outset. Mapbox  operates  a  number  of  technical  and  organization measures regarding the limited personal dataset that we process, such as strict access controls and prompt deletion of raw log files that contain IP addresses and billing IDs. Mapbox deploys regular ID rotation and 1-way hashing for billing IDs, which must be retained for accounting and billing purposes, to minimize the ability  to  track  user  requests over time. Billing  IDs  are  not  transmitted with  unrelated  events,  further reducing  the  feasibility  of  correlating  a  user’s  activities  over  time.  In  addition, Mapbox operates  strict anonymization procedures, such as clipping traces, for telemetry events that send location data.
Communication   through   the   Internet   requires   the   presence   of   IP   addresses,   which   specify   each transmission’s  origin  and  destination.  When  end  users  engage  with  applications  that  access  Mapbox products/services through the Internet, the end user necessarily discloses their current IP address to one or more Mapbox servers. IP addresses are retained in cloudfront logs for 30 days for billing and customer usage reporting, unless involved in an ongoing security, anti-fraud, or misuse investigation.
Mapbox  receives  location  data  when  a  Mapbox  customer’s  end  users  uses  a  licensed  application  that incorporates Mapbox mobile SDKs and the end user has authorized the licensed application’s use of the end user’s device location via their mobile phone or device operating system.
Location  data  includes  fields  such  as  latitude  and  longitude,  altitude,  horizontal  and  vertical  accuracy,  a session  ID  rotating  every  24  hours,  and  origin  IP  address  (as  would  any  Internet  communication).   The  IP address that accompanies location data is retained at the load balancer (where it is used for security and PUBLISHED: Aug 22, 2023https://www.mapbox.com/legal/legal-faq Mapbox Customer FAQ, Page 3billing  purposes  and  discarded  after  30  days).  This  IP  address  is  not  forwarded  to  the  location  telemetry processing pipeline. Location data is encrypted in transit and at rest, and is subject to the principle of least access, with the minimal number of personnel and processes having access to it in its pre-aggregated form.
In the location data anonymization pipeline, the location data is then anonymized by clipping off the origin and destination of the trip and further dividing the trip into segments, which cannot be reassembled. The anonymized  location   data  is  then  used  to  improve  Mapbox  mapping  products,   including  the  Traffic  and Movement data products.
In AWS in the United States.
However, for performance purposes, Mapbox regularly caches content on its AWS  content  delivery  network  (“CDN”)  located  in  various  regions.  Mapbox  employees  who  work  for Mapbox wholly-owned subsidiaries may access personal data from the countries where they work in order to support, develop and provide Mapbox products/services.
No.
Mapbox’s  products/services  store  and  serve  source  data  from  an  AWS  primary  region  in  the  US.  As noted  above,  data  is  cached  and  served  out  of  various  regions  outside  the  US  for  performance  reasons, however  Mapbox  cannot  serve  its  data  from  one  limited  geographic  region.  To  comply  with  GDPR  and safeguard transfers to the US and other countries, please see
Mapbox's DPA, Schedule C
, which includes the Standard Contractual Clauses released in 2021 by the European Commission.
Yes.
Mapbox  carefully  scrutinizes  the  personal  data  it  processes  within  its  engineering  lifecycle,  which includes conducting a privacy review for new (or changed) processing activities. Mapbox follows privacy-by-design principles and works diligently to limit the personal data it processes from the outset. A DPIA is conducted in any situation in which processing of personal data may be considered high risk and not able to be accomplished in a lower risk manner.
Mapbox runs a global data protection program designed to operate in compliance with applicable global privacy laws, including: VCDPA
(Virginia, USA),
UCPA
(Utah, USA),
UK-GDPR
(UK),
TIPA
(Tennessee, USA),
TDPSA
(Texas, USA),
PIPEDA
(Canada),
MTCDPA
(Montana, USA),
LGPD
(Brazil),
IDPL
(Iowa, USA),
ICDPA
(Indianna,  USA),
GDPR
(Europe),
CTDPA
(Connecticut,  USA),
CCPA
and  its  implementing  regulations including
CPRA
(California,  USA),
CPA
(Colorado,  USA),  and
APPI
(Japan),  among  many  other  important jurisdictions.
‍
Mapbox’s privacy program is based on privacy by design, which includes monitoring for upcoming privacy laws  and  regulations  to  assess  whether  its  practices  may  need  to  be  adjusted  to  maintain  compliance; product/service  privacy  reviews;  data  breach  response  processes; and  operationalized  technical  and organizational measures designed to ensure the security of the personal data it receives including: security audits  and  SOC2  certification;  anonymization  &  pseudonymization  of  personal  data  (where  applicable); strict access control with logging; limited data retention periods.
Yes.
Mapbox  is  SOC2  Type  2  certified  with  a
summary  SOC3  report  available  for  customer  review
.   In addition, Mapbox earned and maintains Trusted Information Security Assessment Exchange (“TISAX”) and ISO 9001 certifications. Upon request and execution of an NDA, Mapbox may share a copy of its latest SOC2 report.
Mapbox welcomes any further questions you may have regarding its ongoing commitment to privacy and data security. Please contact Mapbox’s privacy office at privacy@mapbox.com.
Want to receive updates on our sub-processors?
Please subscribe below:
Stay tuned for updates!
Please enter an email address that includes @.
We care about your privacy
By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Manage Preferences
Decline All
Accept All
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 5
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024 |
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 6
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 7
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy:
Skip to main content
Build
More
Run
More
Solutions
Pricing
Docs
More
Community
More
Support
Go to console
Developer Support
Contact Support
Scope of no-cost support
Support Guides
Overview
FAQ
Security checklist
Launch checklist
Firebase-related service accounts
Troubleshoot initialization options
Enable the AdSupport framework
Dynamic Links deprecation
Deprecation FAQ
Export Dynamic Links metadata
Migrate to App Links & Universal Links
Migrate from Parse
Android
iOS+
Cloud Audit Logs
Firebase Management
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase App Check
Firebase Security Rules
Firebase Realtime Database
Android Device Streaming
Recent Changes and Updates
Release Notes
iOS Release Notes
Android Release Notes
JavaScript Release Notes
Flutter Release Notes
C++ Release Notes
Unity Release Notes
Admin Node.js Release Notes
Admin Java Release Notes
Admin Python Release Notes
Admin Go Release Notes
Admin .NET Release Notes
Security Rules Release Notes
Firebase CLI Release Notes
Policies for changes and versioning
Overview
Introducing and communicating changes
Versioning and maintenance
Legal Information
Terms of Service
Paid Services Terms
Data Processing and Security Terms
Firebase: Standard Contractual Clauses
Service Level Agreement for Hosting and Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase Service Level Agreement
Firebase App Indexing User Data Policy
Crashlytics and App Distribution Terms
Firebase Subprocessors
Privacy and Security Information
Privacy and Security in Firebase
Designate Data Protection Officers and EU Representatives
Firebase Data Privacy Inquiries
Manage Instance ID data
Clear and export users' data
Storing privacy settings with Firebase
Build
Go to Build
Build Products
App Check
App Hosting
Authentication
Cloud Functions
Cloud Storage
Data Connect
Extensions
Firebase ML
Firestore
Genkit
Hosting
Realtime Database
Vertex AI in Firebase
Generative AI
Run
Go to Run
Run Products
A/B Testing
App Distribution
Cloud Messaging
Crashlytics
Google Analytics
In-App Messaging
Performance Monitoring
Remote Config
Test Lab
Overview
Fundamentals
Build
Run
Reference
Samples
Learn
Events
Stories
Firebase
Support
Send feedback
Privacy and Security in Firebase
Stay organized with collections
Save and categorize content based on your preferences.
This page outlines Firebase's key security and privacy information. Whether
you're looking to kick off a new project with Firebase, or curious about how
Firebase works with your existing project, read on to see how Firebase can help
protect you and your users.
Last modified: February 20, 2025
Data protection
Firebase support for GDPR and CCPA
On May 25th, 2018, the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) replaced the
1995 EU Data Protection Directive. On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer
Privacy Act (CCPA) took effect. On January 1, 2023, the California Privacy
Rights Act (CPRA), which is a data privacy law that amends and expands upon the
CCPA, took effect. Google is committed to helping our customers succeed under
these privacy regulations, whether they are large software companies or
independent developers.
The GDPR imposes obligations on data controllers and data processors, and the
CCPA/CPRA imposes obligations on businesses and their service providers.
Firebase customers typically act as the "data controller" (GDPR) or "business"
(CCPA/CPRA) for any personal data or information about their end-users they
provide to Google in connection with their use of Firebase, and Google generally
operates as a "data processor" (GDPR) or "service provider" (CCPA/CPRA).
This means that data is under the customer's control. Customers are
responsible for obligations like fulfilling an individual's rights with respect
to their personal data or information.
Firebase Data Processing and Security Terms
When customers use Firebase, Google is generally a data processor under GDPR and
processes personal data on their behalf. Similarly, when customers use Firebase,
Google generally operates as a service provider under the CCPA/CPRA handling
personal information on their behalf. Firebase terms include
Data Processing
and Security Terms
detailing these
responsibilities.
Certain Firebase services governed by the
Google Cloud Platform (GCP) Terms of Service
are already covered by associated data processing terms, the
Cloud Data Processing Addendum
.
A complete list of Firebase services currently governed by the GCP Terms of
Service is available in the
Terms of Service for Firebase Services
.
Google Analytics is a separate service that can be used together with Firebase,
and is subject to separate
terms
.
Firebase is certified under major privacy and security standards
ISO and SOC compliance
All Firebase services (aside from App Indexing) have successfully completed the
ISO
27001
and
SOC
1
,
SOC
2
,
and
SOC 3
evaluation
process, and some have also completed the
ISO
27017
and
ISO
27018
certification
process. Compliance reports and certificates for Firebase services governed by
the GCP Terms of Service may be requested via the
Compliance Reports
Manager
.
Service name
ISO 27001
ISO 27017
ISO 27018
SOC 1
SOC 2
SOC 3
Cloud Firestore
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Functions for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Storage for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase A/B Testing
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Check
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Distribution
check
check
check
check
Firebase Authentication
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase Cloud Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase Crashlytics
check
check
check
check
Firebase Dynamic Links
check
check
check
check
Firebase Hosting
check
check
check
check
Firebase In-App Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase ML
check
check
check
check
Firebase Performance Monitoring
check
check
check
check
Firebase Platform
check
check
check
check
Firebase Realtime Database
check
check
check
check
Firebase Remote Config
check
check
check
check
Firebase Test Lab
check
check
check
check
check
check
Gemini in Firebase
check
check
check
check
Vertex AI in Firebase
check
check
check
check
International Data Transfers
As described in our
Data Privacy Framework
certification
,
we comply with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks (DPF) and the
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the US Department of Commerce
regarding the collection, use and retention of personal information from the
EEA, Switzerland and the UK, respectively. Google LLC (and its wholly-owned US
subsidiaries unless explicitly excluded) has certified that it adheres to the
DPF Principles. Google remains responsible for any of your personal information
that is shared under the Onward Transfer Principle with third parties for
external processing on our behalf, as described in the
"Sharing your
information" section of our Privacy
Policy
. To learn more about
the DPF, and to view Google's certification, please visit the
DPF
website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our privacy practices in relation to our DPF
certification, we encourage you to
contact
us
. Google is
subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade
Commission. You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection
authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain
circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to
resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the
DPF
Principles
.
Data processing information
Examples of end-user data processed by Firebase
Some Firebase services process your end users' data to provide their service.
The chart below has examples of how various Firebase services use and handle
end-user data that may potentially be identifying. In addition, many Firebase
services offer the ability to request deletion of specific data or control how
data is handled.
Firebase service
End-user data
How data helps provide the service
Cloud Functions for Firebase
IP addresses
How it helps:
Cloud Functions uses IP addresses to
            execute event-handling functions and HTTP functions based on end-user actions.
Retention:
Cloud functions only saves IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase App Check
Attestation material from supported attestation providers
App Check tokens from successful attestations
How it helps:
Firebase App Check uses attestation
            material required by the corresponding attestation provider and
            received from end-user's devices to help establish the integrity of
            the device and/or the app. Attestation materials are sent to the
            corresponding attestation provider for validation based on the
            developer's configuration. App Check tokens obtained from successful
            attestations are sent with every request to supported Firebase
            services to access resources protected by App Check.
Retention:
Attestation material is not retained by
            App Check, but when it is sent to attestation providers, it is
            subject to the terms of those attestation providers. App Check
            tokens returned from successful attestations are valid throughout
            their TTL duration, which cannot be longer than 7 days. For
            developers who use replay protection features, App Check stores the
            App Check tokens used with these features for at most 30 days. Other
            App Check tokens not used with replay protection features are not
            retained by Firebase services.
Firebase App Distribution
Users' names
Email addresses
iOS UDIDs
Secure Android IDs
Firebase
installation IDs
Tester feedback (screenshots and text)
How it helps:
Firebase App Distribution uses the data to distribute
            app builds to testers, monitor tester activity, enable tester features like in-app
            feedback, and associate data with tester devices.
Retention:
Firebase App Distribution retains user information
            until the Firebase customer requests its deletion, after which data is removed from live
            and backup systems within 180 days.
Firebase Authentication
Passwords
Email addresses
Phone numbers
User agents
IP addresses
How it helps:
Firebase Authentication uses the data to enable end-user
            authentication, and facilitate end-user account management. It also uses user-agent
            strings and IP addresses to provide added security and prevent abuse during sign-up and
            authentication.
Retention:
Firebase Authentication keeps logged IP addresses for a few
            weeks. It retains other authentication information until the Firebase customer initiates
            deletion of the associated user, after which data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase Cloud Messaging uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Crashlytics
Crashlytics Installation UUIDs
Firebase installations ID
Crash traces
Breakpad minidump formatted data
(NDK crashes only)
How it helps:
Firebase Crashlytics uses crash stack
            traces to associate crashes with a project, send email alerts to
            project members and display them in the Firebase Console, and help
            Firebase customers debug crashes. It uses Crashlytics Installation
            UUIDs to measure the number of users impacted by a crash and
            minidump data to process NDK crashes. The minidump data is stored
            while the crash session is being processed and then discarded. The
            Firebase installation ID enables upcoming features that will enhance
            crash reporting and crash management services. Refer to
Examples of stored device information
for more detail on the types of user information gathered.
Retention:
Firebase Crashlytics keeps crash stack traces,
            extracted minidump data, and associated identifiers (including
            Crashlytics Installation UUIDs and Firebase installation IDs) for 90 days before
            starting the process of removing it from live and backup systems.
Note:
Firebase Crashlytics stores minidump data only temporarily in order to
            process NDK crashes.
Firebase Dynamic Links
Device specs (iOS)
IP Addresses (iOS)
How it helps:
Dynamic Links uses device specs and IP addresses on iOS to open
            newly-installed apps to a specific page or context.
Retention:
Dynamic Links only stores device specs and IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase Hosting
IP addresses
How it helps:
Hosting uses IP addresses of incoming requests to detect
            abuse and provide customers with detailed analysis of usage data.
Retention:
Hosting retains IP data for a few months.
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase In-App Messaging
uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase ML
Uploaded Images
installation auth tokens
How it helps:
The Cloud based APIs store uploaded images temporarily,
            to process and return the analysis to you. Stored images are typically deleted within a
            few hours. See the Cloud Vision
Data Usage FAQ
for more
            information.
installation auth tokens
are used by
Firebase ML
for device authentication when interacting with app
            instances, for example, to distribute developer models to app instances.
Retention:
installation auth tokens remain valid until their
            expiration date. The default token lifetime is one week.
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Firebase
installation IDs
IP addresses
How it helps:
Performance Monitoring
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to calculate the number of unique Firebase installations that access network resources,
            to ensure that access patterns are sufficiently anonymous. It also uses
Firebase
installation IDs with
Firebase Remote Config
to manage the rate of performance event reporting. Additionally, it uses IP
            addresses to map performance events to the countries they originate from. For more
            information, see
Data collection
.
Retention:
Performance Monitoring
keeps IP-associated
            events for 30 days, and it keeps installation-associated and de-identified performance
            data for 60 days before starting the process of removing it from live and backup
            systems.
Firebase Realtime Database
IP addresses
User agents
How it helps:
Realtime Database uses IP addresses and user agents to
            enable the
profiler
            tool
, which helps Firebase customers understand usage trends and platform
            breakdowns.
Retention:
Realtime Database keeps IP addresses and user agent
            information for a few days, unless a customer chooses to save it for longer.
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Remote Config
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to select configuration
            values to return to end-user devices.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs until the Firebase customer makes an API call to delete the
          ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup systems within 180 days.
Vertex AI in Firebase
Customer's inputs and outputs data sent and received from the AI model
How it helps:
Vertex AI in Firebase
uses Vertex AI's Generative AI
            API to predict content.
Retention:
During prediction, Google doesn't log Customer Data to
            generate a customer's output or train foundation models. By default, Google caches a
            customer's inputs and outputs for the Gemini models to accelerate responses to
            subsequent prompts from the customer.
See more details at
Generative
              AI and Data Governance | Generative AI on Vertex AI | Google Cloud
.
Examples of information collected by Crashlytics
An RFC-4122 UUID which permits us to deduplicate crashes
The Crashlytics Installation UUID
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
The timestamp of when the crash occurred
The app's bundle identifier and full version number
The device's operating system name and version number
A boolean indicating whether the device was jailbroken/rooted
The device's model name, CPU architecture, amount of RAM and disk
      space
The uint64 instruction pointer of every frame of every currently running
      thread
If available in the runtime, the plain-text method or function name
      containing each instruction pointer.
If an exception was thrown, the plain-text class name and message value
      of the exception
If a fatal signal was raised, its name and integer code
For each binary image loaded into the application, its name, UUID, byte
      size, and the uint64 base address at which it was loaded into RAM
A boolean indicating whether or not the app was in the background at the
      time it crashed
An integer value indicating the rotation of the screen at the time of
      crash
A boolean indicating whether the device's proximity sensor was
      triggered
The contents of
version-control-info.textproto
(only for Android apps
configured
        to use the version control system (VCS) integration
)
Examples of information collected by Performance Monitoring
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
General device information, such as model, OS, and orientation
RAM and disk size
CPU usage
Carrier (based on Mobile Country and Network Code)
Radio/Network information (for example, WiFi, LTE, 3G)
Country (based on IP address)
Locale/language
App version
App foreground or background state
App package name
Firebase
installation IDs
Duration times for automated traces
Network URLs (not including URL parameters or payload content)
      and the following corresponding information:
Response codes (for example, 403, 200)
Payload size in bytes
Response times
See a
full list
of the
    automatic traces collected by
Performance Monitoring
.
Note:
For more info on deleting data associated with installations, see
Delete a Firebase installation
.
Guides for enabling opt-in for end-user data processing
Services in the table above need some amount of end-user data to function. As a
result, it's not possible to entirely disable data collection while using those
services.
If you're a customer who would like to offer users a chance to opt-in to a
service, and the data collection that comes with it, in most cases that just
requires adding a dialog or settings toggle before using the service.
Some services, however, start up automatically when included in an app. To give
users a chance to opt-in before using those services, you can choose to disable
auto-initialization for each service, and manually initialize them at run time
instead. To find out how, read the guides below:
Cloud Messaging
:
Prevent Auto-initialization (Android)
or
Prevent Auto-initialization (iOS+)
Crashlytics
:
Enable Opt-in Reporting (iOS+)
or
Enable Opt-in Reporting (Android)
Performance Monitoring
:
Enable Opt-in Monitoring
If you integrate Firebase with Google Analytics, learn how to
configure Analytics data collection
.
Data storage and processing locations
Unless a service or feature offers data location selection, Firebase may process
and store your data anywhere Google or its agents maintain facilities. Potential
facility locations vary by service.
US-only services
The
Firebase Authentication
service is run only from US data centers. As a result,
Firebase Authentication
processes data exclusively in the United States.
Global services
The majority of Firebase services run on global Google infrastructure.
They could process data at any of the
Google Cloud Platform locations
or
Google data center locations
.
For some services, you can make a specific data location selection, which
restricts processing to that location (for more information, see the
service specific terms
of the Google Cloud Platform Terms of Service).
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase ML
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Dynamic Links
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Hosting
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Security information
Data encryption
Firebase services encrypt data in transit using HTTPS and logically isolate
customer data.
In addition, several Firebase services also encrypt their data at rest:
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Authentication
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Security practices
To keep personal data safe, Firebase employs extensive security measures to
minimize access:
Firebase restricts access to a select employees who have a business purpose to access personal data.
Firebase logs employee access to systems that contain personal data.
Firebase only permits access to personal data by employees who sign in with Google Sign-In and
2-factor authentication
.
Firebase Service Data
Firebase Service Data is personal information that Google collects and generates
during the provision and administration of the Firebase services
*
,
excluding Customer Data
**
as defined in our customer agreements
covering Firebase services and
Google Cloud Service Data
.
Examples of Firebase Service Data include information about service usage,
resource identifiers like application IDs and package name/bundle IDs, technical
and operational details of usage such as IP addresses, and direct communications
with developers from feedback and support related conversations.
*Services covered include Firebase A/B Testing, Firebase App Distribution,
  Firebase Cloud Messaging, Firebase Crashlytics, Firebase Dynamic Links,
  Firebase Hosting, Firebase In-App Messaging, Firebase ML,
  Firebase Performance Monitoring, Firebase Realtime Database,
  Firebase Remote Config, and Firebase User Segmentation Storage.
**For more information about how we process Customer Data, see our
Firebase Data Processing and Security
  Terms
.
Examples of how Firebase Service Data is processed by Firebase
Google uses Firebase Service Data in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms.
Firebase Service Data is used, for example, to:
Provide Firebase services you request
Make recommendations to optimize use of Firebase services
Maintain and improve Firebase services
Provide and improve other services you request
Understand your use of Firebase and other Google services
Provide better support to and communicate with you
Protect you, our users, the public and Google
Comply with legal obligations
Firebase Service Data use by non-Firebase Google services
You can control whether your Firebase Service Data may be used by Google to
provide more in depth analysis, insights, and recommendations about
non-Firebase
Google services and improve
non-Firebase
Google services.
You can configure this in your Firebase data privacy settings page.
If this control is disabled, Firebase Service Data will continue to be used
for other purposes, such as those mentioned above, in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms, including
to make recommendations about and improve
Firebase
services, and to deliver
and improve other services you request, such as Google products you link to your
Firebase project.
Still have questions? Contact us
For any privacy-related questions you have that aren't covered here,
reach out to Firebase Support
. If you're a Firebase developer, include your Firebase App ID. Find your Firebase App ID in the
Your apps
card of your
settings
Project
settings
.
Send feedback
Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the
Creative Commons Attribution 4.0 License
, and code samples are licensed under the
Apache 2.0 License
. For details, see the
Google Developers Site Policies
. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.
Last updated 2025-03-04 UTC.
Sub-policy 8
https://www.applovin.com/privacy/:
Products
Axon
AI-powered recommendation engine
AppDiscovery
Acquire your ideal users
MAX
Monetize your app
SparkLabs
Create ads that perform
AppLovin Exchange
Reach your audience
Array
Increase value across customer’s lifecycle
Adjust
Measure your marketing
Wurl
Our streaming TV solution
Solutions
Increase ARPDAU
Grow Ad Inventory
Acquire App Users
Increase IAPs
Resources
Success Stories
Blog
Video Library
Guides and Reports
Glossary
Events
View all resources
More about us
Partners
Jobs
NEW
Press
About Us
Sign Up
Sign In
ENG
中文
日本語
한국어
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policies
Privacy Policy
隐私政策
Datenschutzerklärung
プライバシーポリシー
개인정보 보호 정책
Política de Privacidade
Politique de confidentialité
AppLovin Partners
AppLovin Policies for Publishers
AppLovin Policies for Demand Partners
AppLovin Array Privacy Policy
Terms
Terms of Use
使用协议条款
Vereinbarung über die Nutzungsbedingungen
利用規約
이용 약관 계약
Contrato de Termos de Uso
Accord sur les Conditions d’utilisation
DMCA Notice
End User License Agreement — Software
AppLovin Array Terms of Service
APPLOVIN PLATFORM DATA PROCESSING AGREEMENT
AppLovin Demand Partner Data Processing Agreement
Effective Date
: October 30, 2024
You can find the prior version
here
.
AppLovin Corporation (“we,” “us,” “our,” or “AppLovin”) operates a suite of tools for app developers and other businesses to automate and optimize the marketing and monetization of their platforms, products, or services by enabling the placement of different types of advertisements on digital properties including mobile apps, websites, and connected TV devices (collectively, the “Advertising Services” or “Services”).  As explained below, consumers interact with us in a few ways, primarily through advertisements served by AppLovin on behalf of advertisers.
The AppLovin Privacy Policy (this “Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, use, and share information through our Services and advertising platform, and our corporate website at www.applovin.com (the “Website”), as well as your choices related to that information.
Contents
Our Advertising Services
Our Website
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Policy Changes
Contact Us
Our Advertising Services
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Advertising Services.
General Information Collection and Use
If you are a consumer who downloads and uses an application which contains the AppLovin SDK or otherwise interacts with the Services through advertisements served within a digital property, we may collect certain information, including the following:
Device, App, and Browser Data
Device make, model, and operating system;
Device properties related to screen size, orientation, audio, battery, device memory usage, settings, and boot time;
Device settings related to accessibility features, font size, and theme;
Carrier;
Name and properties of mobile application through which a consumer interacts with the Services;
Country, time zone, and locale settings (country and preferred language);
Network connection type and speed;
IP Address;
Internet browser user-agent used to access the Services;
HTTP header information;
Advertising IDs (IDFA/GAID/Amazon FOSAID);
Vendor IDs (IDFV);
App Set IDs; and
Advertising and tracking preferences and restrictions.
Application publishers may choose to share with us additional information including your age or year of birth, gender, email, phone number, and interest segments for purposes of their own direct ad serving.  We do not retain this data or pass it downstream to advertising partners.  Please see the applicable publisher’s privacy policy for more information about their use of first party data.
Advertisers (through the advertiser itself or through a third party service provider on behalf of such advertiser) may also share transactional or “event” data related to a consumer’s interaction with an application, such as information about the actions taken in an application like purchases or application installations.
Information Collection and Use Specific
to
e-Commerce Ads Only
If you are a consumer who interacts with the Services through an e-commerce platform or a merchant website, we may collect certain additional information (that you provided to the e-commerce platform or merchant, through a third party’s API, our SDK, pixel, or other similar technologies), including the following:
User IDs;
Shopping browsing behavior (e.g., views) and search history;
Records of products purchased or considered (e.g., added to cart, check out);
Purchasing histories; and
Information regarding user interactions with advertising partners and their merchant partners’ sites and advertisements.
How We Collect Your Information
This information may be collected automatically across mobile apps and devices or received from third-parties across different technologies over time. We may also combine information we collect with other information we derive through analytical techniques, and we will use that combined information to offer the Services.
How We Use Your Information
We generally use the information we collect to:
Deliver the Services, maintain, and improve them, including our AI-powered advertising technology, and research and develop new ones;
Promote safety, security, and integrity of Services;
Provide measurement, analytics, and reporting; and
Comply with legal and regulatory obligations.
We use AI-powered advertising technology (sometimes referred to as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our advertising products and Services and serve ads that are relevant and interesting to you. We use it in ways that do not produce legal or similarly significant effects on you (for example, by reordering how advertisements might appear when you visit a digital property such as a mobile app or a website).
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect or derive with third parties in the following contexts:
Service Providers.
We transfer information to service providers, and other partners who support our business, such as providing technical infrastructure services, analyzing how our Services are used, measuring the effectiveness of ads and services, providing customer service, or facilitating payments. These partners must adhere to strict confidentiality obligations in a way that is consistent with this Privacy Policy and the agreements we enter into with them.
Affiliates.
We may share information within the AppLovin family of companies for purposes consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Advertising Partners.
We share information with our third-party advertising partners, including advertisers, ad networks, exchanges, demand side platforms, merchants, other advertising partners (who aggregate their own demand sources), and ad optimization and measurement/attribution partners (e.g., mobile measurement partners or “MMPs”) to provide our clients with Advertising Services. This information may be used by such third-party partners to measure how effective ads are, show advertisements to end users for products and services that are more likely to appeal to them (a practice known as interest-based advertising or behavioral advertising), and to undertake web analytics to analyze traffic and other ad activity to improve the advertising experience.
Unless otherwise noted in our partner list, each AppLovin advertising partner is an independent controller of your data. You can view a list of AppLovin advertising partners with whom we share your data
here
, current as of the date listed at the top of that page.
If you do not want to receive interest-based advertisements, please see the
“Manage Your Privacy Choices”
section below. If you are located in the European Union, UK, or Switzerland, you may also see the
“Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals”
section below for more options. If you are an individual resident of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws, you may also review the “
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
” section below for more options.
Please note that the practices of our third-party advertising partners delivering advertisements through our Services are subject to those partners’ own privacy policies.
Regulatory or Legal Requirements.
We may disclose information to governmental regulatory authorities as required by law, including for tax or accounting purposes, in response to their requests for such information or to assist in investigations. We may also disclose personal information to third parties in connection with claims, disputes, or litigation, when otherwise required by law or court order.
Safety and Terms Enforcement.
We may disclose information if we determine, in our sole discretion, that its disclosure is necessary to protect the health, safety, or rights of you or any other person, protect against fraud, or enforce our legal rights, including contractual commitments made to us by third parties.
Business Transfers.
We may disclose personal information as part of an organizational business transaction, such as a merger, acquisition, joint venture, financing, or sale of organizational assets and may transfer personal information to a third party as one of the business assets in such a transaction. We may also disclose personal information in the event of insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership.
Manage Your Privacy Choices:
To limit collection of information from mobile devices, please visit your device’s settings to set the “Limit Ad Track” or other similar features on your device. Additionally, you may opt-out of interest-based advertising within ads served by AppLovin. For detailed instructions, see
How AppLovin Shows You Ads
. You can also make choices about data collection for certain companies by visiting an industry consumer choice platform such as the NAI (
https://optout.networkadvertising.org/
) or DAA (
https://optout.aboutads.info/
).  You may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests.
To see or manage the data collected by AppLovin from your device, you may download the AppLovin Privacy Management Application from the Apple or Google Play Stores:
By navigating through the tabs in the AppLovin Privacy Management Application, you can erase the personal information that AppLovin may have collected about you or request a copy of that personal information.
Children’s Privacy
We do not knowingly collect personal information from, or serve advertisements to, children as defined and required by applicable laws. If you believe we have served an advertisement to a child or might have any personal information from or about a child, or if you believe a mobile application in which an AppLovin-served advertisement appeared may be designed for, directed to, or pass personal information knowingly from, children in violation of our policies, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We implement reasonable measures to help secure the information we collect through the Services. We retain the data we collect through the Services for up to 2 years. Information is automatically purged from our system if the Services do not receive any updated information for a device in the last 2 years. Note that we will retain information in our systems for as long as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF ADVERTISING SERVICES-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Our Website
This section describes the information we collect, use, and share through our Website.
Cookies and Other Similar Technology
The Website uses cookies, web beacons, or other similar technology to collect information for various purposes, including interest-based advertising. This information may include your IP address, device identifier, browser type, device type, the date and time of your visit, and the areas of the Website you visit. To learn more about and manage the cookies on this Website, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer. You may also be able to limit the use of cookies through your browser settings. Note that certain parts of the Website may not function properly without cookies. Additionally, you may still receive ads after limiting processing of information for interest-based advertising, but those ads may be less relevant to your interests. If you erase your cookies, reset your device identifier, or use different browsers or devices, you may need to make your choices again.
We partner with Google Analytics to learn more about how you use our Website. For more information about how Google Analytics works you can visit
here
. To opt-out of Google Analytics, you can visit
here
and follow the instructions.
Additional Information Collection for Business Account Owners
When you register with AppLovin to use our Services, you may provide us with personal information such as your name, email address, phone number, mailing address, user name, and password. You may also provide us with payment information when you submit or receive a payment, or other information when you complete the online forms available on the Website. We may also acquire information from other trusted sources to update or supplement the information that you voluntarily provide to us or that we collect automatically.
How We Use Your Information
We may use the information we collect or you provide to us through the Website for various purposes, including:
To communicate with you, for example through newsletters or with other information about our products and services;
To operate and improve the Website and our Services;
To customize the Website;
For analytics and research;
For marketing purposes; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Information Sharing
We may share information we collect through the Website in the following contexts:
With your consent;
For advertising and marketing purposes;
In response to a subpoena, court order, or other legal process;
To protect our rights and the rights of others;
With our affiliates;
With service providers that help us operate the Website and Services;
As part of a sale, merger, or acquisition, including at bankruptcy; and
For purposes disclosed at the time of collection.
Links to Other Websites
The Website may provide links to other websites or other digital properties that we do not control. We encourage you to review the privacy policy of those digital properties that you may visit.
Updating Information
You can update the personal information you provide to us by correcting, updating, or deleting the information associated with you via your AppLovin account. To add, modify, remove, or request access to the personal information about you that we hold, please see the
“Contact Us”
section below.
Your Marketing Choices
If you no longer wish to receive marketing-related emails from us on a going-forward basis, you may opt out of receiving these emails by clicking “Unsubscribe” at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from us or by emailing us at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Children
Our Website is not intended for use by children as defined and required by applicable law. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children through the Website. If you believe we might have any personal information from or about a child, please contact us via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Data Security and Retention
We have implemented reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures for the Website to help protect information we collect and store.
For detailed information regarding retention associated with cookies on the applovin.com domain, please click “Cookie Settings” in our Website footer to learn more.
We retain other information such as customer contact and payment information in our systems for as long as necessary as permitted by law to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
[END OF WEBSITE-SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
Additional Provisions for EU/UK/Swiss Individuals
If you are located in the European Union, United Kingdom, or Switzerland, the following additional provisions apply to you.
Data Privacy Framework
AppLovin complies with the EU-U.S Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.
AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  AppLovin has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
If you are an EU, UK, or Swiss individual, where we transfer your personal data to third party servicer providers (see above) who perform services for us or on our behalf, we are responsible for the processing of that data by them and shall remain liable if they process your personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
With respect to personal data received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework, AppLovin is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, AppLovin may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, AppLovin commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact AppLovin at
dataprotection@applovin.com
. AppLovin refers unresolved complaints to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  These dispute resolution services are provided at no cost to you.
For complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website.
Lawful Basis for Processing
On certain occasions, we process your personal data when it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are a party, such as to provide services to you. We may also process your personal data to respond to your inquiries concerning our products and services.
On other occasions, we process your personal data where required by law. We may also process your personal data if necessary to protect your interests or the interests of a third party.
Additionally, we process your personal data when necessary to do so for fraud prevention, improving our network and services, and marketing our services to advertisers and publishers, where these interests are not overridden by your data protection rights.
If the processing of your personal data is necessary, we will generally ensure that consent has been obtained from you if there is no other lawful basis for such processing. You have the right to withdraw your consent to processing of personal data at any time.
If personal data covered by this Privacy Policy is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which the personal data was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is to be disclosed to a non-agent third party in a manner not specified in this Privacy Policy, we will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data so used or disclosed. Requests to opt out of such uses or disclosures of personal data should be sent to us as specified in the “Contact” section below. Certain personal data, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, is considered “Sensitive Information”. AppLovin does not collect or seek to elicit “Sensitive Information”.
For questions about data processing, please contact our Data Protection Officer. Visit the “Contact” section below for contact information.
Your Rights
If you are an individual in the EU, UK, or Switzerland, you are able:
To request access to the personal data we hold about you;
To request that we rectify or erase your personal data;
To request that we restrict or block the processing of your personal data;
Under certain circumstances, to receive personal data about you that we store and transmit to another without hindrance from us, including requesting that we provide your personal data directly to another, i.e., a right to data portability; and
Where we previously obtained your consent, to withdraw consent to processing your personal data.
To exercise these rights, please contact us at the email address set forth in the
“Contact Us”
section below.  Our Data Protection Officer can also be reached at this email address.  Please be aware that we may be unable to afford these rights to you under certain circumstances, such as if we are legally prevented from doing so.
In certain circumstances, you may appoint an authorized agent to exercise any rights that you may have on your behalf.  If you choose to exercise any rights through an authorized agent, you will need to verify your identity directly with us before we can process any requests.  In addition, we will need written documentation demonstrating the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf.
Additionally, you have the right to lodge a complaint against us. To do so, contact the supervisory authority in your country of residence.
EU and UK Privacy Representatives
We have appointed
Prighter Group
as our privacy representatives in the EU and UK.  You can contact us through our privacy representatives at the following addresses:
For residents of the EU
:
PrighterGDPR-Rep by Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG
c/o AppLovin Corporation
Kriegerstraße 44
30161 Hannover
Germany
For residents of the UK
:
PrighterUK-Rep by Prighter Ltd.
c/o AppLovin Corporation
20 Mortlake Mortlake High Street
London, SW14 8JN
United Kingdom
Additional information regarding our privacy representatives can be found at the following link:
https://prighter.com/q/19826057144
.
[END OF EU/UK/SWISS SPECIFIC PROVISIONS]
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
Additional provisions for individual residents of the U.S. states that have enacted comprehensive consumer privacy laws are included in our
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
, which explains how those residents may exercise their privacy rights.
Policy Changes
We may, in our sole discretion, make changes to this Privacy Policy from time to time in order to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements, or for other purposes. If we make any changes, we will update the “Effective Date” posted at the top of this Privacy Policy. If we make any material changes, we may notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of a notice on the Website prior to the change becoming effective. We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to ensure that you understand how we collect, use, and share information.
Any changes to this Privacy Policy will become effective when the revised Privacy Policy is posted on the Website. By continuing to use the Website or Advertising Services following such changes, you are agreeing to accept the terms of the revised Privacy Policy.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy, please write to us at:
Data Protection Officer
AppLovin Corporation
1100 Page Mill Road
Palo Alto, CA 94304
You can also contact us or our Data Protection Officer via email at
dataprotection@applovin.com
.
Please be sure to include your relevant account information in any correspondence to us.  This will help ensure that we can respond to your inquiry in a timely manner.
If you have a customer care issue, please visit
AppLovin Support
.
Sub-policy 9
https://www.inmobi.com/privacy-policy:
We use necessary and (optional) analytics cookies on our websites to analyze traffic and personalize content. You can read our
cookie policy
to understand how we use cookies. You may press 'decline' if you do not want us to use optional cookies. We will set a cookie on your device to remember and honor your preference.
Accept
Decline
We use third-party cookies to measure website performance, analytics, personalize content and ads for you. Read our
cookie policy
for more details.
Decline
Customize
Accept All
General
Content Guidelines Advertisers
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
COPPA
Security
Trust and Safety
Opt-Out
Publisher Policy
InMobi CMP Terms of Service
Content Guidelines Publishers
InMobi Sanctions Compliance
GDPR
Privacy Policy for EEA
Data Subject / Consumer Request Policy
Privacy Policy
English
English
Spanish
Portuguese
Bahasa
Japanese
Chinese
LAST UPDATED: FEBRUARY 2024
EFFECTIVE: FEBRUARY 2024
1. INTRODUCTION
InMobi runs a marketing platform solution which provides advertising and monetization services/products (whether owned or through its partners) to marketers and supply partners including through digital media, sites, surveys, owned or operated application(s)/widgets, exchange(s) for demand/supply, marketing automation solutions and other services, such as, fraud detection, reporting, audiences, attribution, analytics, modelling, segments, measurement (“Marketing Platform”).
2. SCOPE OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY
2.1 APPLICABILITY
This Privacy Policy explains how InMobi collects, uses and shares information from individuals that interact with its services, offering or platforms comprising its Marketing Platform (“Marketing Platform Services”) and its website, respectively. (“InMobi” means InMobi Pte. Ltd. and its subsidiaries). InMobi is the controller for the personal information we process, unless otherwise stated. InMobi Pte. Ltd. is an NAI (Network Advertising Initiative) member, and we adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct.
2.2 NON-APPLICABILITY
InMobi may offer independent mobile applications, web content services, lock-screen platforms, social entertainment platform(s), widgets, and/or other software features to consumers through smart devices which may be preloaded on the devices, downloadable, hosted on web or made available through other digital media (“Consumer Offering”). This Privacy Policy does not apply to the collection by or processing practices of each of the foregoing services, respectively. If you are a consumer of any such Consumer Offering, the applicable privacy policy should be available to you through such services. Please refer to the respective privacy policies of each Consumer Offering for a description of its data collection and data use practices.
To the extent that foregoing Consumer Offering promotes any interest-based advertising using the Marketing Platform Services, the terms of this policy would apply to the data processing practices for such Marketing Platform Services.
Marketing Platform Services and Consumer Offering are collectively referred to as “Services”.
3. INMOBI MARKETING PLATFORM SERVICES
InMobi engages with third party site/app publishers and app developers to serve ads on their digital properties on behalf of its demand side advertising partners through various channels of advertising solutions including exchanges, network, off-network etc. InMobi may also serve ads on Consumer Offerings. InMobi also engages in campaign planning, measurement (e.g. whether an advertisement was viewed, its timestamp etc.) and attribution of advertisements, whether by itself or through third party measurement partners.
InMobi provides Marketing Platform Services, including optimization of advertising campaigns, data analytics/enrichment, segment creation, user acquisition, re-engagement, remarketing or retargeting through various digital advertising channels. InMobi receives data into its Marketing Platform from various sources, including end user information collected by our systems, applications/offerings, partners, data/cookie vendors or customers (“Sources”), which may include third party apps, sites and services that you use. Please refer to the privacy policies of the apps, sites, and services you use to understand how those apps, sites and services collect, use, and share data from your interactions with them. InMobi is not responsible for how those third-party apps, sites and services collect and use data.
4. WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?
When you view an advertisement distributed through InMobi on a site, app or other digital media, we may collect information on your device and your interaction with the advertisement. This information enables us to serve advertisements to you, improve our Services including to recognize your device when you use other sites and applications that have partnered with us. InMobi may also collect information about you when you elect to interact with our surveys or opinion-based applications. Information we may collect includes:
(a) Device identifiers. Device identifiers are alphanumeric strings that are unique to your device. These include:
iOS devices’ Identifier for Advertising (IDFA) and iOS Identifier for Vendors (IDFV)
Google Advertising ID (GAID), or Android ID for Android devices
Identifier for Advertising on OTT and CTV platforms
International mobile equipment identity (IMEI), in certain jurisdiction as permitted by applicable law
Cookie IDs
(b) Location information, including:
Geo-location or precise location of your device if you have given the app or site permission to collect your location information
Location information we infer based on data collected through a WiFi identifier that your device is connected to, in accordance with applicable law and provided location access is permitted
Location information we infer from your device’s IP address, provided that we will not infer location from an IP address to a more precise than city-level of accuracy unless you have given the app or site permission to collect your location information
(c) Network information, including:
Mobile carrier
Network provider or ISP
Network type (e.g., WiFi or cellular)
IP address
IDs of WiFi access points to which your device is connected
Date and time of connection
(d) Information about apps or sites and our Software Development Kit (SDK), including:
App or site name or version
App identifier
SDK version
API key identifier
Other information about/on your device, including:
Device type (e.g., make and model)
Device startup time and update time
Device name
Screen size
Memory and hard drive capacity
Operating system and version (e.g., iOS 14, Android, Windows, Blackberry)
Mobile browser used (e.g., Chrome, Safari, Firefox)
Language settings (including country code) and time zone
App usage
Device sensor signals (Accelerometer, Gyroscope, Proximity sensor, Orientation/Rotation Vector, Audio Controls Integration)
Advertisement information. We collect information about the ad presented on your device, including:
The content type of the ad (the advertiser and category, e.g. games, finance, entertainment, news)
The ad type (e.g. whether the ad is a text, image, video or other format based)
Where the ad is being served (e.g. the site, digital media or app on which the ad appears)
Whether you viewed, clicked or otherwise interacted with the ad
Survey information. We may ask users to voluntarily participate in online surveys. These surveys help brands improve their products and services offered to you. If you fill out a survey, we may collect your device information described above and information you provide, including your:
Age
Name
Email address
Phone number
Gender
Occupation and income range
Family size and other demographic information
Preference for brands, modes of travel, and other consumer choices.
Other marketing information:
In the context of our Marketing Platform Services, our customers, partners or vendors may also disclose to us certain personal or non-personal information they have separately collected about you during your interaction with their apps, sites or services so that we can effectively provide our Services. This may in the context of websites, including mobile websites, include cookies, other technologies, or other aggregated characteristics or other identifiers related to your device to understand your interaction with such site and to serve certain types of ads relevant to your interests.
These parties serve you cookies in accordance with their own specific privacy/cookie policies and subject to their own applicable legal requirements. We do not use the information they provide to us for any purpose other than as permitted by such third parties or for providing or improving our Services.
Notably, one of our media partners is Google. Please see the link below which describes Google's collection/use of data:
How Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps
We do not collect any sensitive data such as racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, genetic data, biometric data, data concerning health. We may show targeted advertisements to fitness enthusiasts.
5. HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We use the information that we collect about your device to:
Display advertisements on your device, which may include interest-based advertising customized to your interests, preferences, locations
For remarketing or retargeting i.e. to display relevant ads if you have previously visited/accessed/downloaded a site or mobile application that we partner with
For bidding to serve advertisements and to determine which ads are most effective
Analyze and provide our demand partners or advertisers reports on the effectiveness of advertisements and campaigns, including across different types of devices based on our determination of devices that are related to the same person. We, or third parties whom we engage to provide this service, may use cross-device data to provide interest-based advertising services and to deliver tailored ads to users across multiple mobile devices including over the top applications and smart televisions
Avoid showing you the same ads too many times
Build custom audience segments to enable our customers and partners better target their advertisements and offers
Improve our Services and assist our customers and partners in improving their products and services
Detect, deter and prevent fraud, fraudulent traffic or to protect the security of our systems
We may process your survey responses and share the response data with the brands who are our customers/marketers
6. WHO DO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION WITH?
InMobi may share the information we collect or receive about you as described in this Policy as follows:
Publishers and Supply Partners. We may share your information with publishers (the app or site publishers) to help them understand how users interact with their apps and sites and advertisements on their apps and sites
Demand Partners and Advertisers. We may share your information with demand partners, brands and advertisers who use our Marketing Platform, to allow them to understand the performance of their campaigns; and to help them better target their campaigns, products or offerings
Marketing Partners. We may share your information with data partners who help us with better understanding your preferences by providing data enrichment, analytics and identification services and measurement companies who help us with attribution and tracking of advertisements distributed through us (“Marketing Partners”)
Service Providers. We may share personal information we collect about you with our third-party service providers. The categories of service providers to whom we entrust personal information include: IT and related services; fraud detection, information and services; payment processors; customer service providers; and vendors to support the provision of the Services
Group. We may share personal information with the Group so that the Services of InMobi and/or the Group may be improved and otherwise to serve you and/or our customers better with all our offerings including effective content management “Group” as used in this policy, means, with respect to InMobi, its affiliates and group entities listed
here
.
Disclosures to Protect Us or Others. We may access, preserve, and disclose any information we store associated with you to external parties if we, in good faith, believe doing so is required or appropriate to: comply with law enforcement or national security requests and legal process, such as a court order or subpoena; protect your, our or others’ rights, property, or safety; enforce our policies or contracts; collect amounts owed to us; or assist with an investigation or prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity
Disclosures in the Event of Merger, Sale, or Other Asset Transfers. If we are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, purchase or sale of assets, or transition of service to another provider, then your information may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction, as permitted by law and/or contract<,/li>
International Data Transfers. Where applicable, we will protect information through other legally valid methods, including international data transfer agreements. You agree that all information processed by us may be transferred, processed, and stored anywhere in the world, including but not limited to, the United States or other countries, which may have data protection laws that are different from the laws where you live. We have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected and require our third-party service providers and partners to have appropriate safeguards as well. Further details can be provided upon request.
7. HOW DO WE KEEP PERSONAL INFORMATION SECURE?
InMobi uses reasonable technical and organizational measures to protect the information it collects about you in compliance with its legal and privacy requirements and contractual obligations. We also seek appropriate contractual protection from our partners regarding their collection, use or treatment of user data. Unfortunately, no system is 100% secure, and we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you provide to us. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, we do not accept liability for unauthorized disclosure.
By using our Services or providing personal information to us, you agree that we may communicate with you electronically regarding security, privacy, and administrative issues relating to your use of our Services. If we learn of a security system’s breach, we may attempt to notify you electronically by posting a notice on our Services, by mail or by sending an email to you.
8. HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION?
InMobi retains information collected in the context of our Marketing Platform for a period of up to thirteen (13) months, unless otherwise required by law or applicable contract.
InMobi may retain the information it obtains about you as per the instructions of its customers or partners who provide such information or as required to fulfil our contractual obligations. In case any information is provided by you in participation of a survey or opinion-based application by InMobi, we will only retain your personal data for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for.
After the applicable retention period, InMobi will only retain and may only use your data: (i) in an aggregated or anonymized format; (ii) to comply with its legal obligations; and (iii) to resolve disputes and enforce agreements. Please note that the use cases stated in this provision will apply as an exception to your data subject or consumer rights related requests.
9. OPTING OUT OF INTEREST BASED ADS
Opting out of interest-based advertising:
If you prefer not to receive interest-based advertising from InMobi, you can opt out at any time by going to the InMobi
Opt Out
page and submitting your device ID or any other listed identifier. If you opt-out of interest-based advertising, you will still receive "generic" ads from InMobi. To opt-out of our cross-device ad targeting, you must opt-out on every device browser and device using the appropriate opt-out methods.
Opting out of surveys:
Each survey that you participate in will provide opt-out instructions, including an option to skip questions, which if elected will ensure that we do not include your device for that survey. Please note that if you opt-out of a survey you may still receive other survey requests. If we reach out to you through marketing communication modes such as emails, you will have the option to unsubscribe from such marketing communications through links provided in such emails.
Opting out of Connected TV:
If you opt-out of interest-based ads on your connected TV device, your advertising ID will not be used to build profiles or target you with interest-based ads and it is likely that you will get irrelevant ads which are not tailored to your interest. To disable interest-based ads, please use the Opt-Out on your Connected TV device as shown below.
On your device, visit Operating System (OS) Privacy Settings. Select Limit Ad Tracking (for iOS/tvOS devices), Opt-out of Interest-Based Ads (for Android devices), Limit Ad Tracking (for Roku devices), or similar setting offered by your OS. Please go through your device manufacturer’s privacy policy for more information.
You may also opt out of interest-based advertising via NAI. Please visit
Mobile Choices | NAI: Network Advertising Initiative
for opting out of interest-based ad on mobile devices and
Internet Connected TV Choices | NAI: Network Advertising Initiative
on TV.
10. PRIVACY RIGHTS
InMobi provides consumers with data subject or consumer rights as and when and to the extent required under such applicable laws.
General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR):
If you are an EEA data subject, kindly refer our EEA Privacy Policy
https://advertising.inmobi.com/privacy-policy-for-eea/
to see your data subject rights under GDPR
California:
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended (“CCPA”) provides California residents with the right to know what categories of personal information InMobi has collected about them and whether InMobi disclosed that personal information for a business purpose (e.g., to a service provider) in the preceding 12 months. The categories of sources from which we collect personal information and our business and commercial purposes for using personal information are set forth in “4. WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?” and “5. HOW DO WE USE YOUR INFORMATION?” above, respectively. The categories of third parties with whom we may share your information are listed in “6. WHO DO WE SHARE YOUR INFORMATION WITH?” above.
California residents have the right to opt out of the “sale” of their personal information. Under the CCPA, “sale” is defined broadly and includes the transfer of personal information by a business to a third party for valuable consideration (even if there is no exchange of money). InMobi may be deemed to be “selling” personal information. The categories of personal information we have “sold” and the categories of third parties we have “sold” personal information to in the preceding twelve months are listed in “6. WHO DO WE SHARE YOUR INFORMATION WITH?” above.
Residents of the State of California (in the United States) have the following additional privacy rights:
You have a right to exercise certain consumer rights such as request to know/ disclose/ access/ delete your data, collected in the last 12 months, by writing to us at
privacy@inmobi.com
.
You have the right to opt out of selling of your data by clicking on the following link:
Do not sell my data
.
Non-Discrimination.
California residents have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of their rights conferred by the CCPA.
Authorized Agent.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. To designate an authorized agent, please contact us as set forth in “17. CONTACT US” below and provide written authorization signed by you and your designated agent.
Verification.
To protect your privacy, we will take steps the following steps to verify your identity before fulfilling your request. When you make a request, we will ask you to provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative, which may include information about your device.
Additional Privacy Rights for Residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Virginia and Utah
InMobi does not “sell” your personal information. We process your personal information for the purposes of “targeted advertising” ('interest based advertising' for the purposes of this Privacy Policy) as that term is defined under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act, Colorado Privacy Act, Connecticut Data Privacy Act and Utah Consumer Privacy Act.
Residents of Colorado, Connecticut, and Virginia can opt out of interest based advertising by going to the InMobi
Opt Out
page.
InMobi does not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act.
The privacy laws of your country may grant you the following additional privacy rights relating to their personal information: right to access, request correction, request deletion/anonymization/blocking, restrict/object to processing, withdraw your consent, request data portability, be informed about third parties with whom your data has been shared, and request review of decisions taken exclusively based on automated processing. To exercise these rights, please write to us at
privacy@inmobi.com
.
11. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS
InMobi may share your information with clients, customers, partners, the Group and other third parties described above who are based in countries outside of your country of residence (for example, if you are an EEA resident, we may share your information with our non-EEA clients or the Group), subject to any contractual or legal requirements. You agree that all information processed by us may be transferred, processed, and stored anywhere in the world.
While some countries may not have data protection laws that are equivalent to those of the country in which you reside, we will take reasonable measures to protect your information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
12. LEAD GENERATION CAMPAIGNS
InMobi may offer form-based advertising solutions to marketers that include the collection of voluntary information from you as part of an advertisement that contains a questionnaire. Such information may consist of personal data, non-personal information or data, or both. All the information that you voluntarily provide in response to such form or questionnaire is typically forwarded directly to the relevant marketer’s servers or their landing page and in such cases will be governed by such marketer's privacy policies in place at the time of transfer.
In the event any personal data is directly processed by InMobi, you acknowledge that InMobi may be required to store such information for the period during which it continues to manage the applicable lead-generation campaign for its marketer on whose behalf the information is collected. This information may be temporarily stored by InMobi solely for running such form-based campaigns and will be used only for the purpose of optimization of such campaigns, subject to applicable legal/privacy and contractual requirements. InMobi has implemented internal safeguards to protect the temporary storage of this information and uses reasonable technical and organizational measures to protect the same. InMobi has mechanisms to delete or anonymize any personal data after the said campaign is concluded or within a period thirty (30) days from the same. Pursuant to the conclusion of the applicable campaign, InMobi may retain and use your Information only to the extent necessary for it to create reports for its client, comply with its legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce agreements and no other purpose. Any non-personal information or data submitted by you may be used for improving our Services.
If you have any questions about InMobi lead generation campaigns, please contact us at:
privacy@inmobi.com
. InMobi will refer any enquiries or complaints to the relevant marketer responsible for the processing of data provided as part of lead generation campaigns.
13. COOKIES
We use cookies and beacons to help us collect some of the information we have described above. This may be done when you interact with us or our third-party partners who enable InMobi to collect data related to your interaction with their apps or sites for the purpose of serving relevant Ads to you and/or improve our services. We may also use cookies on our and our advertiser’s websites to provide website functionality and advertising to you respectively, and to save you having to provide the information you have already given us on subsequent visits to our site.
For more detailed information about the technologies we use and your ability to control those cookies, please visit our
cookie policy
. We recommend that you review the privacy policies of the third-party apps, services or sites that you directly interact with to learn how those third parties use cookies.
14. PRIVACY OF CHILDREN
InMobi complies with the age-gating requirements under applicable privacy laws such as Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA) and California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended (CCPA) in the U.S., Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (LGPD), General law of personal data protection in Brazil and GDPR in the EEA and does not knowingly collect personal data about users of sites or apps directed to children. Please also visit our
COPPA Policy
.
15. OTHER WEBSITES
Our website and the ads we service may contain links to other websites. You should be aware that we are not responsible for the privacy practices of such other websites as those may have different privacy policies and terms of use and are not associated with us. You agree that we cannot control these links and we shall not be responsible for any use of such websites.
16. CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We may amend this Privacy Policy at any time. The amended Privacy Policy will be displayed on our site. If we make any material changes, we will notify you by means of a notice on this site prior to the change becoming effective. Please check our Privacy Policy regularly to ensure you have read the latest version.
17. CONTACT US
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at
privacy@inmobi.com
.
We have appointed a representative in the EU. You can contact them by post at Taylor Vinters Europe Limited, Clifton House, Fitzwilliam Street Lower, Dublin, D02 XT91, Ireland, or by email at
representative@taylorvinters.com
.
To check the previous version of the privacy policy, please
click here
.
First name
*
Last name
*
Email
*
Company name
*
Country
*
- Please Select -
Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua & Barbuda
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Asia/Pacific Region
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Caribbean Netherlands
Cayman Islands
Central African Rep
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Curaçao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of the Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Europe
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern and Antarctic Lands
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Macedonia (FYROM)
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Myanmar (Burma)
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Occupied Palestinian Territory
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Palistinian Territory
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Republic of Costa Rica
Romania
Russia
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Réunion
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent & the Grenadines
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
South Korea
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Kitts & Nevis
St Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Virgin Islands
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Åland Islands
I am
*
Please Select
Ad Tech Provider
Agency
App Marketer
Brand Marketer
Game Marketer
Other
Publisher
Retailer
I am interested in
*
Please Select
Learning more about InMobi
Advertising my brand with InMobi
Advertising my app with InMobi
Monetizing my app with InMobi
Running programmatic campaigns with InMobi on behalf of my clients
Learning more about InMobi's mediation solutions
Something else
Job title
*
Anything else you'd like to tell us?
Lead Source
By checking here, you agree to receive marketing emails about our products and services. You can unsubscribe via a link in the email.
*
The information you provide will be used in accordance with the terms of our
privacy policy
.
Sub-policy 10
https://a4g.com/privacy:
Privacy Policy
Terms & Conditions
Policy Pages
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
Opt-out of Ad4Game ads
Exercise Your Rights
Powered by
OneTrust
Cookie Settings
This Privacy Policy (together with our terms of use, which are available at
a4g.com/terms
) governs the manner in which
                    Ad4Game Ireland Limited (
“Ad4Game”
) collects, uses, maintains and discloses
                    personal data collected from users of the
a4g.com
website (the
“Site”
) as well as all websites working directly or indirectly with the
                    Ad4Game Network. This privacy policy applies to the Site and all products and services
                    offered by Ad4Game. Please read this policy carefully to understand the views and practices
                    of Ad4Game regarding your personal data and how Ad4Game will treat it.
Personal Data on website
Ad4Game fully respects your right to privacy and will collect personal data from you only
                    if you voluntarily submit such information to us. Personal data that we collect about you
                    may include your name, email address, telephone number, instant messenger, social account,
                    home/office address and bank details. Any personal data which you volunteer to Ad4Game will
                    be treated strictly in accordance with the Data Protection Acts 1988 and 2003. You may
                    refuse to supply personal data to us, except that it may prevent you from engaging in
                    certain Site related activities.
Non-personally identifiable information
We may collect non-personally identifiable information about you whenever you interact with
                    our Site. Non-personally identifiable information may include the browser name, the type of
                    computer and technical information about your means of connection to our Site, such as the
                    operating system and the Internet service providers utilized and other similar information.
Web browser cookies
Our Site may use "cookies" to distinguish you from other users of the Site and to enhance
                    your experience when using the Site. Cookies may be placed by your browser on your hard
                    drive for record-keeping purposes and sometimes to track information about your use of
                    the Site. You may choose to set your web browser to refuse cookies, or to alert you when
                    cookies are being sent. If you do so, please note that some parts of the Site may not
                    function properly.
How we use collected information
Ad4Game may collect and use Users personal information (only on the www.a4g.com website,
                    not other websites where we serve our ads) for the following purposes:
- To improve customer service
To help us respond to your customer service requests and support needs more efficiently.
                        It also helps us to administer the Site for internal operations, including troubleshooting,
                        data analysis, testing, research, statistical and survey purposes.
- To personalize user experience
We may use information in the aggregate to understand how our users as a group use the
                        services and resources provided on our Site.
- Safety
As part of our efforts to keep the Site safe and secure.
- To send periodic emails
If you decide to opt-in to our mailing list, you will receive emails that may include
                        company news, updates, related product or service information, etc.
                        If at any time you would like to unsubscribe from receiving future emails,
                        we include detailed unsubscribe instructions at the bottom of each email or you may
                        contact us via our Site at
support@a4g.com
.
How we protect your information
We adopt appropriate data collection, storage and processing practices and security measures
                    to protect against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction of your
                    personal information, username, password, transaction information and data stored on our Site.
Sensitive and private data exchange between the Site and your browser happens over a SSL
                    secured communication channel and is encrypted and protected with digital signatures.
Unfortunately, the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure.
                    Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the security
                    of your data transmitted to our Site; any transmission is at your own risk. Once we have
                    received your information, we will use strict procedures and security features to try to
                    prevent unauthorised access.
Sharing your personal information
We may disclose your personal data to third parties:
Where we engage trusted third parties to provide services in connection with the Site or
                        our business, including sending out newsletters or surveys on our behalf.
In the event that we sell or buy any business or assets, in which case we may disclose
                        your personal data to the prospective seller or buyer of such business or assets.
If Ad4Game or substantially all of its assets are acquired by a third party,
                        in which case personal data held by it about its customers will be one of the
                        transferred assets.
If we are under a duty to disclose or share your personal data in order to comply with
                        any legal obligation, or in order to enforce or apply our Website terms of use
                        (
a4g.com/terms
) and other agreements,
                        or to protect the rights, property, or safety of Ad4Game, our customers or others.
We use the following third parties as data processors for the given reasons.  Some of the
                  information you provide will be transferred to them for processing in accordance with their
                  Privacy Policy and Terms.
Close.io
to improve and manage our sales processes (
Privacy Policy
,
Terms
).
Intercom
to manage Customer communications and perform Customer Relationship Management tasks
                       (
Terms & Policies
).
MailChimp
as our marketing automation platform (
Privacy Policy
,
Terms
).
Zoho
for invoicing and billing (
Privacy Policy
,
Terms
).
We may share your personal information with any member of our group, which means our
                    subsidiaries, our ultimate holding company and its subsidiaries, as defined in section 7
                    and 8 of the Companies Act 2014.
Advertising
Ads appearing on our network may be delivered to you by advertising partners, who may set
                    cookies. These cookies allow the ad server to recognize your computer each time they send
                    you an online advertisement and to compile non personally identifiable information about you
                    or others who use your computer. This information allows ad networks to, among other things,
                    deliver targeted advertisements that they believe will be of most interest to you. This
                    privacy policy does not cover the use of cookies by any advertisers.
The cookies placed by Ad4Game are for attribution (conversion tracking) and frequency
                    capping only. They automatically expire after 28 days.
Ad4Game fully complies and adheres to the principles of DAA (Digital Advertising Alliance) /
                    NAI (Network Advertising Initiative) and we simply never store any personal information when
                    showing our ads to any visitors for more than 9 months.
In order to prevent fraud and attribute clicks and conversions, we may collect certain device
                    information including the following:
Name and properties of mobile applications/websites through which a consumer
                        interacts with the Services;
Country;
IP Address;
Internet browser user-agent used to access the Services; and
Identifier for advertisers (IFA).
Opt-Out:
All the data we collect is for fraud prevention and conversions attribution only.
                        We do not use interest based advertising nor retargeting.
To opt-out of our collection of information from mobile devices, please visit your device’s
                    settings to set the “Limit Ad Track” or other similar feature on your device. You can also
                    opt-out of our data collection and use through the process we described here
“Opt Out”
. You can also make choices about data collection for certain companies
                    by visiting
http://preferences-mgr.truste.com
.
Note that if you opt-out you will still see advertising on your device. In addition, if you
                    reset your device identifier or use a different device you may need to renew your opt-out.
Children
We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 16 through
                    the Advertising Services and the Site.
We are not responsible for the content or privacy practices of other websites or our
                    advertising partners. Please check their privacy policies before you submit any personal
                    data to such websites or advertising partners.
Your Access and Amendment Rights
You have the right, subject to certain exemptions, to obtain a copy of any personal data
                    which we hold about you (for which we may charge you a small fee of €6.35) and to have
                    inaccuracies in the information corrected and to request that we restrict or block the
                    processing of your personal data. If you wish to avail of any of these rights, please
                    contact our data protection officer at
dataprotection@a4g.com
.
Changes to this privacy policy
Ad4Game has the discretion to update this privacy policy at any time. When we do, we will
                    post a notification on the main page of our Site and revise the updated date at the bottom
                    of this page. We encourage you to frequently check this page for any changes to stay
                    informed about how we are helping to protect the personal information we collect. You
                    acknowledge and agree that it is your responsibility to review this privacy policy
                    periodically and become aware of modifications.
Your continued use of the Site after any change in this Privacy Policy will constitute your
                    acceptance of such change.
Your acceptance of these terms
By using this Site, you signify your acceptance of and consent to the practices described in
                    this policy and terms of use (
a4g.com/terms
).
                    If you do not agree to this policy, please do not use our Site. Your continued use of the
                    Site following the posting of changes to this policy will be deemed your acceptance of those
                    changes.
Contacting us
If you have any questions, comments or requests in relation to this Privacy Policy, the
                    practices of the Site, or your dealings with the Site, please contact us at:
Ad4Game Ireland Limited
6-9 Trinity Street, Dublin 2, Ireland  support@a4g.com
This document was last updated on May 18th 2018.
Contact Us
Quality Performance Marketing
We are always looking for new passionate people to work with, please fill the form to contact us and an associate will get back to you soon.
Get contacted
Visit Us
A4G Ireland
6-9 Trinity Street, Dublin 2
+353 1 960 9000
A4G Canada
271 Soupras Street Montreal, Quebec
+1 514 819 0500
Meet Us
Mobidictum
Istanbul
-

                            Sep 5-6, 2023
Fill in and send the following form and we will have an associate reach out to you!
To
Select a department
Publisher - Mobile / Developer
Advertiser - Agency/Brand
Advertiser - Game Publisher
Marketing/PR
Comments/Questions
Subject
First Name
Last Name
Your Email
Company
Phone
Message
Send
A4G ©
All Rights Reserved 2025
Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
(1) Introduction
These terms of use (together with the documents that they refer to) govern your use of our website
www.a4g.com
(the
“Website”
);
            by using the Website, you confirm that you accept and agree to comply with these terms of use in full.
            If you disagree with these terms of use or any part of these terms of use, you must not use the Website.
These terms of use refer to our Privacy Policy (which is available at
//www.a4g.com/privacy
) which sets out the terms on which we process any personal data we collect from you,
            or that you provide to us. By using the Website, you consent to such processing and you warrant that all data provided by you is accurate.
These terms of use apply to your participation in the Ad4Game program, either as an advertiser, publisher or affiliate. Such participation is subject to additional terms and conditions which are made available to you, and which you must agree to, when you sign up to participate in the Ad4Game program.
(2) Licence to use the Website
Unless otherwise stated, we or our licensors own the intellectual property rights in the Website and material on the Website, including, without limitation, text, graphics, logos, button icons, images, audio clips and software. Subject to the licence below, all these intellectual property rights are reserved.
You are granted a limited licence solely to view, download for caching purposes only, and print pages from the Website for your own personal use, subject to the restrictions set out below and elsewhere in these terms of use.
You must not reproduce, duplicate, copy or otherwise exploit material on the Website for a commercial purpose that is not expressly permitted by us.
You must not modify the paper or digital copies of any materials you have printed off or downloaded in any way, and you must not use any illustrations, photographs, video or audio sequences or any graphics separately from any accompanying text.
Our status (and that of any identified contributors) as the authors of content on the Website must always be acknowledged.
If you print off, copy or download any part of the Website in breach of these terms of use, your right to use the Website will cease immediately and you must, at our option, return or destroy any copies of the materials you have made
(3) Acceptable use
You must not use the Website in any way, either knowingly or recklessly, that causes, or may cause, damage to the Website or impairment of the availability or accessibility of the Website; or in any way which is unlawful, illegal, fraudulent or harmful, or in connection with any unlawful, illegal, fraudulent or harmful purpose or activity.
You must not use the Website to copy, store, host, transmit, send, use, publish or distribute any material which consists of (or is linked to) any spyware, computer virus, Trojan horse, worm, keystroke logger, rootkit, logic bomb or other malicious or harmful computer software.
You must not attempt to gain unauthorised access to the Website, the server on which the Website is stored or any server, computer or database connected to the Website. You must not attack the Website via a denial-of-service attack or a distributed denial-of-service attack. By breaching this provision, you may commit a criminal offence under the Criminal Damage Act 1991, the Criminal Justice (Theft and Fraud Offences) Act 2001, the Criminal Justice Act 2011, or under other applicable laws. We will report any such breach to the relevant law enforcement authorities and we will co-operate with those authorities by disclosing your identity to them. In the event of such a breach, your right to use the Website will cease immediately.
You must not conduct any systematic or automated data collection activities (including, without limitation, scraping, data mining, data extraction and data harvesting) on or in relation to the Website without our express written consent.
You must not use the Website to transmit or send unsolicited commercial communications.
You must not use the Website for any purposes related to marketing without our express written consent.
(4) Restricted access
You may not be able to access certain areas of the Website which are restricted. We reserve the right to restrict access to other areas of the Website, or indeed the whole Website, at our discretion, including, without limitation, if we believe that particular conduct violates applicable law, is harmful to our interests or is in breach of these terms of use.
Confidentiality must be ensured at all times regarding the use of User ID and password. Credentials that are used to access restricted areas of the Website, content & services must be kept confidential.
You must notify Ad4Game in writing immediately if you become aware of any unauthorised use of your account or password.
You are responsible for any activity on the Website. If you fail to keep your password confidential you will be liable for any losses arising out of such a failure.
You must not use any other person's user ID and password to access the Website, unless you have that person's express permission to do so.
            We may disable your user ID and password at any time in our sole discretion with or without notice or explanation.
(5) User content
In these terms of use, "your content" means material (including, without limitation, text, images, audio material, video material and audio-visual material) that you submit to the Website, for whatever purpose.
You grant us a worldwide, irrevocable, non-exclusive, royalty-free licence to use, reproduce, adapt, publish, translate and distribute your content in any existing or future media. You also grant us the right to sub-license these rights and the right to bring an action for infringement of these rights.
Any content you upload to the Website will be considered non-confidential and non-proprietary, and we have the right to use, copy, distribute and disclose to third parties any such content for any purpose.
We also have the right to disclose your identity to any third party who is claiming that any content posted or uploaded by you to the Website constitutes a violation of their intellectual property rights, or of their right to privacy.
You warrant and represent that your content will comply with these terms of use and you will be liable to us and indemnify us for any breach.
Your content must not be illegal or unlawful, must not infringe any third party's legal rights and must not be capable of giving rise to legal action whether against you, us or a third party (in each case under any applicable law).
You must not submit any content to the Website that is or has ever been the subject of any threatened or actual legal proceedings or other similar complaint.
We reserve the right to edit or remove any material submitted to the Website, or stored on our servers, or hosted or published upon the Website.
The views expressed by other users on the Website do not represent our views or values.
Notwithstanding our rights under these terms of use in relation to your content, we do not undertake to monitor the submission of such content to, or the publication of such content on, the Website. We will not be responsible, or liable to any third party, for the content or accuracy of any content posted by you or any other user of the Website.
(6) European Personal Data
To the degree you may supply Ad4Game with any Personal Data (as defined in the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679), and the processing thereof,
            shall be administered under the terms of the Ad4Game Data Processing Agreement (“DPA”) available at
https://a4g.com/dpa.pdf
which shall become effective on May 25, 2018.
(7) Limitation of Liability and Disclaimer
You hereby acknowledge and agree that the Website is available for use ‘as is’ and ‘as available’, with no warranties of any kind whatsoever and that, without prejudice to the generality of the foregoing, we make no warranty regarding, and shall have no responsibility for, the accuracy, availability, reliability, security, fitness for purpose or performance of the Website or the contents thereof.
You acknowledge and agree that we may temporarily suspend access to the Website for any reason without notice, including but not limited to where there is a breakdown, error, defect or malfunction of any part of the Website.
Except as expressly set out in these Terms of Use, all representations, warranties, terms and conditions whether express or implied in relation to the Website or the information contained herein are hereby excluded to the fullest extent permitted by law.
Due to the fact that we cannot guarantee that the Website will be fault free or that the information contained on the Website will be correct, we do not accept any liability for any loss or damage whatsoever arising out of or in connection with the Website or the contents thereof, whether under theories of contract, tort (including negligence), strict liability or otherwise.
(8) Indemnity
You shall defend, indemnify and hold us and our officers, directors and employees harmless on demand from and against all claims, actions, proceedings, losses, damages, expenses and costs (including, without limitation, court costs and reasonable legal fees) arising out of or in connection with any breach by you of any provision of these terms of use, or arising out of any claim that you have breached any provision of these terms of use.
(9) Breaches of these terms of use
Without prejudice to our other rights under these terms of use, if you breach these terms of use in any way, we may take such action as we deem appropriate to deal with the breach, including suspending your access to the Website, prohibiting you from accessing the Website, blocking computers using your IP address from accessing the Website, contacting your internet service provider to request that they block your access to the Website and/or bringing court proceedings against you.
(10) Compliance with Applicable Laws
Due to the global nature of the Internet you agree to comply with all local laws regarding on-line conduct. You also agree to comply with any applicable rules regarding the export of any technical data from any country.
(11) Links to Other Websites
The Website may contain links to websites operated by third parties. Such links are provided for your convenience only. We have no control over these websites and we are not responsible for their availability or content. The inclusion on the Website of links to such other websites does not imply any endorsement of the material on such websites or any association with their operators. We will not be liable for any loss or damage that may arise from your use of them.
(12) Linking to the Website
You may link to the home page of the Website, provided you do so in a way that is fair and legal and does not damage our reputation or take advantage of it. You must not establish a link in such a way as to suggest any form of association, approval or endorsement on our part where none exists. You must not establish a link to the Website in any website that is not owned by you. The Website must not be framed on any other site, nor may you create a link to any part of the Website other than the home page. We reserve the right to withdraw linking permission without notice.
If you wish to make any use of content on the Website other than that set out above, please contact
support@a4g.com
.
(13) Variation
We may revise these terms of use and any documents referred to herein from time to time. Revised terms of use will apply to the use of the Website from the date of publication of the revised terms of use on the Website. The Website will specify the latest date on which the terms of use have been amended. Please check this page from time to time to take notice of any changes we have made, as they are binding on you if you continue to use the Website.
(14) Assignment
We may transfer, sub-contract or otherwise deal with our rights and/or obligations under these terms of use without notifying you or obtaining your consent.
You may not transfer, sub-contract or otherwise deal with your rights and/or obligations under these terms of use.
(15) Severability
If a provision of these terms of use is determined by any court or other competent authority to be unlawful and/or unenforceable, the other provisions will continue in effect. If any unlawful and/or unenforceable provision would be lawful or enforceable if part of it were deleted, that part will be deemed to be deleted, and the rest of the provision will continue in effect.
(16) Exclusion of third party rights
These terms of use are for the benefit of you and us, and are not intended to benefit any third party or be enforceable by any third party. The exercise of our and your rights in relation to these terms of use is not subject to the consent of any third party.
(17) Entire agreement
Subject to the first paragraph of Section 9, these terms of use, together with our privacy policy and DPA, constitute the entire agreement between you and us in relation to your use of the Website and supersede all previous agreements in respect of your use of the Website.
(18) Law and jurisdiction
These terms of use will be governed by and construed in accordance with laws of Ireland, and any disputes relating to these terms of use will be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of Ireland.
(19) Our details
The full name of our company is Ad4Game Ireland Limited (all references to
“we”
,
“us”
, or
“our”
in these terms refer to Ad4Game).
We are registered in Ireland under company number 529980 with registered address at 16 South Main Street, Naas, County Kildare, Ireland. Our main trading address is 6-9 Trinity Street, Dublin 2, Ireland. Our VAT number is IE3209107LH.
You can contact us by email to
contact@a4g.com
Last updated May 11th, 2018
Your Privacy
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Performance Cookies
Functional Cookies
Targeting Cookies
More Information
Privacy Preference Centre
Active
Always Active
Save Settings
Allow All
We use cookies to personalise content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyse our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners.
More Information
Close
Accept Cookies
Cookie Settings
Sub-policy 11
https://pubnative.net/privacy-notice/:
Skip to content
Legal
Product Privacy Notice
Date modified:
January 23, 2025
PRODUCT PRIVACY POLICY
With this privacy policy we, Verve Group Europe GmbH, Karl-Liebknecht-Str. 32, 10178 Berlin Germany (hereinafter „
VGE
“ or “
we
”) would like to inform you about the processing of personal data when using our mobile advertising optimization technology (“
VGE`s Technology
”). VGE’s Technology is integrated into mobile apps to provide personalized ad experiences. The providers of the respective apps (“Publishers”) provide you with additional information about the integration of VGE Technology in their apps.
This privacy policy describes our practices regarding the handling of personal data that we process from the Publishers’ users. Depending on the constellation, we may act as a controller or as a processor on behalf of the Publisher under data protection law. The relevant information about our relationship with the respective Publisher can be found in the Publisher’s privacy policies.
To access the privacy policy governing the processing of data when visiting our Website, please
click here.
1. Provider of VGE’s Technology
VGE’s Technology is provided by
Verve Group Europe GmbH
Karl-Liebknecht-Str. 32
10178 Berlin Germany
Where we are a controller of your data, this is also the entity acting as controller. Should you have any questions or suggestions regarding data protection, please do not hesitate to contact us. You are welcome to direct your data protection concerns to our data protection officer by sending an e-mail to
ten.e
1742212272
vitan
1742212272
bup@z
1742212272
tuhcs
1742212272
netad
1742212272
. Our full contact details are available
here.
Our Data Protection Officer:
Fieldfisher Tech Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH
Amerigo-Vespucci-Platz 1
20457 Hamburg, Germany
2. Personal Data processing in connection with VGE’s Technology
Data we receive.
First of all, we do not know who you (as a user) are. VGE neither processes direct identifiers, such as names, home addresses, e-mail addresses or similar information of users. That said, we only process data provided by the Publishers, including user information about the interaction with apps, which is recorded, stored and evaluated using temporary identifiers, which VGE cannot match to you as a person (so-called pseudonyms). If we are acting as a processor on behalf of the Publisher, the Publishers determine the purposes and means on how we process users’ data. We have established several technical and legal measures to safeguard that the Publisher’s users have given their consent for our processing.
Data we receive from Publishers differ. Provided there is a legal basis for processing, we typically process:
Device Identifiers such as the ID for Advertising for iOS (IDFA), Google Advertising ID
Device Characteristics (device model, platform, operating system version, browser details)
IP addresses
Authentication-derived identifiers
Browsing and interaction data
User-provided data
Non-precise location data
Privacy choices
2.2 Purposes of data processing and legal bases.
We process the data received from Publishers so that they can market ad space for targeted in-app advertising and targeting campaigns. When serving personalized mobile advertising, this gives advertisers the opportunity to target users who are actually interested in their products, offers and content.
Our processing activities include the following purposes. When we act as a controller, we rely on the following legal bases. If several legal bases are specified, the choice of the relevant legal basis depends on the decision of the respective Publisher. Further information can be found in the privacy policy of the Publisher.:
Purpose of processing
Legal basis
Store and/or access information on a deviceDevice or similar online identifiers together with other information (e.g. screen size, supported technologies etc.) can be stored or read on your device to recognise it each time it connects to an app or to a website, for one or several of the purposes presented here.
User’s consent (Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR
Use limited data to select advertisingAdvertising presented to you on the Publisher’s app can be based on limited data, such as the app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times an ad is presented to you).
User’s consent if chosen by the Publisher (Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR Our legitimate interest in being able to offer our publishers a meaningful product (Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR)
Use limited data to select advertising taking into account their approximate location when permitted by the user’s deviceServing ads to the users taking into account their age, gender, keywords or interests when provided by the user in the host mobile app on the user’s device. Race, religion, politics, sex life, or health are unavailable targeting criterions in VGE’s Technology
User’s consent (Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR
Create profiles for personalised advertisingInformation about your activity on the Publisher’s app (such as information you submit, content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (for example, information from your previous activity on the Publisher’s service and other websites and apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (that might include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present advertising that appears more relevant based on your possible interests by this and other entities.
User’s consent (Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR
Use profiles to select personalised advertisingAdvertising presented to you on the Publisher’s app can be based on your advertising profiles, which can reflect your activity on the Publisher’s service or other websites or apps (like the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects.
User’s consent (Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR
Measure advertising performanceInformation regarding which advertising is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine how well an advert has worked for you or other users and whether the goals of the advertising were reached. For instance, whether you saw an ad, whether you clicked on it, whether it led you to buy a product or visit a website, etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of advertising campaigns.
User’s consent if chosen by the Publisher (Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR Our legitimate interest in being able to offer our publishers a meaningful product (Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR)
Develop and improve servicesInformation about your activity on this service, such as your interaction with ads or content, can be very helpful to improve products and services and to build new products and services based on user interactions, the type of audience, etc. This specific purpose does not include the development or improvement of user profiles and identifiers.
Our legitimate interest in improving our product (Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errorsYour data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent activity (for example, regarding advertising, ad clicks by bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely. It can also be used to correct any problems you, the publisher or the advertiser may encounter in the delivery of content and ads and in your interaction with them.
Our legitimate interest in being able to offer our Publishers a useful and error-free product (Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR)
Deliver and present advertising and contentCertain information (like an IP address or device capabilities) is used to ensure the technical compatibility of the content or advertising, and to facilitate the transmission of the content or ad to your device.
We are unable to combine the data we receive in a way that would enable us to personally identify users and we do not combine the data with any third-party data that would enable us to do so.
2.3 Data recipients.
VGE only discloses data to other parties if this is necessary for the implementation of campaigns or other purposes listed in this privacy notice, or if another legal basis for the disclosure of data exists. The collection and processing of usage data by the mobile app Publishers are controlled by the respective Publishers.
In the context of the serving of ads, data are exchanged between VGE and partner advertisers on the bid request level (to get an ad) or in aggregated form for reporting and fraud analysis. Partner advertisers include demand side platforms, ad-exchanges and advertisers.  This might include the following information on the bid request level:
device information (device model, platform, operating system version, browser details)
targeting information (county, city, hyperlocation when allowed to be collected)
user information (such as device ID, hashed device ID, age, gender and interests, when allowed to be collected).
If VGE uses its own external service providers (e.g. data centers), the service providers may only use the data to fulfill their task. All service providers have been carefully selected and commissioned. They are bound by the instructions of VGE and are regularly checked. In cases where data is processed in countries outside the European Union, appropriate safeguards are always in place to protect data subjects, such as Adequacy Decisions by the European Commission or Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs)
2.4 Joint controllership
VGE is a service provider, so we work with Publishers to process data. With some of these Publishers, we are joint controllers within the meaning of data protection law (Art. 26 GDPR). This joint controllership generally relates to the collection and transfer of data to us. If we are joint controllers, we and the Publishers have divided certain tasks among ourselves. The division is as follows:
2.4.1 We provide the Publisher with a technical solution that the Publisher integrates into its apps. This technology enables the data described in this policy to be collected. We are also supporting the Publishers, in the processing of enquiries from data subjects.
2.4.2 The Publisher obtains consent where necessary and implements transparency information towards you. They pass this information on to us to communicate the scope and permissibility of the data processing.
2.4.3 The Publishers and VGE will ensure that the necessary data security is in place. Both we and the Publishers will also fulfil our reporting and notification obligations individually but will support and inform us to the extent necessary.
2.4.4 You can exercise your rights as a data subject as described below (see section 3) both against us and against the Publisher. We and the Publisher are liable for any processing that does not comply with the provisions of the GDPR in accordance with Art. 82 GDPR.
If you have any further questions on the topic of joint controllership, we will be happy to provide you with further information on our cooperation with certain Publishers. Please contact
ten.e
1742212272
vitan
1742212272
bup@y
1742212272
cavir
1742212272
p
1742212272
.
2.5 Retention period.
The collected data are stored for as long as the usage data and data about interactions with ads and installations of new apps are required for the described purposes. After that, the data are deleted or completely anonymized. We will further delete personal data immediately when the Publisher informs us that the user has withdrawn consent. We will, however, retain and use information as long as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
3. Users’ rights
If VGE is acting as the controller, users have the following rights regarding their personal data:
3.1 Right to access information about the processing of their personal data by VGE. In this regard, VGE will explain the data processing to you as the user and provide you with an overview of the data stored about you. For this purpose, you may also contact the Publisher. Whenever needed and upon request, we will assist the Publisher.
3.2 If data stored by VGE is incorrect or no longer up to date, you have the right to have this data corrected.
3.3 You may also demand that your data be erased. Should the erasure not be possible in exceptional cases due to other legal regulations, the data will be blocked so that it is only available for that legal purpose.
3.4 You may also have the processing of your personal data restricted, if for example, you have doubts as to the accuracy of the data.
3.5 You also have the right to data portability, which means that on request VGE will send you a digital copy of the personal data you have provided.
3.6 You also have the right to object to data processing, insofar as this is based on legitimate interests pursuant to Art. 6 (1) (f) GDPR. In particular, you can object to the processing of your data for advertising purposes at any time. The opt-out function described below can be used for this purpose at any time.
3.7 You also have the right to withdraw your consent for us to process your personal data. To do this, please follow the Publisher’s instructions.
3.8 You also have the right to complain to the data protection supervisory authority responsible for VGE (Berlin Commissioner for Data Protection and Freedom of Information, Alt-Moabit 59-61, 10555 Berlin) or to your competent authority. You are also free to contact your local data protection authority, which will then forward your request to the competent authority.
4. Opt-out
If you no longer wish to receive targeted in-app advertising that is deployed based on VGE’s Technology, you may do so through the device-level advertising preference setting available in the settings menus of your iOS and/or Android devices.
Android Users (version 2.3 and above)
To use the “opt-out of interest-based advertising” option, follow the instructions provided by Google here:
Google Play Help
.
iOS users (version 6 and above)
To use the “Limit Ad-Tracking” option, follow the instructions provided by Apple here:
Apple Support Center
Please note that these are device settings and will disable interest-based ads from all providers, and not just for us. We have decided to offer this way of opting-out, as we estimate users will either want to receive interest-based advertising or no interest-based advertising at all. The above-described way is most efficient to achieve that goal.
You may also request deleting your data or opt-out of targeted in-app advertising via e-mail to
ten.e
1742212272
vitan
1742212272
bup@y
1742212272
cavir
1742212272
p
1742212272
.
5. Changes to this Privacy Policy
We reserve the right to change or update this Privacy Policy at any time in accordance with the currently applicable data protection regulations. This website always contains the latest version of the VGE Technology Privacy Policy.
Sub-policy 12
https://www.adcolony.com/privacy-policy/:
Notice at Collection and Website
Privacy Policy
Last Updated
: October 2023.
We at Digital Turbine, Inc. (“
Digital Turbine
,” “
we
,” “
us,
” or “
our
”) put great efforts into making sure that we secure personal information related to you and use it properly.
The notice at collection (“
Notice at Collection
”) and privacy policy (“
Policy
,” and collectively: the “
Notices
”) provided on this page explain our privacy practices for processing personal information related to you when you use our website at
www.digitalturbine.com
(the “
Website
”).
The term “
personal information
” refers to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular individual consumer or household that identifies an individual or relates to an identifiable individual. For example, personal information is your name, email address, telephone number, and other contact details that you submit to us or that we collect from your mobile device or app.
These Notices apply to visitors to our Website (“
Customers
”).
The summary of this policy will give you a quick and clear view of our practices. Please take the time to read our full policy. If you disagree with this Privacy Policy, please do not access or use our Website.
The Policy Summary below will give you a quick and clear view of our practices. The first six headings in the summary also serve as the Notice at Collection.
Notice at Collection and Summary of the Policy
Categories of personal information you provide us.
We receive and store any information you enter on our Website or give us in any other way. If you register for our newsletter blog or fill out any form on our Website, we will collect your name, company name, and work email address.
Read More
Categories of personal information that we collect
We automatically log ‘traffic/session’ information, including IP addresses and user agents. We collect session durations and additional activity information.
Read More below
Categories of sensitive personal information
The Website is not intended to collect sensitive personal information (within the meaning of US Privacy Laws), we do not knowingly collect such data, and we require that you do not provide us with such data.
Read More below
What do we do with personal information?
We maintain the Website, make it better and continue developing it, and protect us and the Website from misuse and law violations.
Read More below
Who do we disclose, share, or sell personal information with or to?
We use service providers, for example, to send email messages and to store data. We will transfer personal information when we change our corporate structure and share the information with our affiliate entities. We will also obey authorities’ orders and other lawful requirements to disclose information.
Read More below
How long do we retain personal information?
We retain personal information for the length of time required to provide the Website and/or the newsletter or blog to the extent you signed up to either one and for legitimate and lawful purposes, as further explained in the
data retention section
of this policy.
Read More below
Your choices and rights
General:
We will give you various choices about how we use and share personal information related to you, and we will respect your choices. You can stop using the Website, newsletter, or blog at any time or request that your subscription be terminated, following which we will stop collecting personal information related to you. You also have rights under applicable laws, as further detailed in the Policy.
Read More below
US Laws:
In addition to your rights under other sections of the Policy, if you are a United States resident, you have additional rights applicable to processing personal information related to you, as further detailed in the Policy.
Read More below
Exercising your rights
You can terminate your subscription to our newsletter or blog or request that your account be terminated by contacting us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
.
You can unsubscribe to our mailing lists by clicking the “Unsubscribe” link in these emails and confirming the email address for which you would like to unsubscribe.
You can request to exercise any of the rights detailed under this policy by contacting us.
Suppose you are a resident of the United States. In that case, you can also exercise your rights to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information related to you by visiting our
Do not Sell or Share My Personal Information
page.
Aggregated and analytical information.
Aggregated data is not identifiable. We use it for legitimate business purposes and standard analytical tools.
Read More below
Specific provisions for U.S. residents
Suppose you reside in the United States (U.S.). In that case, further terms apply to our processing about your rights as a data subject under U.S. state laws governing the protection of privacy and personal information, for example, the California Privacy Rights Act of 2022 (CPRA).
Read More below
Transfer of Personal information outside your territory
We keep personal information related to you in the United States and will store it at additional sites at our discretion. Our service providers provide us with adequate security and confidentiality commitments.
Read More below
Cookies and other tracking technologies
We use cookies to make it easier to log in and facilitate any website activity.
Read More below
Information Security
We implement systems, applications, and procedures to secure personal information related to you to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of information.
Read More below
Dispute Resolution
Contact us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
or write us for every request and complaint. We will make good-faith efforts to resolve any existing or potential dispute with you.
Read More below
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We will update our policy from time to time after giving proper notice.
Read More below
Incorporation of the Terms of Use
This policy is an integral part of the Digital Turbine’s
Terms of Use
or, if applicable, of any other Digital Turbine service subscription agreement between you (or the entity you are acting on its behalf) and us.
Read More below
Contact Us
Don’t hesitate to contact us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
for further information.
Read More below
The Digital Turbine Website Privacy Policy
Categories of Personal Information That You Provide Us
We receive and store any information you enter on our Website or give us in any other way. For example, when you contact us via the Website, we receive any information you provide.
When you contact us to apply for a job with us, you provide us with personal information related to you, which we process for recruitment and general HR purposes.
Categories of Personal Information That We Collect
Like many websites, we use “cookies” (for further information about cookies, please see our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
), and we obtain information when your browser accesses our Website.
We also receive information about your online activity from third-party analytics services when you use the Website. For more information, please see this policy’s “Aggregated and Analytical Information” section.
Examples of such information we collect and analyze include the Internet Protocol (IP) address, login, e-mail address, device and connection information such as browser type, version, time zone setting, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system, and platform.
What Do We Do with Personal Information?
We use personal information related to you for the following purposes:
To provide you with the Website, newsletter, or blog you may have registered to or to contact you if you filled out a form requesting us to do so;
to provide you with notifications related to your use of the Website, such as electronic newsletters, blogs, or promotional emails;
to solicit your feedback and provide support;
to maintain the Website and to continue developing and making it better;
We obey the law and expect you to do the same. If necessary, we will use personal information related to you to enforce our terms, policies, and legal agreements, to comply with court orders and warrants, and assist law enforcement agencies, to collect debts, prevent fraud, misappropriation, infringements, identity thefts and any other misuse of our Website, and to take any action in any legal dispute and proceeding.
We commit to process personal information related to you solely for the purposes described in this policy.
Who do we Disclose, Share, or Sell Personal Information related to you with?
We do not sell, rent, or lease personal information related to you.
Personal information related to you is shared with certain employees, external consultants, and our affiliates, who are all governed by this Policy.
We also share personal information related to you with our vendors worldwide and third-party service providers that process your personal information on our behalf. Such vendors and service providers are contractually bound to keep personal information related to you confidential and appropriately secure.
A merger, acquisition, or any other structural change will require us to transfer personal information related to you to another entity as part of the structural change, provided that the receiving entity will comply with this policy.
We will share personal information related to you only subject to the terms of this policy or subject to your prior consent.
We will need to disclose personal information related to you in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
How__Long
How Long Do We Retain Personal Information?
We retain different types of personal information related to you for different periods, depending on the purposes for processing the information, our legitimate business purposes, and pursuant to legal requirements under applicable law.
We will maintain your contact details to help us stay in contact with you. You can contact our privacy team at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
and request to delete your contact details. Note that we will keep your details without using them if necessary and for the necessary period of time for legal requirements and proceedings.
We will retain personal information related to you after you have left our Website if retention is reasonably necessary to resolve disputes between our users, to prevent fraud and abuse, or to enforce this Privacy Policy and our
Terms of Use
. We will keep aggregated non-identifiable information without limitation, and to the extent reasonable, we will delete or de-identify potentially identifiable information when we no longer need to process the information.
In any case, we will keep information about you for as long as you use our Website unless applicable law requires us to delete it or if we decide to remove it at our discretion, according to the terms of this policy and our
Terms of Use
.
Your Choices and Rights
General
‍
The section below applies to all Users, regardless of which laws apply to processing personal information related to them.
We will give you choices about how we use and share personal information related to you, and we will respect your choices.
We will send newsletters or promotional communications to our users. To unsubscribe to these communications, you must click an “Unsubscribe” link in these emails and confirm the email address for which you would like to unsubscribe.
We collect and receive personal information related to you that we need for the purposes described in this policy. You can stop using our Website at any time; thereafter, we will stop collecting personal information related to you. However, as detailed above, we will store and continue to use or make available certain personal information related to you.
You may request that your account be terminated and that personal information related to you be deleted by contacting us. Any termination of your account will involve deleting your account information from our live databases and storing all the information and data for such an account.
You may request a copy of the personal information related to you that we store about you by contacting us. You may also request that we transfer personal information related to you or provide you with copies of such personal information to enable its transfer to a third party.
When we delete personal information related to you that we have collected from or about you, it will be deleted from our active databases. Still, we will keep a reasonable number of copies in our archives. Although we will deactivate your account, we will continue to retain the personal information related to you for legitimate business purposes as set forth above.
Web browsers offer a “Do Not Track” (“
DNT
”) signal. A DNT signal is an HTTP header field indicating your preference for tracking your activities on our Website or through cross-site user tracking. Our Website does not respond to DNT signals.
Additional Rights Applicable to United States Residents
In addition to your rights under the general section above, if you are a resident of the United States (“
US
”), you are also entitled to the following specific rights under federal and state laws and regulations governing the protection of personal information and Privacy (“
US Privacy Laws
”), regarding personal information related to you:
Access and Data Portability
. You have the right to request that we disclose certain information about our collection and use of personal information related to you over the past 12 months. Upon verification of your request, we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that personal information;
The categories of personal information that we disclosed for a business purpose and the categories of third parties with whom we disclosed that particular category of personal information;
The specific pieces of personal information that we collected about you;
Suppose we disclose personal information related to you for a business purpose. In that case, we will provide you with a list identifying the personal information categories each recipient obtained.
Correction
. You have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
Deletion
. You have the right to request that we delete any personal information related to you. Upon confirmation of your request, we will delete personal information related to you from our records unless an exception applies. Note that when we delete personal information related to you that we have collected from or about you, it will be deleted from our active databases. Still, we will keep a reasonable number of copies in our archives. We will continue to retain your personal information for legitimate business purposes, as set forth under the section titled
“Specific Provisions for US Residents”
in this policy.
Opt-out of Selling or Sharing
. You have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information related to you or otherwise the use of such data for targeted advertising or profiling for the purpose of making decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you. As detailed above, we do not sell or share personal information. Still, we do engage third parties that collect personal information on our Website to provide us with services that, although they do not pay us for collecting information, the right granted to them may be considered as disclosure for the purpose of sale or sharing. You can opt out of such processing at any time by contacting us or visiting our
Do not Sell or Share My Personal Information
.
Non-discrimination
. You also have a right not to be discriminated against for exercising your rights under US Privacy Laws.
Exercising Your Rights
If you wish to exercise any of your rights in relation to personal information related to you, please send us an email to
privacy@digitalturbine.com
.
You can stop using the Website at any time.
You may also control what personal information we collect from your device by changing the permissions settings on your browser or mobile device.
You may request to exercise the rights detailed under this section by submitting your request to us by emailing
privacy@digitalturbine.com.
Note that only you or a person authorized to act on your behalf may make a request related to personal information related to you. A request for access can be made by you only twice within a 12-month period.
Also note that your request must provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative and describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to understand, evaluate, and respond to it properly.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with the requested personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information related to you. We will only use the personal information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will do our best to respond to your request within 30 days of receipt. If we require more time (up to 30 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. We will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding receipt of your request. Our response will also explain why we cannot comply with a request, if applicable.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If the request warrants a fee, we will inform you of the reasons for such a decision and provide a cost estimate before completing your request.
We will not require that you create an account to exercise your rights under this Policy, and we will not increase the cost or decrease the availability of our Website based solely on the fact that you have chosen to exercise one of your rights.
After receiving our reply, you can appeal against our decision by contacting us. We will review your appeal and provide you with our answer and our explanation of the reasons for our decision(s) within 60 days of receiving it. We will also provide you with a link (to the extent available) where you can submit a complaint with the relevant Attorney General or Supervisory Authority, as applicable.
Aggregated and Analytical Information
We use standard analytics tools. The privacy practices of these tools are subject to their own privacy policies, and they use their own cookies to provide their service (for further information about cookies, please see our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
).
We use the standard analytics tools of Google Analytics, and we will use additional or other analytics tools from time to time to learn how you and other users use our Website to support its related activities and operations.
The privacy practices of these tools are subject to their own privacy policies. See Google Analytics Privacy Policy at
Privacy Policy – Privacy & Terms – Google
.
We use anonymous, statistical, or aggregated information and will share it with our partners for legitimate business purposes. It has no effect on your privacy because there is no reasonable way to extract data from the aggregated information that we or others can associate specifically with you.
Specific Provisions for United States Residents
This section applies solely to all visitors, users, and others who reside in the US.
Any terms defined under US Privacy Laws have the same meaning when used in this section.
Additionally, as used under this section and the rest of this Policy, personal information is defined under applicable US Privacy Laws.
This chapter supersedes any contradicting provisions under the other sections of this policy.
We have collected the personal information related to you described above under the sections titled “
Categories of Personal Information You Provide Us
” and “
Categories of Personal Information that We Collect
” of this Policy. Such Information consists of the following categories:
Identifiers and personal information categories are listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, search history, and information regarding your interaction with the Website.
Commercial information, including products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Geolocation data, namely your physical location or movements.
Inferences are drawn from any of the above-mentioned information.
We obtain the categories of personal information related to you listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly and indirectly from you and your activity on the Website.
Third parties such as reliable service providers.
We use the personal information related to you that we collect or receive for the purposes mentioned under the section “
What Do We Do With Personal Information
?” of this Policy.
We disclose personal information related to you to third parties for business purposes as described above under the section titled “
Who Do We Disclose, Share, or Sell Personal Information With?
”.
We do not sell personal information related to you.
Categories of Sensitive Personal Information
The Website is not intended to collect sensitive personal information (within the meaning of US Privacy Laws). We do not knowingly collect or allow others to collect sensitive personal information about you, and we require you not to provide us with any such data.
Selling and Sharing Personal Information
We do not sell or share personal information. However, we engage third parties to provide services such as analytics, marketing automation, and user experience and allow them to collect personal information on our Website.
We do not knowingly sell or share consumers’ personal information of children under 16 years of age.
The categories of personal information collected by these third parties in the preceding 12 months include identifiers, online activities, and inferences drawn from such activities.
These third parties do not pay us for collecting such information. Still, the right granted to them to collect personal information may be considered as disclosure for the purpose of sale or sharing for cross-context behavioral advertising. At any time, you can opt out of collecting personal information from our service providers by contacting us or visiting our
Do not Sell or Share My Personal Information
page.
Storing of Personal Information in the United States
In the United States, we store and process information from our Website, including personal information, either directly or using third parties, such as data hosting service providers. Digital Turbine has data centers in the United States.
Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to ensure our Website is continuously improved and meets your needs. Please view our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
for more information on our use of cookies.
Information Security
Digital Turbine is committed to ensuring the security of personal information. We and our hosting services implement systems, applications, and procedures to secure personal information related to you to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of information. These measures provide sound industry-standard security.
However, please understand that no security system is impenetrable. Although we make efforts to protect your privacy, we cannot guarantee that the Website will be immune from any wrongdoings, malfunctions, unlawful interceptions or access, or other kinds of abuse and misuse.
Dispute Resolution
We do periodical assessments of our data processing and privacy practices to ensure that we comply with this policy, update the policy when we believe that we need to, and verify that we display the policy properly and in an accessible manner. If you have any concerns about how we process personal information related to you, you are welcome to contact our privacy team at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
or write to us.
We will look into your query and make good-faith efforts to resolve any existing or potential dispute with you.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
From time to time, we will update this policy. If the updates have minor, if any, consequences, they will take effect 14 days after we post a notice on the Website. Substantial changes will be effective 30 days after we initially posted the notice.
Until the new policy takes effect, if it materially reduces the protection of your privacy right under the then-existing policy, you can choose not to accept it and stop using our Website. Continuing to use the Website after the new policy takes effect means that you agree to the new policy. Note that if we need to adapt the policy to legal requirements, the new policy will become effective immediately or as required by law.
Incorporation to the Terms of Use
This policy is an integral part of the Digital Turbine
Terms of Use
or, if applicable, of any other service agreement between you (or the entity you are acting on its behalf) and us or any of our corporate affiliates.
Contact Us
Don’t hesitate to get in touch with us at
privacy@digitalturbine.com
Sub-policy 13
https://www.smaato.com/privacy/:
Platform
Monetize
SPX Monetization Solution
Integration Center
Mediation Options
Programmatic Deals
Header Bidding Solutions
Advertise
SDX Marketer Solution
Extend Your Reach
Customer Data Platform (CDP)
Consent Management Platform (CMP)
Smaato Intelligence (SI)
Prepackaged Deals
Omnichannel Advertising
Native Ads
OTT/CTV Ads
Video Ads
Display Ads
Market Quality
Overview
Ad Quality
Traffic Quality
Insights
Case Studies
Guides and Reports
Videos & Webinars
Whitepapers
View All
Company
About
Events
Careers
Our Values
In the News
Marketplace Overview
Blog
Docs
Contact
Log In
Publishers: SPX
Marketers: SDX
Get Started
Home
|
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
Smaato Privacy Policy governing information provided to us from your use of the Smaato Site
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
EU Applicant Privacy Policy
CCPA Applicant Privacy Notice
SG Applicant Privacy Policy
CCPA Privacy Notice
Publisher Policies
Demand Policies
Partner List
Cookie Policy
SDK License Agreement
Effective Date:
November 7, 2024
1. Introduction and Background
2. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Ad Services
3. Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs
4. Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options
5. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Websites
6. Data Access and Retention
7. Data Security
8. Third-Party Websites and Apps
9. Users from Outside the United States
10. California Do-Not-Track Statement
11. The EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
12. Our Memberships and Affiliations
13. Changes to This Privacy Policy
14. Contacting Us
Smaato, Inc. (“Smaato,” “we,” “our,” or “us”) provides this privacy policy to explain how we collect, use, and share information. This privacy policy (“Policy”) covers Smaato’s handling of two types of information:
Information we receive from our Clients about end users (“End Users”) of third-party mobile applications (“apps”) that use our Software Development Kit (“SDK”), other collection interfaces (collectively, “APIs”), the Smaato Demand Platform (“SDX”), or the Smaato Publisher Platform (“SPX”) (collectively, the “Smaato Ad Services”), and
Information we receive through our corporate website at www.smaato.com or any other website on which this Policy is posted, as well as information we get through other corporate services and web portals we make available to clients and business partners (“Smaato Websites”). We describe the information received through the Smaato Websites in Section 5 below, titled “Privacy Practices for the Smaato Websites.”
We encourage consumers to learn about how information (including information we collect) can be used to market to them, and how to exercise their choices to permit or limit such marketing. We describe ways consumers can exercise that choice or opt-out of marketing in Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.”
1. Introduction and Background
Smaato provides mobile advertising technology services that facilitate transactions among demand-side platforms, advertisers, app developers, publishers of mobile websites and/or apps, and ad exchanges (collectively, “Clients”), and service providers (collectively “Partners”). We do this by making available the Smaato Ad Services and other tools to Clients. Clients use the Smaato Ad Services and other tools to deliver advertising to End Users, and we in turn provide our services to help Clients (and their own customers) to deliver ads that are of interest to End Users. We explain what SDKs and APIs are in Section 3 below, titled “Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs,” which also explains how cookies and similar technologies (which we also use to provide the Smaato Ad Services) work.
2. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Ad Services
a. Information Collected Through the Smaato Ad Services
Through the Smaato Ad Services, we may collect information about End Users (to the extent that Clients pass such information to Smaato), which includes:
IP addresses, from which geographic location may be inferred, as well as system configuration information such as information about End Users’ operating system;
Rough geolocation information;
Cookie IDs, Mobile advertising identifiers, such as iOS IDFAs and Google Advertising IDs (collectively, “Mobile IDs”);
Age;
Gender;
Device type and other device information (e.g., whether an End User is using a smartphone or tablet, and related information);
Network provider;
Mobile browser (e.g., Firefox, Safari, and Chrome); and
Other unique identifiers that may be associated with an End Users’ device, including identifiers provided by Clients or their service providers.
We refer to all of the above information as the “Service Information.”
b. How We Use the Information Collected Through the Smaato Ad Services
We use the Service Information to provide a variety of services to our Clients related to advertising and marketing, including services we may describe elsewhere on Smaato Websites. This includes use of the Service Information for purposes such as to:
Provide customer, technical, and operational support for the Smaato Ad Services, detect and protect against errors, fraud, or other criminal activity, and resolve disputes and enforce our terms and conditions and other rights we may have. This may also include analyzing, customizing, and improving the features of the Smaato Ad Services;
Provide information and analytics to Clients about the advertising inventory provided through the Smaato Ad Services;
We, or our Clients, may deploy online cookies to track End Users across mobile websites and/or apps, or to associate End Users and these cookies with Mobile IDs. You can learn more about cookies and similar technologies, such as web beacons and SDKs, in Section 3 below, titled “Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs.”
c. How We Share Information We Collect Through the Smaato Ad Services
We share the Service Information with Clients and Partners in order to provide the Smaato Ad Services. For example, we share the Service Information with:
Clients and their marketing and service providers, so they may provide targeted advertising to End Users on mobile websites and/or apps;
Partners that facilitate the functioning of the Smaato Ad Services (e.g., traffic and ad quality verification vendors and data centers).
Even when a Client no longer accesses our SDK, we may continue to use and share Service Information as described in this Policy. The processes we described above often involve cookies or similar technologies, which may be associated with other information about End Users, such as End Users’ interests, demographics, or transactions. This is generally known as “interest-based advertising.” We encourage individuals who are interested in controlling or learning about this type of advertising to go to Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options,” or go to the Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA’s) website at www.aboutads.info. We may also share Service Information with third parties:
Pursuant to a request or authorization by an End User or Client;
If the disclosure is provided to: (a) comply in good faith with applicable laws, rules, regulations, governmental and quasi-governmental requests, court orders, or subpoenas, including for purposes of national security and law enforcement; (b) enforce our terms and conditions or other agreements; or (c) protect our, or any other person’s or entity’s, interests, rights, property, or safety, or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual unlawful activity;
Where the information is aggregated or de-identified; and
As part of a business purchase, sale, merger, consolidation, investment, change in control, transfer of all or substantially all of our assets, reorganization or liquidation, bankruptcy, or in connection with steps taken in anticipation of such an event (e.g. due diligence).
3. Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs
a. Cookies and Pixel Tags
Cookies are small data files containing a string of characters, such as unique browser identifiers. Cookies are stored on your computer or other device and act as unique tags that identify your browser. Our servers may deploy a cookie on your browser when you visit the Smaato Websites. Our Clients and Partners may do likewise on the Smaato Websites, our Clients’ and Partners’ websites, and elsewhere. Smaato may use both session cookies and persistent cookies. Persistent cookies, unlike session cookies, remain after you close your browser, and may be used by your browser on subsequent visits to any given website. Using persistent cookies, a site operator (or a third party they work with) can “remember” what you have previously done on a website and personalize the site, or ads you see, for you. This technology may also provide a site operator or third party (or us, when you visit the Smaato Websites) with information regarding your IP address, browser type, the web pages that you visit just before or after visiting a website, the web pages viewed, and the dates and times of your visits. A pixel tag (also commonly known as a web beacon or clear GIF) is an invisible 1 x 1 pixel that is placed on certain web pages. When you access a web page with a pixel tag, the pixel tag may generate a generic notice of the visit, and permit us, or our Clients or Partners, to set or read cookies. Pixel tags are used in combination with cookies to track the activity on a website by a particular browser on a particular device. If you disable cookies, pixel tags simply detect a given website visit. We, alone or with our Clients and Partners, may use cookies to, for example, “remember” you, track trends, and collect information about how you use our Clients’ or Partners’ websites or interact with advertising. We, and our Clients and Partners, use cookies to provide relevant content to you and replace non-relevant ads with ads that better match your interests. If you wish to opt-out of interest-based mobile advertising, please see Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.” Please note that disabling cookies may prevent you from accessing some of the Smaato Websites’ functionalities and offerings, and those of other websites you visit.
b. Mobile Device Identifiers and SDKs
We, or our Clients or Partners, may use or work with mobile SDKs (including our own SDK(s), which are described in more detail in this Policy) to collect information, such as Mobile IDs, and information related to how mobile devices and their users interact with our Smaato Ad Services and those using our Smaato Ad Services. The SDK is computer code that app developers can include in their apps to enable ads to be shown, data to be collected, and related services to be implemented. Sometimes, we obtain data through other (generally, simpler) interfaces that deliver similar data to us, which are commonly referred to (and which we refer to) as APIs. We may use these technologies, for example, to analyze or measure certain advertising through apps and browsers based on information associated with your mobile device. If you would like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you in this way on your mobile device, please follow the instructions in Section 4 below, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.”
4. Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options
In most cases, consumers have control over whether or not they would like to receive relevant ads and marketing emails from our Clients. To change the settings for the cookies Smaato sets on your devices through the Smaato Websites, please visit our Cookie Policy.
a. Opting Out of Online Interest-Based Advertising from Cookies
You can opt-out of many of the publishers, platforms and service providers we work with that support online interest-based advertising from cookies or similar technologies by visiting the Digital Advertising Alliance’s consumer education and opt-out page at http://www.aboutads.info (or the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s opt-out page at http://www.youronlinechoices.eu if you are located in the European Union). Some of our publisher Clients have their own opt-out mechanisms that are linked from their websites or their online-posted privacy policies. You should review the privacy policies of those companies for these opt-out links if you no longer wish to receive targeted advertising from a certain company, or multiple companies. You can also click below to opt-out of having the Smaato Ad services used to select ads for your browser based on your online web browsing behavior. When you opt-out, an opt-out cookie (from smaato.net) will be stored in your web browser. Our platform will know the choice you have made when it sees your opt-out cookie, and will apply your choice to all companies using Smaato Ad services for online interest-based advertising from cookies. Please note: This type of opt-out is cookie-based, which means that if you block cookies, upgrade your browser or delete your cookies, you will need to opt-out again. Also, in order for your opt-out choice to be effective, you must ensure that your browser is set to accept third-party cookies such as the Smaato opt-out cookie. Some browsers block third-party cookies by default, and you may need to change your browser settings to accept third-party cookies before opting out. If you use a different device or browser, or erase cookies from your browser, you will need to renew your opt-out choice. Even if you opt-out, Smaato may continue to collect data for other purposes and you still will receive advertising from the Smaato Ad Service when you visit websites of a publisher Client who uses our Platform – but such advertising will not be personalized to you.
b. Opting Out of Cross-App Advertising on Mobile Devices
You can opt-out of having your Mobile IDs used for certain types of interest-based mobile advertising (also called “cross-app advertising”), including those performed by Smaato, by accessing the settings on your Apple or Android mobile device, as follows:
Apple Devices: If you have an Apple device, you can opt-out of most cross-app advertising by updating to iOS 6.0 or higher and enabling “Limit Ad Tracking.”
iOS 7 and Higher: Go to Settings → Privacy → Advertising, and toggle “Limit Ad Tracking” to ‘ON.’
iOS 6: Go to Settings → General → About → Advertising, and toggle “Limit Ad Tracking” to ‘ON.’
Android Devices: If you have an Android device, you can opt-out of most cross-app advertising by going to Google Settings → Ads, and selecting the option to opt-out of interest-based ads.
Please note that these platforms control how these settings work, so the above instructions may change, and the precise language may be different on certain (particularly, on older) devices. Likewise, if your device uses other platforms not described above, please check the settings for those devices.
c. Additional Choices
Advertisers may also provide ways for you to opt-out from, or limit their collection of, certain information from and about you. Please refer to the privacy policies for retailers, apps, and mobile websites to learn more about their privacy practices. You may opt-out from receiving promotional emails from us, such as emails to inform you about events and new services, by following the “unsubscribe” instructions in any promotional email you receive, or by contacting us at
marketing@smaato.com
*protected email*
. Please note, however, that we may still send you non-promotional emails relating to your relationship with us.
5. Privacy Practices for the Smaato Websites
a. Information We Collect Through the Smaato Websites
The Smaato Websites provide information regarding Smaato and our products and services. Through the Smaato Websites, we collect the information you voluntarily disclose to us, and we may also obtain automatically-collected information.
i. Information You Disclose to Us
When registering for an account, expressing an interest in obtaining additional information about Smaato or our products and services, or otherwise contacting us through the Smaato Websites, we collect the information you voluntarily disclose to us, such as your name, mailing address, email address, telephone number, credit card number, and other billing information. You may also provide us with certain information about your business or other individuals.
ii. Automatically-Collected Information
When you visit the Smaato Websites, we may use cookies and pixel tags that we associate with unique identifiers to keep track of visitor interactions and personalize your experience on the Smaato Websites. For more information, please see Section 3 above, titled “Cookies, Pixel Tags, and SDKs.” We may also use third-party services, such as Google Analytics, that gather information such as your IP address, browser type, the web page from which you came to the Smaato Websites, and the times of your visit. In addition, as you browse the Smaato Websites, advertising cookies may be placed on your computer so that we can “remember” your interests. Our display advertising partners may then help us retarget ads to you on other sites based on your interactions with the Smaato Websites. To opt-out of such interest-based mobile advertising, please see Section 4 above, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options.” Opting out in this way will not prevent you from receiving ads; rather, the ads you see will be less customized to you.
b. How We Use Information We Collect Through the Smaato Websites
In addition to the uses described elsewhere in this Policy, we use the information we collect through the Smaato Websites (alone or in combination) to provide, market, improve, and operate the Smaato Websites, Smaato Ad Services, and any other products or services we have or may develop. This includes use of the information to:
Fulfill your requests;
Send information about our products and services, including marketing communications;
Respond to your questions, concerns, or customer service inquiries;
Create aggregated or de-identified information;
Comply with applicable laws, prevent fraud, mitigate risk, and perform similar purposes;
Understand usage trends and preferences;
Analyze, improve, and provide products and services;
Customize the content and advertising you see on the Smaato Websites, across the Internet, and elsewhere; and/or
Perform other purposes at your request.
c. How We Share Information We Collect Through the Smaato Websites
We may share the information we collect through the Smaato Websites in the following situations:
With your consent, including through this Policy;
With our affiliates;
With third parties that help us to operate our business and provide our services, such as entities that provide us with technical, customer, billing, administrative, event planning, marketing, or operational services;
As part of a business purchase, sale, merger, consolidation, investment, change in control, transfer of all or substantially all of our assets, reorganization or liquidation, bankruptcy, or in connection with steps taken in anticipation of such an event (e.g. due diligence);
When required by law or in response to lawful process, such as a subpoena, or to cooperate in good faith with a request from a government or law enforcement agency or official, including for purposes of national security and law enforcement;
If we believe sharing the information may prevent physical, financial or other harm, injury, or loss; or
If we believe sharing the information is necessary to protect our, or any other person’s or entity’s, interests, rights, property, or safety, or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual unlawful activity.
With respect to aggregated or de-identified information, we may share such information without restriction.
d. Analytics Services
For the purpose of designing our website in line with your needs, evaluating it from a business management perspective, controlling it and continuously optimizing our pages, we use services described in more detail below on the basis of Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. a) and f) GDPR. All of the mentioned processing operations result in a transfer of data to the servers of the providers of tracking or targeting technologies commissioned by us. Some of these servers are located in the USA. The data transfer is based on so-called standard contractual clauses of the EU Commission or under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles and and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the/or Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles. If you do not agree with the storage and evaluation of your data, you can object to the storage and processing of your data in the consent banner on our website. In this case, a so-called opt-out cookie will be stored in your browser, which means that the services used will not process any session data. However, you may then no longer be able to use all the functions on our websites. You can also prevent the storage of cookies by adjusting your browser software accordingly; however, we would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all functions of our websites to their full extent.
Google reCAPTCHA
We use the reCaptcha service of Google LLC (“Google”), 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, to protect us from spam and misuse. We use this processing on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR. This service serves to distinguish whether an entry was made by a human being or abusively by automated, machine processing. To determine this, Google places a cookie in your browser when you use the reCaptcha service and collects and processes the following data:
Referrer URL (address of the page on which the captcha is used)
Browser, browser size and resolution, browser plug-ins, date, language setting
Mouse- or Touch-Events within the reCaptcha box
Assignment to a Google account (if you are currently logged in to Google when using the reCaptcha service, this will be recognized and assigned)
Your input behaviour (e.g. answering the reCAPTCHA question, input speed into the form fields, order of selection of input fields by the user) is processed to improve pattern recognition on Google. Google also reads the cookies from other Google services such as Gmail, Search and Analytics. All of the above data is sent to Google in encrypted form. Google’s subsequent evaluation decides in which form the captcha is displayed on the page – in the form of a checkbox or by text input. A readout or saving of personal data from the input fields of the respective form does not take place. Further information about Google’s privacy policy can be found at https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/ .
Google Analytics – Google Universal Analytics
Smaato uses Google Universal Analytics, a web analytics tool from Google and we have a privacy agreement with Google. Google uses Cookies. The information generated by the Cookies on the use of the Smaato website by the users are usually transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there. However, Smaato has activated the IP anonymization, so that your IP address will be shortened by Google within member states of the European Union or in other signatory states to the Agreement on the European Economic Area before this happens. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP address be transferred to a Google server in the USA and shortened there. On behalf of Smaato, Google will use this information to evaluate your use of the website, to compile reports on the website activities and to provide further services to us in connection with the use of the website and the Internet. The IP address transmitted by your browser within the framework of Google Analytics is not combined with other data from Google. We use this processing on the basis of Art. 6 Par. 1 lit. f) GDPR for range measurement and evaluation (so-called statistics). In this case there is no further processing of your data for marketing or retargeting purposes. This serves the business optimization of our processes. If you have given your consent (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR), we will also process your data for marketing purposes. You can find more information on terms of use and data protection at https://www.google.com/analytics/terms or https://marketingplatform.google.com/about/. We would like to point out that on this website Google Analytics has been extended by the code “gat._anonymizeIp();” in order to ensure the anonymous processing of IP addresses (so-called IP masking). If you do not agree with the processing of your data by Google Analytics, you can object here: https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
6. Data Access and Retention
Generally speaking, we retain the information collected from the Smaato Websites and Smaato Ad Services for as long as necessary to achieve our objectives as detailed in this Policy, and to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements. If you are a resident of the European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland, the United Kingdom (UK), California, or Virginia, you may obtain a copy of the information we have about you, and correct or amend such information, by contacting us at
datarights@smaato.com
*protected email*
or by submitting a request to our online web form. You may read more about this and other rights in Section 11 below.
7. Data Security
We have administrative, technical, and physical safeguards in place in our physical facilities and in our computer systems, databases, and communications networks that are designed to protect the information from loss, misuse, or alteration. No method of electronic transmission or storage is 100% secure. Therefore, we cannot guarantee absolute security of your information. To assist with data security, you understand that YOU ARE RESPONSIBLE FOR MAINTAINING THE SECRECY OF ANY ACCOUNT CREDENTIALS THAT CAN BE USED TO ACCESS ANY ACCOUNT WITH SMAATO. ANY ACTIONS TAKEN USING YOUR ACCOUNT CREDENTIALS ARE YOUR SOLE RESPONSIBILITY.
8. Third-Party Websites and Apps
This Policy only applies to the Smaato Websites and the Smaato Ad Services. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or disclosures of websites, developers, or apps that access or use the Smaato Websites or Smaato Ad Services. Likewise, when you access the Smaato Websites, you may be directed to other websites that are also beyond our control. We encourage you to read the applicable privacy policies and terms and conditions of such third parties and websites, and the industry tools that we have referenced in this Policy.
9. Users from Outside the United States
The Smaato Websites and Smaato Ad Services are provided, supported, and hosted in the United States, and their operation is governed by United States law. If you are using the Smaato Websites or Smaato Ad Services from outside the United States, be aware that your Information may be transferred to, stored, and processed in the United States and other countries where our facilities are located. The data protection and other laws of the United States might not be as comprehensive as those in your country. By using the Smaato Websites or Smaato Ad Services, you consent to your information being transferred to our facilities and to the facilities of those third parties with whom we share your information as described in this Policy. Please see Section 11 below, titled “The EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)” for additional information we provide for the benefit of residents of the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK.
10. California Privacy Notice
Please see our California Privacy Notice for California Consumers
here
.
11. The EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
As of May 25, 2018, a new data privacy law known as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (the “GDPR”) will be in effect through the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK. The GDPR requires Smaato and those using our services to provide users with certain information about the processing of their “Personal Data.” “Personal Data” is a term used under the GDPR that means, generally, data that identifies or can identify a particular unique user or device – for instance, names, addresses, and Mobile IDs. To comply with the GDPR, we provide the below representations and information, which are specific to persons located in the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK and to the processing of personal data in the context of the activities of Smaato, Inc., Barcastraße 5, 22087 Hamburg, Germany.
a. Legal Grounds for Processing Personal Data
The GDPR requires us to tell you about the legal ground we are relying on to process any Personal Data about you. The legal grounds for us processing your Personal Data for the purposes set out in Sections 1 and 2 above (and Section 5 as to the Smaato Websites) will typically be because:
You provided your consent.
In order to store and gain access to information stored on your device, we rely on your consent. For this “cookie consent” (which applies not only to “cookies” but also to Mobile IDs), we rely on mobile app developers and oblige them contractually to pass on only legally obtained data. We do so to fulfill our obligations under the ePrivacy Directive. We may choose to obtain consent in other cases as well, in which case we will adhere to applicable laws relating to such consent and its withdrawal;
The processing is in our legitimate interest.
In some cases, we rely on legitimate interest as a legal basis for processing Personal Data, in order to provide our and/or other data controllers’ services. Such processing goes beyond the original collection of Mobile IDs. A legitimate interest we rely on, for instance, is the tailoring of promotional communications within mobile apps and services, which is beneficial to End Users and is an integral part of the ecosystem by which freely available content is funded through advertising revenue. This also may include providing analysis of and reporting about ad campaigns. We also rely on legitimate interest when we use Personal Data to maintain the security of our services, such as to detect fraud or to ensure that bugs are detected and fixed;
Contractual relationships.
Sometimes, we process certain data as necessary under a contractual relationship we have (such as our customer records and contact information);
Legal obligations.
Finally, some processing of data may be necessary for us to comply with our legal or regulatory obligations.
b.	Transfers of Personal Data
As Smaato is a global company and works with other global companies and technologies, we may need to transfer your Personal Data outside of the country from which it was originally provided. For instance, we may transfer your data to third parties that we work with who may be located in jurisdictions outside of the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, and which may have data protection laws that are less strict in comparison to those in Europe. When we transfer Personal Data outside of the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, we take steps to ensure appropriate safeguards are in place to protect your Personal Data. Your Personal Data will only be transferred to third countries outside the EEA, Switzerland or the UK within the legally permissible framework. We transfer Personal Data to third countries outside the EU/EEA (a) as stipulated by law or based on your consent, (b) based on the adequacy decisions of the European Commission (a public and updated list of these countries can be found here) and (c) by contractual regulations such as the EU Standard Data Protection Clauses (a public and updated list of these clauses can be found here). These safeguards shall ensure an adequate level of protection of your Personal Data and you can access further details regarding these safeguards upon request. Smaato, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Smaato has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Smaato has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.

Further, Smaato is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC).

In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Smaato commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU and UK individuals and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
. or at the contact information in Section 14 below, titled “Contacting Us,” and we will work with you to resolve your issue. If you are a resident of the EU, UK, or Switzerland, you may also contact your appropriate European Data Protection Authority, the UK Information Commissioner’s Office, or the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, respectively, with questions or complaints about our privacy practices. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we also commit to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to the International Centre for Dispute Resolution, the international division of the American Arbitration Association (“ICDR-AAA”), an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, you may, under certain circumstances, invoke binding arbitration; please notify us at
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
and/or please visit
https://www.icdr.org/dpf
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of IDCR-AAA are provided at no cost to you.
c.	Personal Data Retention
As a general matter, we retain your Personal Data for only as long as necessary to provide our Smaato Ad Services, or for other important purposes such as complying with legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements. We generally render Mobile IDs inactive within 13 months, provided that we may retain them if we have a legal or significant operational need to do so, such as for auditing, corporate record-keeping, compliance accounting, or bug-fixes. If you are a Client of ours and thus have an account with us, we will typically retain your business-to-business Personal Data for a period of 3 years after you have requested that your account be closed, or such account has been inactive.
d.	Your Rights as a Data Subject
The GDPR provides you with certain rights in respect to Personal Data that data controllers hold about you, including certain rights to access Personal Data, to request correction of the Personal Data, to request to restrict or delete Personal Data, and to object to our processing of your Personal Data (including profiling for online ad targeting).
Right to Access:
If you wish to exercise your right to access Personal Data we process as a data controller, you may do so by requesting access through the e-mail address
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
. When we receive your request, we will provide you with current, step-by-step instructions to follow in order to obtain access. We will then assess requests to exercise data access rights on a case-by-case basis; in doing so, we consider the difficulty of verifying whether a mobile identifier and data we have linked to it truly and solely belongs to the data subject making the request, as well as the potential adverse effects on disclosure of personal data to the wrong individual. Because such improper disclosure would likely adversely affect the privacy rights and freedoms of the data subject, we may limit the Personal Data we make available. Please note that we will only grant requests submitted via email for Personal Data for which we are a data controller, as explained further below. Where we act as a data processor for one of our Clients, we will refer your request to that Client. Please identify the Client your request refers to (if possible), to simplify this process.
Right to Correct:
If you wish to exercise your right to correct Personal Data, you may do so by contacting us at the contact information below.
Right to Object to Processing or to Withdraw Consent:
By using the device-based “opt-out” signals described in Section 4(b) above, you may withdraw consent for processing on which we rely on consent. If you do so, we will cease processing your Personal Data for purposes of our services within 30 days or less. We either collect these opt-out signals ourselves or receive them from the mobile apps we work with.
Right to Erasure.
You also have the right to obtain the erasure of Personal Data concerning you that we hold as a data controller. The above opt-out process satisfies this right. When an End User opts-out through device settings, and we receive this signal from our Clients, the Personal Data we use to provide our services will be deleted within 30 days (if you have an Android device) or permanently rendered disconnected to your device (if you have an iOS device). We will also manually delete your Personal Data, subject our identity verification process mentioned above, if you prefer that we do so; please contact us at
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
for further instructions on exercising this right manually. Please note, however, that we may retain copies of certain Personal Data on inactive or backup files, for our own internal and necessary purposes, such as auditing, accounting and billing, legal, or bug detection. We will retain your Personal Data for the period necessary to fulfill any important purposes that we have in retaining it, principally regarding legal, auditing, accounting, and billing obligations.
Right to Lodge Complaints.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. However, we hope that you will first consult with us, so that we may work with you to resolve any complaint or concern you might have.
e.	Smaato as a Data Controller and a Data Processor
EU data protection law makes a distinction between organizations that process Personal Data for their own purposes (known as “data controllers”) and organizations that process Personal Data on behalf of other organizations (known as “data processors”). If you have a question or complaint about how your Personal Data is handled, we encourage you to direct your inquiry to the relevant data controller, since data controllers hold primary responsibility for your Personal Data. Smaato may act as either a data controller or a data processor in handling your Personal Data, depending on the precise circumstances. For instance, for Personal Data that we use internally and independently to operate the Smaato Ad Services, and for Personal Data that we collect about our Clients, we are a data controller. If Smaato is acting as a data Controller, it remains primarily liable where this data is passed to third parties. But when we handle Personal Data strictly on behalf of our Clients or Partners in order to provide our services to them, we are a data processor. Thus, for instance, if you have questions about data that is used primarily by a mobile app on which our technology is embedded – or companies that serve ads that use our technology – you should contact those companies regarding questions about the Personal Data they handle and control.
f.	Contact Details and Controller
This data protection information applies to data processing by the data controller Smaato, Inc. for users based in the European Economic Area, Switzerland or the UK, unless otherwise stated in a service-specific data protection notice.
Smaato, Inc.
350 Fifth Avenue
Suite 7700
New York, NY 10118
Or our German office at:
Barcastraße 5, 1st Floor
22087 Hamburg, Germany
E-mail:
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
Our Data Protection Officer:
Fieldfisher Tech Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH
Amerigo-Vespucci-Platz 1
20457 Hamburg
Supervisory Authority
The Hamburg Commissioner for Data Protection and Freedom of Information
Ludwig-Erhard-Str 22, 7th floor
20459 Hamburg
Tel.: +49 (040) 42854-4040
E-mail:
mailbox@datenschutz.hamburg.de
*protected email*
12. Our Memberships and Affiliations
To help and foster the protection of consumer privacy, Smaato is an active member or participant of industry associations that govern the policies on consumer privacy in the context of internet-based advertising, including: the Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) America and Europe, the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA), and the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Smaato participates in, and complies with the policies and technical specifications of, the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework (IAB TCF). Smaato’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number is Vendor ID #82. Please see Section 4 above, titled “Consumer Control and Opt-Out Options,” for more information about your privacy choices.
13. Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may occasionally update this Policy to reflect changes to our privacy practices. The amended Policy will be displayed on the Smaato Websites. Please check our Policy regularly to ensure you have read the latest version and to stay informed of our privacy practices. Your continued access to and use of the Smaato Websites and Smaato Ad Services constitute your acknowledgment of this Policy and any updates.
14. Contacting Us
If you have any general questions regarding this Policy, you may contact us by email at
privacy@smaato.com
*protected email*
or mailing the following address:
Smaato, Inc.
350 Fifth Avenue
Suite 7700
New York, NY 10118
Search
To give you the best possible experience on our website, we use cookies and comparable technologies. Mandatory cookies are needed for the functionality of the site; other cookies are used for performance and marketing purposes.

Among the providers that set other cookies on our site is Google Ireland Ltd. ("Google"). Google is based in the USA and processes the personal data collected there. By clicking on "Allow all cookies (including from US providers)", you also expressly consent to the processing of your data in the USA in accordance with Art. 49 Para. 1 S.1 lit. a) of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). Under the item "Cookie Settings" you can, among other things, specifically set whether you allow the transfer of data to companies in the USA.

For more information about cookies and the processing of personal data, please see our
Cookie Policy
Reject All
Accept All
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 14
https://unity.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Legal Information
Privacy Policy Hub
Privacy Policy Hub
Developer Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy governs our information practices for our Developer Services, which includes any websites, where a link to this Policy is provided. Developer Services means products and services intended for a party that develops and/or distributes a game or other app made with and/or using Unity Services.
This Privacy Policy also applies to Personal Information we collect offline, such as when you call us or interact with Unity in person, such as at an industry event or at a place of business.
Developer Privacy Policy FAQ
These FAQs provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive
Developer Privacy Policy
. They are intended to enhance rather than replace the important notices in the Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
Customers should understand that Unity does not provide legal advice, therefore the information on this page is not a substitute for seeking your own legal counsel to determine the legal requirements of your business and processes, and how to address them.
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy will provide you with information on how Unity Technologies will collect, use, store, share or otherwise handle your Personal Information that we are responsible for and collect or receive through your use of applications which are owned by third parties but utilize Unity’s technology.
This Privacy Policy also applies to Personal Information we collect offline, such as when you call us or interact with Unity in person, such as at an industry event or at a place of business.
Game Player and App User Privacy FAQ
These FAQs provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
.They are intended to enhance rather than replace the important notices in the Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
Unity Educational Products for Schools Privacy Notice
This sets forth Unity’s policies and procedures regarding the Unity software products in schools.
Privacy Supplement Statement for Unity MARS Companion App
This sets forth special privacy terms regarding use of the Unity MARS Companion App.
Unity Data Processing Addendum (“DPA”)
This Data Processing Addendum (this “DPA”) is incorporated into and forms an integral part of the Unity Terms of Service. This agreement determines the rights and obligations of each party when processing personal information.
DPA Amendment for EU, UK, and Swiss SCCs
In 2021, the European Commission and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commission issued new Standard Contractual Clauses ("2021 SCCs"). Additionally, in 2022, the UK Parliament approved the UK International Data Transfer Addendum to the EU SCCs (“UK Addendum”). The 2021 SCCs and UK Addendum replace the Standard Contractual Clauses enacted in 2010 (“2010 SCCs”). This is a pre-signed copy of this document which you may download, execute on your side, and return to DPA@unity3d.com.
Technical and Organisational Measures including Technical and Organisational Measure to ensure the Security of the Data
Technical and Organisational Measures (TOMs) are strategic safeguards designed to protect data security and ensure adherence to data protection regulations. These are incorporated by reference in Unity’s
Data Protection Addendum.
Sub-Processors
Sub-processors are third-party companies that assist Unity by handling personal data on Unity's behalf. These are incorporated by reference in Unity’s
Data Protection Addendum
.
GENERATIVE AI SUPPLEMENTAL PRIVACY NOTICE
This notice explains Unity's processing activities with respect to Personal Information collected through users of Generative AI Tools
Sub-policy 15
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy:
Please note: This website includes an accessibility system. Press Control-F11 to adjust the website to the visually impaired who are using a screen reader; Press Control-F10 to open an accessibility menu.
Popup heading
Close
Accessibility
Press enter for Accessibility for blind people
who use screen readers
Press enter for Keyboard Navigation
Press enter for Accessibility menu
Customers
Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
Why We Use Customer Information
To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
Customer Choices
Users
Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
Why We Use User Information
To Whom We Disclose User Information
User Choices
Interest-Based Advertising
Opt Out
Data Retention
Children
Site Visitors
Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Why We Use Site Visitor Information
To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
Third-Party Online Advertising
Site Visitor Choices
General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
Why We Use Your Information
Disclosing Your Information
Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
Third-Party Links
Security
International Data Transfers
Regional Privacy Rights
Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
Notice to Individuals in the State of California
Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
Notice to Individuals in Thailand
Notice to Individuals in Brazil
Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
Data Broker Requirements
Contact Us
Changes to This Privacy Policy
Taboola’s Opt-Out Options
Personal Data in Europe and UK
TABOOLA PRIVACY POLICY
Last Update:
November 6th, 2024
For Taboola’s opt-out status options, please
click here
.
For Taboola’s region-specific notices, please visit the applicable notice for individuals in
Brazil
,
California
and
additional U.S. states
,
Europe
(including the United Kingdom),
China
, or
Thailand
.
Privacy Self-Regulation:
Taboola is dedicated to providing Internet users the highest level of transparency and control over the use of their data in online advertising. In support of this, we adhere to the:
Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA), the Digital Advertising Alliance Canada (DAAC), and the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA);
Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (OBA) and the IAB Europe OBA Framework. Taboola participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies as vendor number 42; and the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) Code of Conduct
for Web and Mobile. Taboola is a proud member of the NAI, an association dedicated to responsible data collection use in digital advertising.
Taboola also maintains an externally-facing
Trust Center
, which is available for your reference. To update your AdChoices Opt Out settings, select your region here:
US
,
Canada
, or
Europe
(including the United Kingdom); and to manage all NAI member sites’ settings, click
here
.
Privacy Policy:
Taboola, Inc., together with its
Affiliates
, (“
Taboola
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
”), recognize the importance of your privacy. In this privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) we describe how we collect, process, use, and disclose information that we obtain in the following contexts:
our website,
www.taboola.com
and any Taboola website, digital property, communication, or form displaying this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Sites
”);
our content-discovery platforms, feeds, widgets, analytics tools, pixels, integrations, push notifications, and other technical applications that we provide on third-party websites (collectively, the “
Content Discovery Platform
”); and
the Taboola News suite of content-discovery tools available on mobile devices and operating systems (including the Start line of products, collectively “
Taboola News
”) (together with the Content Discovery Platform, the “
Services
”).
When you visit the Sites, or use or interact with any of our Services, we will collect information from or about you or your device, which may include personal information or personal data as defined by applicable privacy laws (“
Personal
Information
” or “
Personal Data
“) (collectively, the “
Information
”), and this Information will be handled as described in this Privacy Policy.
We may use Information collected through the Sites and Services in various ways, depending on whether you are:
(i) a publisher, advertiser, or other content provider that has a contractual relationship, with Taboola (a “
Customer
“);
(ii) a visitor to our Customers’ websites and digital properties who interacts with our Services (a “
User
“); or
(iii) a visitor to the Taboola Sites (a “
Site Visitor
“), which may include Customers and prospective customers.
Therefore, this Privacy Policy outlines specific provisions for each of these categories in Sections 1 – 3, and outlines provisions that apply to all three categories in Section 4 below.
For more information about how we use cookies on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Please note that our
Connexity
and
Skimlinks
business lines have separate privacy policies that apply to their services. Please visit their respective websites for information on their privacy practices.
1. Customers
1.1 Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
We collect Customer Information directly from our Customers in the following ways:
Sites:
We will collect a Customer’s contact details when a Customer enters a contractual relationship with Taboola and we will collect a username and password when a Customer creates an account on any of our Sites.
When a Customer sends us an email asking a question, or signs up to receive our email newsletters, we will collect the Information that the Customer submits to us.
We will also collect other Information that Customers choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message or form that a Customer submits through our Sites or via email.
We may also collect Information from prospective customers through publicly-available sources.
Services:
When a Customer signs up to use our Services or uses Taboola’s analytics dashboard “Taboola Ads,” we collect Information such as the Customer’s name, email address, telephone number, payment card information, billing information, and any other Information the Customer may choose to provide to us on the platform.
We may also work with third party vendors to process payments to or from our Customers on our behalf. These vendors currently include
Stripe
and
Payoneer
, but are subject to change at any time. We do not have access to the Information that you provide to these third parties, and we encourage you to visit their privacy policies to understand their practices.
1.2 Why We Use Customer Information
We use Customer Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Services
. We use Customer Information to provide our Sites and Services and for other customer service purposes in relation to Customer accounts.
Communicating with you about your Taboola Partnership
. We use Customer Information to communicate, via email or otherwise, about Customers’ accounts; to contact Customers about Taboola’s products or services that we think may interest you; to respond to Customer inquiries, requests, or complaints; and to provide Customers with product updates, news, best practices, and other helpful or interesting information that can enhance your use of Taboola’s Services, in accordance with their communications preferences. When we communicate in this way, our emails may deploy a cookie that tracks when the emails are opened to measure Customer engagement. For more information about cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Customer Information to provide Customers with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes, including general updates about Taboola. These communications will be sent in accordance with our Customers’ communications preferences.
1.3 To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
We may disclose Customer Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Customer Information to any of Taboola’s current or future affiliates (affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by, or under common control with us, including, for example, Taboola.com Ltd., Taboola Europe Limited, Taboola (Thailand) Limited, and Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda., referred to herein as “
Affiliates
”), parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Customer Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
Customers
. We may disclose Customer Information to other Customers where relevant to the Service we provide. For example, we may provide publishers with information about what advertisers may appear on their network or advertisers with information about which publisher websites their campaigns have appeared on.
1.4 Customer Choices
Customers may access, correct, delete, or update the Information that they have provided to us by either updating the Information in their account, by emailing their dedicated account manager, or by emailing us at
support@taboola.com
.
We may send periodic promotional or informational emails to Customers in accordance with their communications preferences. At any time, Customers may opt out of such communications by following the opt-out instructions contained in the email. Please note that it may take up to ten (10) business days for us to process opt-out requests. If you opt out of receiving marketing and advertising emails from Taboola, we will still send you emails about your account and any Services that you have requested or received from us.
2. Users
2.1 Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
We automatically collect User Information when Users interact with our Services that appear on our Customers’ websites and digital properties. Like most other web-based services, we collect this User Information through cookies and other technologies. Taboola collects only pseudonymized data, which means we do not know who you are because we do not know or process your name, email address, or other identifiable data. Instead, we only process digital identifiers such as cookie IDs, IP addresses, mobile advertising IDs on your device, Taboola network browsing history and associated preferences, and in some limited circumstances, your hashed email address.
User Information that we collect includes, but is not limited to the following:
Content Discovery Platform
: We collect Information about a User’s device and operating system, IP address, the web pages accessed by Users within our Customers’ websites, the link that led a User to a Customer’s website, the dates and times a User accesses a Customers’ website, event information (e.g., system crashes), Information about the interactions with advertisements and Customers’ Services (e.g., availability, visibility, and clicks), general location information (e.g., city and state), hashed email addresses (when made available by the User), and gender (when made available by the User). We ask our Customers to obtain consent on our behalf, where required by applicable data protection laws, for us to collect this User Information. We may also obtain Information about you from our
data partners
.
Taboola News
: We collect in-app User behaviors (e.g. online status, browsing activity, and clicks) and implicit non-precise device location inferred from search queries (when enabled by the User) and SIM cards or IP addresses. For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Taboola Push Notification
: We collect Information about Users’ time zone, location (country, region, city), language, mobile operating system (e.g. iOS or Android), browser, connection and internet service provider.
2.2 Why We Use User Information
We use User Information for the following purposes:
Providing and Improving our Service
. We may use User Information to provide and improve our Services to Users and our Customers.
Tailoring content
. We may use User Information to tailor the content and information that we may send or display to Users; to retarget content to Users through our Services and elsewhere; and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Services. For more information about how we tailor our content see information below about our
Interest Based Advertising
.
Tailoring content across multiple devices
. We may use User Information to improve a unique User’s experience across multiple browsers and devices (such as smartphones, tablets, or other viewing devices) by providing better targeted ad campaigns to that User. For instance, should we recognize a User on a web browser, we may want to provide that User similar or personalized content on mobile apps, as well. To do this, we identify unique Users across devices, or we may sync cookies and identifiers with our service providers or Customers that do this, to help our Customers enhance their own data and data segments, or to help them target the right audience.
Offering our Customers data segments that help target content and advertisements for topics, products, and services that may interest you.
A data segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g., travel enthusiasts). We offer a number of data segments, both proprietary and from our
data partners
, to our Customers so that they may better target Users who are more likely to be interested in their content and advertisements. Taboola does not knowingly create segments that are based upon what we consider to be sensitive information (for example, Personal Data revealing your racial or ethnic origin or your religious affiliations, or Personal Data concerning your sensitive health information, sex life or sexual orientation, or genetic or biometric data). In connection with our Services, our Customers may use these
standard health-related segments
about non-sensitive conditions such as an inferred interest in health and wellness or over the counter medications. In addition, Taboola offers our Customers
standard political-related segments
that may indicate general political sentiment, interest in specific political issues, and political party affiliation.
2.3 To Whom We Disclose User Information
We may disclose User Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose User Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose User Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, or fraud detection) on our behalf.
Unaffiliated third parties
. We may disclose User Information to other unaffiliated third parties, specifically with (i) our
data partners
, so that we can connect you with relevant content by allowing our advertisers to target specific audience segments, and (ii) our
programmatic demand and supply partners
, so that we can serve you with tailored advertisements.
Customers
. We may disclose User Information to Customers where relevant to the Service we provide those Customers. For example, we may provide publishers with information about the viewing and click-through patterns of the content they publish and may provide advertisers with information about conversion rates for analytics purposes.
2.4 User Choices
You have the right to request that Taboola provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, correct your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, and cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data, and opt-out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data. Please visit our Global Taboola Data Subject Access Request Portal available
here
. To opt out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data, please click the U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal available
here
.
2.5 Interest-Based Advertising
Through our Services, including our Services on Customer websites, we may provide advertisements to you based on your recent browsing behavior across different Customer websites, browsers, or devices. For example, if on a first online visit, you browse on website A, then on a subsequent visit to website B, you may see content personalized based on your browsing history on website A. For example, if a user visits a clothing retail site, she might see clothing-related ads on another site she visits.
In order to target advertisements to you for products and services that may interest you, we may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), HTML5 local storage, and other technologies. For more information about how we use these technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
We may also work with third parties such as ad networks, which are third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to websites that you have visited in the past. These advertisers will deliver you targeted advertisements for products and services that may interest you. Third-party ad networks, our advertiser Customers (and their content providers and agents), and/or traffic measurement services may also use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize advertising content to you. These
third-party cookies and other technologies
are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one.
If you have questions about our collection and use of data for interest-based advertising purposes, please contact us at:
support@taboola.com
.
2.6 Opt Out
Taboola supports initiatives to offer our Users greater transparency and control over the uses of their Information. Therefore, we offer the following options for controlling the interest-based content and ads you receive.
If
you do not want to receive interest-based ads from Taboola, you can disable the display of such ads by clicking on the opt-out link below
. Please note that an opt out will not prevent you from seeing Taboola’s content recommendations. Rather, the opt out will prevent Taboola from using your Information to tailor these recommendations to your interests. You will continue to receive recommendations that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
You are currently:
Opted Out
Opt In
Not Opted Out
Opt Out
Not Opted Out
: Taboola will serve you personalized recommendations based on your history.
Opted Out
: You have opted out of tracking, Taboola will no longer serve you with personalized content recommendations based on your Internet use history.
Because our tracking mechanisms operate at the device and browser level, to fully opt-out across devices,
you will need to do so on each device and browser individually
. If your browsers are configured to reject cookies, your opt-out may not be effective, since we identify your choice to opt-out based on an opt-out cookie we deliver to you. In this case, you will need to confirm that your browser is configured properly in order for the opt-out to be effective. If you are using a Safari browser on iOS11 or macOS High Sierra, you must first adjust your Privacy and Security Settings to turn off both “Prevent Cross-Site Tracking” and “Block All Cookies”, and then return to this privacy policy or your preferred opt out platform to reset your opt out preferences.
Taboola may use non-cookie technologies in limited cases. Like cookies, these technologies allow Taboola to recommend ads that are tailored to your interests and to remember whether you have chosen to opt-out from our Services. Please note that some web browsers may not permit you to block the use of non-cookie technologies, but you can do so by simply clicking on the Opt Out feature above in this Section 2.6.
You can also opt-out of receiving targeted ads served by Taboola and other advertising companies
.
You may use the
NAI opt out tool
, which will allow you to opt out of receiving targeted ads from Taboola and from other NAI-approved member companies. The NAI also provides instructions to engage system-level mobile device opt outs in Android, iOS, and Windows Phone environments.
You may also visit one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites to learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
You can also opt out of the use of your email address for targeted ads through
Audience Matched Advertising
or AMA by Taboola and other advertising companies through the
NAI Audience Matched Advertising Opt Out (Beta)
.
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
2.7 Data Retention
We retain User Information, which is directly collected for purposes of serving ads, for at most thirteen (13) months from the User’s last interaction with our Services (often for a shorter period of time), after which time we de-identify the data by removing unique identifiers or aggregating the data.
We retain deidentified or aggregated data, which cannot identify an individual or device and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, for as long as commercially necessary. We keep opt-out information for longer than this period so that we can continue to honor your opt-out requests.
2.8 Children
We do not knowingly collect any data or target any advertisements on websites directed to children under the age of eighteen (18). If you are the parent or guardian of a child under the age of eighteen (18) and have a concern regarding the Information we collect, please contact us at
dpo@taboola.com
.
3. Site Visitors
3.1 Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Taboola collects Site Visitor Information either directly from you or from third parties that collect this Information during your use of our Sites. We may combine all the Information that we collect from various sources.
Information we collect directly from you
. We may collect Site Visitor Information directly from you. For example, when you send us an email asking a question, or submit a form on our Sites to receive marketing materials or email newsletters, we will collect the Information that you submit to us. We may also collect any other Information that you choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message that you submit through our Sites.
Information we collect from third parties
. We may collect Site Visitor Information about you from third parties that collect information on our behalf through your use of the Site, such as web analytics companies. Such information may include, without limitation, information about your operating system, IP address, settings and system configurations, device model, device ID and other unique device identifiers, mobile related information, the web pages you access within our Sites, the website that led you to our Sites, the website to which you go after leaving our Sites, the dates and times that you access our Sites, event information (e.g., system crashes) and web log data.
For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
3.2 Why We Use Site Visitor Information
We use your Site Visitor Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Service
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide and manage our Sites and Services.
Tailoring content
. We use Site Visitor Information to tailor the content and information that we send or display to you on our Sites, and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Sites.
Communicating with you
. We use Site Visitor Information to communicate with you, including via email, about our Services; to respond to your inquiries via our website request forms; and to answer any questions or complaints you submit; to provide you with news, best practices or other information that we think may interest you.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide you with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; to contact you about products or services we think may interest you; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes. These communications will be sent in accordance with your communications preferences.
Analyzing use of our Sites
. We use Site Visitor Information to better understand how individuals access and use our Sites, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to honor their requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical or statistical purposes.
3.3 To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
We may disclose Site Visitor Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
3.4 Third-Party Online Advertising
To understand your interests and deliver advertisements that are tailored to your interests, we may work with service providers or third parties that use their own
cookies, web beacons, and other technologies
to collect Information about Site Visitors’ online activities, either on our Sites and/or other websites across the Internet  (“
Taboola Ad Partners
”). These Taboola Ad Partners include advertisers and ad networks that may collect Information about when you view or interact with one of their advertisements and may collect information regarding your activities on our Sites and your online activities over time and across different websites. Like most advertisers, Taboola works to place our advertisements where we think they will be most interesting and relevant to the recipient. One way we do this is by allowing ad networks to place their own cookies when an individual visits our Sites. This enables the ad network to recognize individuals who have previously visited the Taboola Sites. Then, if the ad network has purchased ad space on a third-party website, and recognizes that same individual visiting that third-party website, the ad network can deliver a Taboola advertisement, knowing that this individual has already expressed interest in Taboola by visiting the Taboola Sites. To learn more about third parties who collect Site Visitor Information, please review our
Cookie Policy
.
3.5 Site Visitor Choices
Site Visitors may opt out of the Taboola Ad Partners that collect information on the Sites to serve ads about Taboola. (Some U.S. Site Visitors may exercise their options directly with Taboola, as outlined below in Section 5.2.1 and Section 5.3.1). By visiting one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites, you can learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
For Site Visitors who have subscribed to receive emails from us, you can manage your subscription by clicking your unique link that appears at the bottom of each of these emails.
4. General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
4.1 Why We Use Your Information
We use the Information that we collect from Customers, Users, and Site Visitors for the purposes respectively set forth in Sections 1-3 above, as well as for the following purposes:
Analyzing use of our Services
. We use the Information that we collect to better understand how Customers, Users, and Site Visitors access and use our Site and Services, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to respond to Customers’, Users’, and Site Visitors’ requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical, and statistical purposes.
Legal compliance
. We use the Information that we collect to comply with applicable legal obligations, including requests from law enforcement or other governmental entities.
Protecting our rights and interests
. We use the Information that we collect to protect our rights and interests and the rights and interests of our Customers, Users, Site Visitors, and the general public, as well as to enforce this Privacy Policy and our
Terms of Use
.
4.2 Disclosing Your Information
When we share your Information with third parties as specified above, we require such recipients to agree to only use the Information we share with them in accordance with this Privacy Policy and our contractual specifications and for no other purpose than those determined by us in line with this Privacy Policy.
In addition to the disclosures detailed above, we may also disclose Information for the following purposes:
Business transfers
.
We reserve the right to disclose and/or transfer Information to another entity if we are acquired by or merged with another company, if we sell or transfer a business unit or assets to another company, if we undergo a bankruptcy proceeding, or if we engage in any other similar business transfer.
Legal compliance
.
We may disclose Information in order to comply with the law, regulation, a judicial proceeding, subpoena, court order, or other legal process.
Protecting rights and interests
.
We may disclose Information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person, violations of our
Terms of Use
or this Privacy Policy, or as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
Aggregate and de-identified Information
.
We may disclose to our Customers and other third parties aggregated or de-identified information about users for marketing, advertising, research, or other purposes.
4.3 Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
For more information about how we use cookies and other tracking mechanisms on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
. You may disable certain tracking as discussed in our
Cookie Policy
(e.g., by disabling cookies).
4.4 Third-Party Links
Our Sites and Services may contain links to our
third-party partners’
websites. Any access to and use of such linked websites is not governed by this Privacy Policy but instead is governed by the privacy policies of those third-party websites. We are not responsible for the information security nor privacy practices of such third-party websites.
For example, our Sites include features from third-party social networking platforms, such as the Facebook “Like” button. These features may collect certain information, such as your IP address or the page you are visiting on our Sites, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or directly on our Sites. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing such features. As another example, our Services link to Customer websites, which are also not governed by this Privacy Policy but by the applicable Customers’ privacy policy.
4.5 Security
We value the security of your Information, including, but not limited to, the Information collected via the Sites or Services. Taboola is ISO 27001 and ISO 27701 certified and we have taken appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect the Information we collect about you from loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, destruction, and any other form of unauthorized processing. Please be aware, however, that no data security measures can guarantee 100% security.
4.6 International Data Transfers
We may transfer your Information outside the country in which it is collected, including to a country that may not offer the same level of protection for Information as the country in which you reside. Rest assured, however, that Taboola has arranged all contractual safeguards to ensure your Information is processed in a way that offers an adequate level of protection when it is shared between or among Taboola Affiliates, subsidiaries, and/or parent companies.
If you would like to learn more about EEA/UK Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.1.4 below. If you would like to learn more about Thailand Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.3.4 below.
5. Regional Privacy Rights
5.1 Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
5.1.1 Data Controller and Representative
If you reside in the EEA or UK, Taboola.com Ltd. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Taboola.com Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
Our representative in the European Union is Lionheart Squared (Europe) Ltd., 2 Pembroke House, Upper Pembroke Street 28-32, Dublin, D02 EK84 Ireland.
Our representative in the UK is Taboola Europe Limited, Aldgate House, 2nd Floor, 33 Aldgate High Street, London EC3N 1DL, United Kingdom.
5.1.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the EEA or UK, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.1 as “
EEA/UK Data
”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.1.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Data, (iii) export your Personal Data, (iv) delete your Personal Data, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. Where we have obtained your consent, or our Customers have obtained it on our behalf, you have the right to withdraw it at any time. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
privacy@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to lodge a complaint to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. To learn more, please contact your local data protection authority, via the contact methods available
here
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
privacy@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.1.4 EEA/UK Data Transfers
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among the EEA, the UK, Israel, the United States, Singapore and Hong Kong, and Taboola stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on (i) the European Commission’s decision, and (ii) UK adequacy regulations that Israel provides a level of data protection that is adequate for EEA/UK Data. These allow the free transfer of EEA/UK Data to Israel without the need for additional data transfer mechanisms.
Similarly, when Taboola transfers any personal data from the EEA to Taboola Europe Limited in the United Kingdom, it relies on the European Commission’s decision that the UK provides a level of data protection that is adequate for personal data from the EEA.
Beyond that, when Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to other countries then, if those countries do not have a European Commission adequacy finding and are not the subject of UK adequacy regulations (as applicable), Taboola implements
Standard Contractual Clauses
approved by the European Commission and/or competent UK authorities (as applicable) to protect the transferred data. The Standard Contractual Clauses are contractual privacy and security commitments that are entered between companies that transfer personal data outside of the EEA.
In particular, non-EEA/UK Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
5.2 Notice to Individuals in the State of California
5.2.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
California residents have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with what Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, including the categories of Personal Information, the categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties to whom Taboola discloses Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, and (iv) opt you out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Information. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and cross-context behavioral advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.2.2 Summary of Consumer Requests
This is a
summary of the requests
that Taboola received and honored from California residents in the last calendar year.
5.2.3 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this notice, Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Statutory Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Disclosure of PI
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
5.2.4 How Taboola Shares Your Personal Information
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. Under California law, such disclosures may be considered a “sale” when the personal information is exchanged for non-monetary consideration, or “sharing” when the personal information is disclosed for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information in accordance with the opt out methods we have provided throughout this notice.
We may sell or share for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (and may have sold or shared during the 12-month period prior to the Effective Date of this Statement) the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
We do not have actual knowledge that we sell or share Personal Information of minors under 18 years old.
5.3 Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
5.3.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
Residents of U.S. states with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with information on/access to the Personal Information that we may hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, (iv) provide you a copy of your Personal Information, and (v) opt-out of targeted advertising or the sale of your Personal Information. Taboola does not profile in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and targeted advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights requests, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.3.2 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Sources
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for targeted advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information.
We may sell or share for targeted advertising purposes, the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
5.4 Notice to Individuals in Thailand
5.6.1 Data Controller
If you reside in Thailand, Taboola (Thailand) Limited will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.6.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Thailand, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.3 as “Thailand Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
5.6.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) export your Personal Data, (iii) delete your Personal Data, and (iv) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
If you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.6.4 Thailand Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside of Thailand. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses.
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Thailand, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Thailand Data is adequately protected when transferred outside of Thailand, the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 mandates that such transfers take place using certain legal mechanisms.
When transferring Thailand data elsewhere, Taboola relies on Standard Contractual Clauses, set forth by the European Commission, that outline contractual privacy and security commitments between companies that transfer personal data (for example, from Taboola (Thailand) Limited to Taboola, Inc.). Taboola, Inc. and its Affiliates have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.5 Notice to Individuals in Brazil
5.7.1 Data Controller
If you reside in the Federative Republic of Brazil (“Brazil”), Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.7.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Brazil, under the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados federal law 13,709/2018 (the “LGPD”), our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.4 as “Brazil Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), a notice will be provided to you in our disclosure statement.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.7.3 Your Rights to Your Personal Data
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) confirm whether we are processing your Personal Data, (ii) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (iii) disclose the public and private entities with which we have shared use of your Personal Data, (iv) correct your Personal Data, (v) export your Personal Data, for your own use or use by another controller (vi) anonymize, block, or delete any unnecessary or excessive data, (vii) delete all your Personal Data, and (vii) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit Taboola’s
Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
Brazilian data subjects can file a complaint in relation to the LGPD with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (the “ANPD”). In the meantime, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher, at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.7.4. Brazil Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside Brazil. As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Brazil, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Brazil Data is adequately protected when transferred outside Brazil, the LGPD mandates that such transfers take place using
certain legal mechanisms
. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses, and which may be updated upon further guidance from the future ANPD.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.6 Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
5.8.1 Processing Entity and Designated Office
If you reside in the PRC, Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. will be the processing entity of your Personal Information provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Our designated office is located at Room 501i, Unit 501, 5F, No. 61 on East 3rd Middle Road, Chaoyang District, Beijing, China, and Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
5.8.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Information
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the PRC, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Information described above (also referred to in this Section 5.5 as “PRC Data”) will depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Information from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Information to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is reasonable to support news reporting or the public interest. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Information from you or may otherwise need the Personal Information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. If we ask you to provide Personal Information to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Information is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Information).
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.8.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to know about and make decisions about the processing of your Personal Information — this includes the right to restrict or refuse the processing of your Personal Information. You also have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to consult or copy the Personal Information we hold about you, (ii) correct or supplement your Personal Information, (iii) transfer or export your Personal Information, (iv) delete your Personal Information, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Information. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Information and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Information, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to complain to the relevant department performing duties of Personal Information protection. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Information, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.8.4 PRC Data Transfers
To provide Taboola’s Services, Personal Information about individuals in the PRC is collected by a server in Hong Kong, and our data then flows between Hong Kong, Israel, the EEA, the UK, the United States, and Singapore. Taboola does not store any Personal Information in the PRC, and instead stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers Personal Information about individuals in the PRC to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on standard contractual clauses as set forth by the European Commission. In particular, non-PRC Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
6. Data Broker Requirements
THE ENTITY MAINTAINING THIS WEBSITE IS A DATA BROKER UNDER TEXAS LAW. TO CONDUCT BUSINESS IN TEXAS, A DATA BROKER MUST REGISTER WITH THE TEXAS SECRETARY OF STATE (TEXAS SOS). INFORMATION ABOUT DATA BROKER REGISTRANTS IS AVAILABLE ON THE TEXAS SOS WEBSITE.
The entity maintaining this website is a data broker under Texas law. To conduct business in Texas, a data broker must register with the Texas Secretary of State (Texas SOS). Information about data broker registrants is available on the Texas SOS website.
7. Contact Us
If you have questions about the privacy aspects of our Sites or Services, please contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you wish to receive this policy in an alternative format, please contact privacy@taboola.com.
The names and contact details of our Affiliates which may process your Personal Information in their capacity as data controllers, can be found here:
www.taboola.com/contact
.
Residents in Brazil, China, the European Economic Area (including the United Kingdom) and Thailand, if you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher at
dpo@taboola.com
.
8. Changes to This Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is current as of the Effective Date set forth above.
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time, so please be sure to check back periodically. We will post any changes to this Privacy Policy on our Sites.
If we make any changes to this Privacy Policy that materially affect our practices with regard to the Information we have previously collected from you, we will endeavor to provide you with notice in advance of such change by highlighting the change on our Sites. We will seek your prior consent to any material changes, if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws.